














































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































































1. Discretion, the keeping of the secrets of the Order. 2. Obedience to
30,000 went for the upkeep of the estate near Moscow, the town house,
“Aah!” Rostóv almost screamed lifting both hands to his head. The
abandoned in the center?” he inquired, searching with his eyes for
a banister post stood a tallow candle which guttered in the draft. On
a battlefield to whom thousands of new and brilliant ideas occur which
“A bayonet wound. I remained at the front. Remember, your
“A bit touched—I always said so.”
able to inflict punishments justly and unjustly. It is those people I
a bold, free, and easy tone, while in his soul he regarded himself as a
About 80,000 went in payments on all the estates to the Land Bank, about
about a mile and a half off on the opposite heights. Down below, on
about her native land. When he saw the pretty little Bourienne, Anatole
about him and about his love for him, letting it be understood that he
about him and even speak.
about him. He reddened and turned away.
about him or anyone else, and I don’t want anything of the kind.”
about Mademoiselle Bourienne was dreadful. It was untrue to be sure, but
about Sergéy Kuzmích that interested Prince Vasíli just then, and
About ten o’clock Rostóv went to the English Hotel straight from the
about the Austrians and their uniforms, about their lines, about
about the old prince and criticized him.
about till dawn, because I think and can’t help thinking, just as
about to smile, and once on coming out of the chapel Prince Andrew and
about two thirds of a mile was stopped on the highroad. Rostóv saw the
“About your sister,” ejaculated Denísov testily.
above all this the lofty sky, formed the chief subjects of his delirious
above and below him in social standing. Something always drew him toward
above his head: “Captain Túshin! Captain!”
Above the heights was the dark clear sky, and to the right the vast orb
a bright smile, “so she won’t come down. It is natural in her
a brilliant match—blushed like a girl.
absence. Little Nicholas had been unwell for four days. The coachman who
absolutely necessary.
a case.
a cavalryman. Prince Andrew felt that an invisible power was leading him
accent. He was breathless with agitation, his face was red, and when
accept it and fixed the stake himself. Nicholas submitted to him, and at
accompanied by adjutants, galloped off in different directions, and
account of court and personal considerations tens of thousands of lives,
a celebrated miniaturist, and he leaned over the table to take the
a ceremonial march past him, and Rostóv on Bedouin, recently purchased
a certain house—that was another matter and quite the thing for a
a chance to escape, or to trick us, now that we certainly have him in
a clear blue sky, and the sun’s vast orb quivered like a huge hollow,
a closely written letter of two sheets from Bilíbin. He folded it up
a comforting belief in future life, retribution, recompense, and
a commander in chief. As it was considered that the Austerlitz success
a commanding officer’s quarters, the regiment began to move: the
a consciousness is communicated is very difficult to define, but it
a coronet) entered the room, calm and majestic, except that there was
acquaintance—he wished him simply a brother and a virtuous instructor.
acquaintance of many persons who might prove useful to him, and by
acquaintance,” said Pierre. And again, glancing at the stranger’s
acquaintances not only cordially, but even with a shade of deference
acquainted with Prince Andrew Bolkónski, through whom he hoped to
acquired though she did not understand its significance. This expression
acquiring a trotter of his own, very stylish riding breeches of the
a crafty man convinced of the futility of being cunning with so
across his path. Rostóv put his horse to full gallop to get out of the
across, snatched it from his hand and began reading it. Pierre looked
across the bodies and under a terrible fire from the French, he attended
action, and in the company of well-known, elderly, and respected racing
action, and more than that, you can’t make me believe that you do not
action, as if flying through the air without touching the ground.
action did Prince Bagratión, still hearing the cannonade in the center,
action—he drew the glove from his shapely white hand, made a sign
activities of 160,000 Russians and French—all their passions, desires,
activity, Túshin did not experience the slightest unpleasant sense of
actual phrase used by the Vienna cabinet,” said the Danish chargé
actuated by a real desire for peace.
added: “What a lot of men have been crippled today—frightful!”
addressed an edifying exhortation to them. He imagined to himself
addressed the horseman with the white plumes, evidently suggesting
address. He is a wise and clever fellow.”
addressing first one, then another. He said he would not have been
addressing her with the careless tone of habitual tenderness natural to
addressing him as ‘Usurper and Enemy of Mankind.’”
addressing the black-mustached Denísov with servile deference.
a deed to sign for the princess’ benefit.
a desire to do something for them, a desire for their approval.—So I
a desperate cry and such mad, drunken determination that, taken by
a despot. Who is right and who is wrong? No one! But if you are
a dinner where there was no place for him. In the next hut there was a
adjutant on Kutúzov’s staff, but he does everything alone. The next
adjutant, or really let the matter drop, was the question that worried
adjutants met him with news of the successful result of the action.
adjutant whom he so hated.
   A dreaded foe be thou, kindhearted as a man,
adroitness and Italian play-acting! Do you know the tale about him and
advancing to attack the French cavalry that was coming to meet them.
advantageous match but a splendid, noble fellow... he is my friend...”
adve’sawies have wefused a weconciliation, please pwoceed. Take your
advice is to let the matter drop. Well then, on Friday after the review
a feeling of contemptuous ill will. He snorted whenever he mentioned
a few fir trees.
a few minutes later the chief forces of the French army moved rapidly
a few steps, turned, cut a caper, brought her little feet sharply
affair. I am her father.”
affairs and of Pierre himself in those early days. From the death of
affair was over and, though not big, had been a successful engagement.
affectation. Princess Mary ran out of the room to fetch Mary
affectionate letters to your parents, and if you think you may be
affirmatively.) “When you hear a knock at the door, you will uncover
afflicted by the death of the father he had hardly known), and her
a first introduction and betrays a consciousness of the impropriety of
a flag of truce, demanding an audience with the Russian Emperor, was
A fortnight after the letter Prince Vasíli’s servants came one
a fortnight ago he would have had a paymaster’s clerk at Yúkhnovna
afraid of a general battle. His hour has come! Mark my words!”
a Frenchman), “L’Urope ne sera jamais notre alliée sincère.” *
a French soldier tugged at the other. He could distinctly see the
A fresh wave of the flying mob caught him and bore him back with it.
a friend older than himself and whom he respected. His whole time
after another greeting the Tsar with the strains of the march, and then
“After Austerlitz!” said Prince Andrew gloomily. “No, thank you
After a while he re-entered it as if to snuff the candles, and, seeing
After a while the moving mass became agitated, someone rode past on
After Denísov’s departure, Rostóv spent another fortnight in Moscow,
after dinner. He called Natásha and asked her what was the matter.
After dinner, he went to see his daughter-in-law. The little princess
After five o’clock it was only at the Augesd Dam that a hot cannonade
After his illness he looked rather thinner that day than on the field
After his interview with his wife Pierre left for Petersburg. At the
After looking at him Napoleon smiled.
after losing half their men were retreating in disorderly confused
After passing some Austrian troops he noticed that the next part of the
After receiving this news late in the evening, when he was alone in his
After supper Pierre with his partner followed the others into the
After tea, the company went into the sitting room and Princess Mary was
After that Anna Pávlovna led up to the courage and firmness of the King
After the Austerlitz campaign Prince Andrew had firmly resolved not
after the battle but send a courier to Petersburg with news of a
after their active service, were stationed near Olmütz and the camp
After these words, the Mason, as if tired by his long discourse, again
after the soup the prince became more genial.
after troops and begged for seats on the gun carriages. The jaunty
after two in the morning, thoughts come and I can’t sleep but toss
again.
again.
again, and let his head sink still lower.
again and remained for a while with the Ismáylov regiment.
again, and the little princess curiously noting the impression
again, as soon as all turned toward him, excused himself and said no
again getting in front of the first line as he had done when the Horse
again joined her. They began talking in whispers, but their talk broke
Again Rostóv looked intently into Borís’ eyes and sighed. Berg
against his right, flew round again in a circle. Natásha guessed what
against the French?”
against the muslin of the curtain.
against the pillow.
a general engagement,” repeated Dolgorúkov, evidently prizing this
“A geography lesson!” he muttered as if to himself, but loud enough
a girl, such tact, such masterly perfection of manner! It comes from
a glimpse of her, she seemed still more lovely. She was a charming girl
aglow with dazzling light—as if he had only awaited this to begin the
a gold snuffbox on which was a portrait. In the middle of one of the
a good friend, an adjutant general and an excellent fellow, Prince
a good thing for proprietors who perish morally, bring remorse upon
agreed or disagreed and was satisfied or not with the arrangements. Next
“Ah, and here’s Nicholas!” cried Natásha, running up to him.
“Ah! Breathing again, breathing!” he muttered to himself.
“Ah, but you won’t talk politics to me like Annette!”
“Ah! He is alive,” said Napoleon. “Lift this young man up and
“Ah, it can’t be avoided!” thought Nicholas, for the first and
“Ah, my boy, my head’s in a whirl!” said the old man with a smile,
“Ah, my dear fellow, what a battle we have gained! God grant that
“Ah, my dear friend, he is very unfortunate,” she said. “If what
“Ah, my dear, my dear!” he began, rising and taking her by both
“Ah, my dear vicomte,” put in Anna Pávlovna, “L’Urope” (for
a hoar frost now turning to dew, but in the valleys it still lay like a
a hollow between two hills near the village of Pratzen, the Russian
a horrified expression on his handsome face, Anatole looked at Princess
“Ah, Princess Mary!” he said suddenly in an unnatural voice,
“Ah, she is indeed a darling! I’ll send her to you.”
“Ah! That’s a good thing. So, my dear boy, you wish to serve the
“Ah, there will be, and there are, many more such girls somewhere whom
“Ah, those damned Germans! They don’t know their own country!”
“Ah, what have you done to me?” it still seemed to say, and Prince
“Ah yes, and what else did he say that’s unpleasant?” thought
“Ah, yes! That’s a whole long story! How are you going to speak to
aide-de-camp.
aide-de-camp and was duly conducted to pay his respects to the aunt and
aid of his servant, and not looking at Pierre. With a pair of felt boots
aim?” said he quietly and quickly.
aim was to show General Weyrother—who had read his dispositions with
air, and disobeying orders. The moral hesitation which decided the fate
a joke he had heard in Vienna and which he had been trying all that
a lack of bread, to move farther into the interior of Prussia, for only
alarm lest something should have happened to the child while he was
alarm, supposing these words to mean that the young count was displeased
a letter at once, and she’ll come here and all will be explained, or
“A letter from Nikólenka! I’m sure of it!” exclaimed Natásha,
a letter of recommendation he had brought from Pierre had become
Alexander Prince Vasíli had risen to high position and honors. And now,
Alexander’s Guards,” said the first one, indicating a Russian
Alexander unpleasantly, he rode up and saluted.
Alexander was clearly heard. He gave the words of greeting, and the
Alexéevich. Loud knocks were heard at the door. Pierre took the bandage
alien face of that man, his bayonet hanging down, holding his breath,
alike, felt that the commander did not himself know what to do, and this
“Aline,” he said to his wife, “go and see what they are about.”
a little earth crumbled from the bank under the horse’s hind hoofs.
A little later when he went up to the large circle, Anna Pávlovna said
“A little wound, but he has been made an officer; he is well now, he
alive and suffering from a burning, lacerating pain in his head.
alive could understand or explain.
alive—live: tomorrow you’ll die as I might have died an hour ago.
all.”
all, and without promising to help me?” thought Pierre, rising with
All are struck by the justness of his views, but no one undertakes to
All around were loving eyes glistening with tears of joy, and all around
all. At last the sleigh bore to the right, drew up at an entrance, and
All began to run and bustle, and Rostóv saw coming up the road behind
all commanders of divisions the right to shoot marauders, but I much
all expecting it, they are so sure that it will happen that I cannot, I
“Alley! Alley!” said the Cossack, touching the prisoner’s arm to
all for his relations was the fact that there was still a possibility of
all her attention. He seemed to her kind, brave, determined, manly, and
All his wishes were being fulfilled that morning: there was to be a
all-important.”
“All is over,” he thought, and a cold sweat broke out on his
all its details to the Austrian General Weyrother: a lucky accident had
all make out: was it a glade in the wood lit up by the moon, or some
All Moscow repeated Prince Dolgorúkov’s saying: “If you go on
all Moscow, that everyone will say that you, drunk and not knowing what
all on one plan, for hospitals, schools, and almshouses, which were soon
allowed, I have hastened to take all steps to that end. May I have
allow him personally to express the deep respect that, emulating his
“Allow me to ask,” he said, “are you a Mason?”
“Allow me to give you a piece of advice. When you reach the capital,
all pale and exchanged looks in silence.
all quite forgetting the danger and all regard for self-preservation, he
“All right, all right!” he said to Prince Andrew, and turned to a
“All right, all right,” interrupted the prince, and laughing his
“All right, all right,” replied the commander, and turned to Major
“All right, all right, we’ll see!”
“All right, all right. We’ll talk it over,” replied Prince Andrew.
“All right!” said Dólokhov, having finished the addition. “All
“All right,” said Pierre, still smiling in the same way. A feeling
All Rostóv’s cards were beaten and he had eight hundred rubles scored
all sorts of tempting wares. The Pávlograds held feast after feast,
all that has happened.”
all that the peasants had has been eaten up. I myself will remain in
all that would be required of him.
All the advantages were on our side. Our enormous forces, undoubtedly
all the figures on it: the sun, the moon, a hammer, a plumb line, a
All the guns, without waiting for orders, were being fired in the
“All the same, I love and value nothing but triumph over them all, I
“All the same, it was Bilíbin who found a suitable form for the
“All the same! They say this one is the commander of all the Emperor
all these dreams melted and merged into the chaos and darkness of
all this end?” thought Rostóv, looking at the changing shadows before
“All this had to be and could not be otherwise,” thought Pierre,
all this shame and sorrow, but wanted now to play with him as a cat does
allusion to the name of the sovereign. Three hundred persons took their
“All well?” asked Rostóv, drawing away his arm.
all were seated again, turned with his kindly smile to Rostóv.
All were silent. Túshin appeared at the threshold and made his way
All were then more confident of victory than the winning of two battles
“All wight! All wight!” shouted Denísov. “It’s no good making
all your valuables.”
almost at the middle of the table. Facing them sat Pierre, beside Prince
alone and in full view of the Emperor.
alone, but because of everyone, it must inevitably come about. They are
alone, in which there was something more significant than in the general
alone together, Prince Vasíli announced his hopes and wishes to the old
alone with Hélène in the little drawing room where they were sitting.
alone with her, so Rostóv, now that he had attained what he had longed
alone without any allies, it might perhaps have been a long time before
a long-awaited moment. He was firmly convinced that this was the day of
a look at you, your excellency.”
a look of complete absent-mindedness, kept rubbing the bridge of his
aloud.
a loud, monotonous voice began to read out the dispositions for the
aloud to him and being friends with Princess Mary. Mademoiselle
already, but then he cannot know what I think of him and may imagine
already in any case dishonored by being unable to fulfill the great and
already lost him. He bent over him and, as his sister had taught him,
already passed. Through the terrible and deafening roar of those voices,
already seen the young master, and, before he had reached the drawing
already visible. Suddenly something like a birch broom seemed to sweep
also. Yes, my opinion, and only my opinion,” added Prince Bolkónski,
altar on which lay a Testament and a skull. Round it stood seven large
altar with her. How and when this would be he did not know, he did not
Although in female society Anatole usually assumed the role of a man
Although Iogel did not acknowledge this to be the real mazurka, everyone
always afraid, came into her room with a peculiarly restless and malign
always clear and simple, so she is not stupid. She never was abashed and
always dragging it in one direction. He tried to get away from them, but
(always followed by a ball flying past and striking the earth, a man, a
always in one direction, humming with whispers and talk and the sound of
always poking fun at me.... Ah, well! Let him!” And he began reading
always shall, and I want nothing more.”
always surrounded by the same decks, masts, and rigging of his ship, so
a man oppressed by business, weary and suffering, who yet would not, for
amazed the French themselves. Rostóv was horrified to hear later that
a meeting with Napoleon. To the joy and pride of the whole army, a
Amélie” (Mademoiselle Bourienne) “thinks I could be jealous of her,
amiably into his face, evidently wishing to soften the rudeness of his
amid people of whom he was weary had gone, instantly every thought of
Amid the smoke, deafened by the incessant reports which always made him
amid the square masses of troops standing motionless as if turned to
A minute later Sónya came in with a frightened, guilty, and scared
am I to go?” thought Nicholas, and went again into the dancing room
Among the gentlemen of the suite, Rostóv noticed Bolkónski, sitting
among them the staff officer and Zherkóv, who had been twice sent to
Among the young men introduced by Rostóv one of the first was
a movement. With a pleasant smile Berg related how the Grand Duke
am staying in for your sake,” and so on. And though Prince Vasíli,
amusing,” he continued, with a sudden, good-natured laugh, “was that
amusing, now girlishly enchanting.
a musketry fire at the French cavalry that was pursuing our troops. It
an allowance of ten thousand rubles. He had a dim perception of the
an assiduous and modest mien, and stooping over the outspread map
Anatole. “Ah, I know, I know,” she said with a sly glance, “your
Anatole came up to her. She still could not see him. She only felt a
Anatole embracing the Frenchwoman and whispering something to her. With
Anatole, having taken off his overcoat, sat with arms akimbo before a
Anatole is accompanying me on his way to the army, so I hope you will
Anatole is no genius, but he is an honest, goodhearted lad; an excellent
Anatole kissed the old man, and looked at him with curiosity and perfect
Anatole returned smiling to the ladies.
Anatole’s expression, though his eyes were fixed on her, referred not
“Anatole used to come to borrow money from her and used to kiss her
an attack. But when they had marched for about an hour in the dense fog,
An Austrian officer in a white uniform with green plumes in his hat
and about Nikólenka, twice asked when the last letter had been received
and abruptly.
and a bullet whizzing high up in the mist with a plaintive sound passed
and accept the offer,” but before he had time to say it Natásha began
and acquaintances, invitations, and social occupations were so numerous
and, addressing him, again used the epithet “young man” that was
and advantages of service under members of the Imperial family.
and a few here and there with powdered hair and in Russian kaftáns.
and affronts matter? I love and forgive everybody now.”
and after staying but a short time with the Tsar went to see the grand
and again it turned uselessly in the same place.
and again jumping up, dashed so impetuously forward that it seemed as if
and again proceeded to gallop along the line, penetrating farther and
and all along the French line on the hill fires flared up and the
and all his comrades of the Guards by his appearance—that of a
and all His mercy to one who is blind, or who shuts his eyes that he may
and all you have been doing on your estates.”
“And am I to bring the gypsy girls along with him?” asked Nicholas,
and a muffled shout almost behind them in the wood. The French had
and amused as he was when he put on the little icon. “Did he believe?
and amuse themselves as girls of thirteen and fourteen do who are
and amusingly. “And why not marry her if she really has so much money?
and Anatole met in the conservatory.
and angry faces struggled for the mop: how differently do those clouds
and anxiety they threw their burden of sorrow on one another and
and as he went on became more and more animated. He told them of his
and, as it might seem, of the obligations to her he had taken on
“And ask whether sharpshooters have been posted,” he added. “What
and as they went along he was told allegories of the toils of his
and, as you know my principles, I refer it to you.”
And at every word he added: “But don’t hurt my little horse!” and
and at last became silent.
and at the people in it. Round a long table covered with black sat some
and awkwardly over the parquet floor of the reception room, not knowing
and back, galloped strenuously forward, and with a dashing salute reined
and began firing them at Túshin’s battery.
and began to speak.
and being well disposed toward Borís, who had managed to please him the
and besides this, nine men in every thousand for the militia. Everywhere
and calling the nurse began giving the medicine. The child screamed
and colonel looked sternly and significantly at one another like two
and conflict with which he had trodden the Enns bridge, but with the
and connections he belonged to the groups of old and honored guests, and
and continual expectation of some good, always in front of him but never
and could not answer. “Can something bad have happened to me?”
and Count Ilyá Rostóv became more and more moved, more glass was
and Count Rostóv, glancing angrily at the author who went on reading
   And dare not Herculean Russians trouble...
and dark. The officers were hurriedly drinking tea and breakfasting, the
“And didn’t Hippolyte tell you?” asked Prince Vasíli, turning to
and disheveled, beat and turned the heavy feather bed for the third
and dismounted slowly among the guns. He delivered the order and did
and dissatisfied about something and that at headquarters they were
and distinctly. In the valley he saw before him something like a river,
and, doing so, groaned involuntarily.
and Dólokhov’s angry cry.
“And do you feel quite calm?” Rostóv asked.
“And do you know, my dear fellow, it seems to me that Bonaparte has
and, drawing up an armchair for Prince Vasíli, pointed to it and began
and dropped it again behind her. Prince Andrew recognized her without
and drowsy Kutúzov, who reluctantly played the part of chairman and
and ecstasy such as he had never before known. Every trait and every
and even now never says a word against him. Those pranks in Petersburg
and even Princess Mary felt herself pleasantly made to share in these
and everybody had to serve, he took a post under his father in the
and explained to them his intentions and wishes. He told them that steps
and extending its neck, galloped on yet faster. Hardly had the Horse
“And fancy! she refused him quite definitely!” adding, after a
and fell on his back. He opened his eyes, hoping to see how the struggle
and fighting, not at all as the gunner and the Frenchman with frightened
and, flushed and smiling, plumped down on the floor. The countess was
and for the issue of the whole battle. “But be that what it may,”
and Frenchmen running toward it. Higher up stood some Russian infantry,
and frequent blushes she told him she was very sorry about their past
and fro, and dispatching of adjutants—was confined to the Emperor’s
and frowning brows stood a hundred paces away from them in his helmet
and galloped along the line. At first he rode along the line of
and galloped off. But no sooner had he left Bagratión than his courage
and glad sparkle. Prince Andrew had grown thinner, paler, and more
and grieved had he chosen not to see them. These different
and groans mingled in a general hubbub, then the firing died down.
and handing on to posterity of a certain important mystery... which
and handsome young man and woman for one another. And this human feeling
and happy though uneasy face of Pierre. It seemed as if the very light
And, having glanced round the room, Prince Andrew turned to Rostóv,
and he again began speaking about indifferent matters, about Sergéy
And he again turned to Pierre.
and he felt a nervous shudder run down his spine. But the mere thought
And he looked at Pierre with a mocking, challenging expression. He
And he looked on this visit to a churlish old man and a rich and ugly
and helped him. I know and understand what a spice that would add to the
And here’s the little shop where we used to buy gingerbread! Can’t
and her look seemed to say: “Well, it is your own fault.”
and her son. She had opportunities of sending her letters to the Grand
And he sat down again, paying no more attention to his daughter, who was
and he saw above him the remote, lofty, and everlasting sky. He knew it
and he walked on.
and he wore a crumpled hussar cap stuck jauntily back on one side of his
and he would marry her. So her future shaped itself in Mademoiselle
and his back drawn in, slightly swinging one foot, and, with his head a
and his lips were smiling. Though the commander was occupied in giving
and Horse Guards’ jacket, shouting something to a pale, white
and horses) had it not occurred to Rostóv to flourish his whip before
“And how could you believe he was my lover? Why? Because I like
and how happy I may be with such a friend and such a husband! Husband?
And how has it ended? I was against this marriage even then and foretold
“And how she dances! What gwace!” he said again after a pause.
and how the well-trained horse looked round unconcerned and did not
“And I did not know... Nicholas... My darling!...”
“And if I should meet His Majesty before I meet the commander in
“and if this aim coincides with yours, you may enter our Brotherhood
“And, if your excellency will allow me to express my opinion,” he
“And I know why she’d be ashamed,” said Pétya, offended by
and I’ll write to her myself, and we will kill the fatted calf.”
“And I might have been in his place!” thought Rostóv, and hardly
and impossible, he again glanced timidly at her. She did not sit down
and in a way of which our last campaign can give you no idea. Half the
and in a whisper, with a strangely unsmiling face: “Come to dinner
and indulgently to smooth with it the heart of his neighbor. As to the
and inevitably he lapsed into falsehood. If he had told the truth to his
and in order to press them again to her lips, she slightly pushed away
and insignificant people. But the army, the Russian army, everyone
and interesting person to the visitors and that nowhere else was the
and interests before him! “Yes, they have taken a wise decision,” he
and into ladies’ society with an affectation of doing so against his
and in two twists of the hand he breaks them to smithereens and installs
and irrepressibly, as water does in a creek. Had the Russian army been
and irritation, though controlledly calm as a man is at the approach of
“And I should be ashamed to write to Borís. I’m not going to.”
And is it worth tormenting oneself, when one has only a moment of life
“And I was looking for you,” said Natásha running out to him. “I
“And I will tell you this,” Prince Andrew interrupted in a tone of
and I won’t allow it to be said!”
and Kámenski the latter was preferred. The general comes to us,
and leaving large sums of money with them for alms, went away to his
and littered with cards. One tormenting impression did not leave him:
and looked at her in such a way that not only could she not bear his
and looked at him closely.
and looks of those who had seen them together. He recalled Anna
“And love of one’s neighbor, and self-sacrifice?” began Pierre.
and majestic voice that was yet so simple! And as if in accord with
“And Mamma pressed her!” said Nicholas reproachfully.
and Martinists, even in Novíkov’s time. For a long while after he had
“And me, kiss me!”
and merry faces. It was Natásha, Sónya, and Pétya, who had come to
and mingling with one another. He could also, by the gleam of bayonets
and more regularly and rapidly, and the action at the Goldbach Stream
and moved along the ranks shouting. The train drivers and orderlies
and musketry ahead of him. The firing grew louder and louder.
and my life, my life,” he thought, “must be risked?”
and Natásha, in the light-blue dresses they had worn at the theater,
And Natásha kissed her brother and ran away.
And Natásha rose and went out of the room on tiptoe, like a ballet
And Nicholas again kissed her hand.
and not value her pure affection and devotion to me?” She went up
“And now, in token of candor, I ask you to reveal to me your chief
And now there’s Dólokhov sitting in the snow with a forced smile and
and of course not as ‘Emperor,’ it seemed to me it should be to
and one booted foot, he advanced, while Willarski held a sword to his
and one could hear their distressing screams and groans, sometimes
and only turned away his eyes when the Austrian chief of staff finished
   And on the throne our Titus shield.
and opened the door for him.
“And our little tea table?”
and out of the bedroom glanced at the princess and turned away. She did
and overtook him. A sergeant of the battalion ran up and took the flag
and particularly amiable smile.
and part were leaving these Pratzen Heights which he intended to attack
and paused facing her at the foot of the sofa on which she was lying.
And Pierre, anxiously trying to remember whether he had done anything
and, pressing Pierre’s hand, he went out.
And Prince Andrew, with others fatally wounded, was left to the care of
And Prince Dolgorúkov rapidly but indistinctly explained Weyrother’s
And Princess Mary tried, but could not manage, to be cordial to her new
and profligate life, though I did not like it and did not want to,”
and promised to write to him and guide him in his new activity.
and proudly around while Bagratión spoke to his son.
And really another French soldier, trailing his musket, ran up to
And really he only ran a few steps alone. One soldier moved and then
and regarded as the key to the position. He saw over the mist that in
and relations had been given to understand that the fate of the young
and remained so for some minutes. Piteous, helpless, animal moans came
Andrew.
Andrew.
Andrew a reliable correspondent to whom he could pour out the bile he
“Andrew, don’t!” said Princess Mary.
Andrew felt that something gave way in his soul and that he was guilty
Andrew in his boyhood, helped Pierre out of his carriage, said that the
Andrew. “I wish you good luck and success, gentlemen!” he added and
Andrew, paying no more heed to the general who ran after him imploring
Andrew read the same mild reproach he had read on the face of his dead
Andrew’s presence. He was ashamed to express his new Masonic views,
Andrew, told how Bonaparte wishing to test Markóv, our ambassador,
Andrew was in and Borís was shown into a large hall probably formerly
Andrew went out with him.
Andrew, whom Borís was expecting, entered the room. Prince Andrew, who
And Rostóv got up and went wandering among the campfires, dreaming of
and running so lightly, frightened Rostóv. He seized his pistol and,
and salt and an icon of Saint Peter and Saint Paul, asking permission,
and salt of hospitality, as, according to his understanding of his
and saw that the lamp stood on a black table on which lay an open book.
and saying something in their gypsy accents. Nicholas understood that it
and, scowling, he gave Nicholas just such a look as he had given Pierre
and secured their release by heavy payments. He did not know that the
and seeing her severe face said: “Well, good-by, Countess,” and
and several other less noteworthy persons.
and she with him, that there was quite a scandal and that that’s why
“and should not justify your confidence and the honor you have done
and shown such unaffected familiarity in intercourse with everybody both
and silver of the men’s epaulets; servants in scarlet liveries moved
and simply, “Mr. Shítov—a man of great merit”—this of the man
and sinfulness?” He paused again. “Who art thou? Thou dreamest that
and social tact,” thought he; “been proud of my house, in which she
and so further increased the fame of these dances. What distinguished
and solemn, and awakening in the men an unusual curiosity. On the day of
and so said the youths and maidens themselves as they danced till they
and so sparkling their eyes. Sometimes the best of the pupils, of whom
“And so they are writing from Potsdam already?” he said, repeating
and sought the acquaintance of only those above him in position and
“And so you had to go through that too!”
“And so you’ve had him educated abroad, Prince Vasíli, haven’t
and still fewer men would be so well able and willing to make up out of
and still the same and in the same place. No, it can’t be! Surely it
and stood still in the dim light beneath the curtain as if not wishing
and stooped glass in hand over the infant.
and stopped near him.
And strange to say Nicholas felt that he could not help taking up a
and strength. He was continually traveling through the three provinces
and suddenly began to cry.
And suddenly the whole world centered for him on anticipation of the
and swallowed the cold snow, his lips quivered but his eyes, still
and, taking Natásha’s hand, kissed it.
and tears, till at last somebody else was asked to read it.”
and tear whatever came to his hand. “Why did I tell her that ‘Je
and that daredevil after her!” said Anna Mikháylovna, wishing to show
and that her husband was a cross laid upon her by God. Prince Vasíli
and that if a letter reached the Grand Duke in command of the Guards
And that’s how it is with me. À demain, mon cher.” *
and that the richest peasants (who formed the deputation) had begun
and the allowance to the three princesses; about 15,000 was given in
and the boyish face Rostóv, breathless with excitement and hope, was
and the burning of an arm with a ruler as a proof of love did not seem
and the cannon, under the horses’ hoofs and between the wagon wheels,
and the consequent impossibility of a speedy emancipation.
And the count turned to the cook, who, with a shrewd and respectful
and the Crimean estate, in order to make it possible: all of which
and the difficult names of villages. Weyrother complied and Dohktúrov
and the disgrace of having lost two guns and yet remaining alive present
and the distinguished dignitary who bore the title of “Collector
And the feeling of energy with which the troops had started began to
and the jingle of their weapons and saw their horses, their figures, and
and then calmly and seriously sat back in his chair. Anna Pávlovna
and then he suddenly stopped and performed some new and unexpected
And then to call him out, reckoning on Fédya not fighting because he
And the old cavalry captain, Kírsten, shouted enthusiastically and no
and the old countess were especially disturbed, and to a lesser degree
“And the other one is not here. They’ve been telling tales,” he
and the others who did not approve of the plan of attack, were
and the pistols loaded, Nesvítski went up to Pierre.
and the reading of the letter began. After a brief description of
And there in the coffin was the same face, though with closed eyes.
and there is nothing to thank me for. No one has ever complained yet of
“And there’s nothing for you to say. I shall speak to him myself,”
and there too sat the members of the family, and Pierre and Hélène,
and the rewards sent to the army are innumerable. Though he is a
and the same look. In the middle of a dull and halting conversation,
and the second aim, that of purifying and regenerating himself, did not
And the talkative Dolgorúkov, turning now to Borís, now to Prince
and the traveler became absorbed in it. Pierre looked at him. All at
and the two Emperors were living with their suites, households, and
And the two friends told each other of their doings, the one of his
and the whole secret lies in the terrible truth that she is a depraved
And they disappeared into the darkness with their load.
and three pairs of gloves, and then the Grand Master addressed him. He
and took hold of the commander’s stirrup, almost leaning against him.
and ‘To Siberia!’” said Berg with a sagacious smile. “I knew I
and triumph.
and two or three friends—you among them—and as for the rest I only
and unreasonable than a little child, who, playing with the parts of a
and virtue, and thereby try with all our might to combat the evil which
and virtue than mere words. This chamber with what you see therein
and voices. This class of guests and members sat in certain habitual
and was a stranger there. In his person, honor was shown to a simple
and was going to tuck up the other trouser leg to save this stranger the
and watched his opponent’s face, evidently thinking about the game as
and way of life.
and well informed foregathered when the news began to arrive in
and went out. Natásha had put on one spurred boot and was just getting
and, whatever may happen to him or to me, shall never cease to love him
“And what is she so pleased about?” thought Nicholas, looking at his
and what to expect after it beyond the grave! How happy and calm I
and wheels began to revolve faster and faster, levers and cogwheels to
and where to shoot,” he said with an unnaturally gentle smile.
“And who has told you what is bad for another man?” he asked.
and whom Borís addressed turned round crossly and told him Bolkónski
and who was called Tit. He was saying, “Tit, I say, Tit!”
“And why didn’t you simply come straight to me as to a friend? I
“And why do you serve?”
and with a bow to them both he went out.
And with a furtive glance at his son’s face, the count went out of the
and with a hooked nose. Then came two more, and many more running
and with baritone notes in his voice, new to Borís, pointing to his own
and with his hand at the salute rode up to the general.
and without awaiting a reply, Prince Andrew rose and left the table.
and wrote a few words on a large sheet of paper folded in four).
and yet be happy....”
“And you?” he asked Dólokhov, but as soon as he had asked the
and young people are rarely capable of it. His hearers expected a story
“And you’re still the same diplomatist! But that’s not the
“And you won’t feel ashamed to write to him?”
a need to escape from it by some strange, and usually cruel, action.
an excruciating pain in his arm, for which he could find no satisfactory
an exemplary officer of twenty-two years’ service, who had never been
an explanation, but meeting the latter’s impressive but meaningless
an expression of perplexity, turned round to Milorádovich as if seeking
an eye on me! Very well then! Get along with you!’ So he writes the
angered the countess when it was not properly cleaned, turned as loosely
anger he did not condescend to notice, and said: “I think you were
angling, while his grandson, with shirt sleeves rolled up, handled the
angrily at him. Bondarchúk’s horse swerved and galloped past.
angry—but I know you will not marry her. I know, heaven knows how, but
An hour and a half later most of the players were but little interested
An hour later, Tíkhon came to call Princess Mary to the old prince;
an hour’s delay they at last moved on, descending the hill. The fog
“A nice little hot torch for the infantry! Good luck to you, fellow
an illegitimate son, and petted and extolled when he was the best
animal. Count Ilyá Rostóv, laughing and repeating the words, “Make
animal went when excited. Bending his foaming muzzle to his chest, his
animation of the past or the future. It was as if Prince Andrew would
an immediate answer. Prince Vasíli had brought his son with the evident
an indescribable charm of sorrow and self-forgetfulness that her father
Anna Mikháylovna, in a few words, told her the contents of the letter,
Anna Mikháylovna opened the door. Her face wore the proud expression
Anna Mikháylovna sat down beside him, with her own handkerchief wiped
Anna Mikháylovna shook her head.
Anna Mikháylovna sighed deeply.
Anna Mikháylovna, though her circumstances had improved, was still
Anna Mikháylovna turned up her eyes, and profound sadness was depicted
Anna Mikháylovna, who always knew everything that passed in the house,
    * Anna Pávlovna.
Anna Pávlovna continued to give on free evenings the same kind of
Anna Pávlovna frowned. Mortemart, Hippolyte’s friend, addressed him
Anna Pávlovna gave him her shriveled hand to kiss and introduced him to
Anna Pávlovna’s “At Home” was like the former one, only the
Anna Pávlovna’s two years before. There were also present a very
announce him, but, changing his mind, came back and stooped to kiss the
annoyance. “Good luck to you!”
an oath of fidelity to the laws of the Order. The candles were then
an opportunity to express his doubts.
another.”
another and soon the whole battalion ran forward shouting “Hurrah!”
another candle. Still lower, beyond the turn of the staircase, one
another, dying, stepping over the dying and killing one another, only to
Another five days passed, and then the young Prince Nicholas Andréevich
Another group was at the tea table. Pierre wished to join the former,
another, more important, subordination, which made this tight-laced,
another of the precepts—that of reforming the human race—and had
Another, the red, stout Nesvítski, lay on a bed with his arms under his
another, they all gave, and transmitted, orders as to how to proceed,
another two minutes and it is certain death,” thought each one.
answer. At last he moved up to Pierre and, taking the kerchief that lay
answered him either by a brief but appropriate remark—showing that it
answered the general.
answer that voice and went on dreaming of his triumphs. The dispositions
Antónov.”
an unexpected and tenderly paternal way.
any moment.)
any moment the Emperor may see them.... But no, these must be only a
anyone flogged or sent to Siberia—and still less for your serfs. If
anyone in particular, began to say how difficult it was to carry out
any the worse off. In Siberia they lead the same animal life, and the
anything, Dólokhov, looking straight in his face, said slowly and
anything, except only for permission, after the blow she had received,
anything. If it be God’s will to prove thee in the duties of marriage,
anything like it. She believed it could be, but did not understand it.
anything, when suddenly the well-known whispering of Mademoiselle
any women—countesses or cooks—who were not venal. I have not yet met
apart from myself.”
a partner, and the old men began smilingly to talk about Poland and the
apologizing for the state of his gun.
apparently immersed in his own thoughts.
apparently suffering more than the dying soldier, and he rode away.
appeared.
appeared. He would carry her away and then sa pauvre mère would appear
appeared to him in a dream: his mother and her large white hand,
appreciate at a glance her superiority to the plain, badly dressed,
approached first, experienced the same feeling as every other man in
approached Kutúzov. Of Kutúzov’s suite only four remained. They were
approaching. And at that moment, though the day was still, a light gust
approaching departure did not prevent his amusing himself, but rather
aprons like the Rhetor’s and holding swords in their hands pointed at
apron, such as the others wore, was put on him: he was given a trowel
apron, which symbolized strength and purity; then of the unexplained
a rage) and called for the company commander.
Archduke, inspected the allied army of eighty thousand men.
architect not to go to the prince with his report.
architect’s attention to the sound of the prince’s footsteps.
are clever, you are well educated. And what have you done with all these
are many stories of his getting to know an officer in just such a chance
are now two Russians, Milorádovich, and Dokhtúrov, and there would be
a reproach to everyone. Now tell me, Count, was it right, was it
are taken to the field marshal’s room, for he likes to do everything
are there,” said the officer, pointing to the village of Hosjeradek,
are they doing? What are they doing?” he murmured to himself, still
are very pale!” said Princess Mary in alarm, running with her soft,
are within sight of the enemy and he wishes to profit by the opportunity
are you dumb?’ he shouted. Still I remained silent. And what do you
“Are you mad? You have twice been ordered to retreat, and you...”
are young and I am old. I should like to help you as far as lies in my
   A Rhipheus at home, a Caesar in the field!
arithmetic, when rising from his chair he would walk away from her,
Arkhárovs; they have a party.”
arms and the hope of future triumph. And he was not the only man to
arm’s length, apparently afraid of shooting himself with it. His left
arms on the table and began to read. After reading a few lines, he
army, and even Napoleon himself with his staff, were not on the far side
army, and in the night from the nineteenth to the twentieth, the whole
army’s campfires dimly glowing in the fog, could be seen behind him;
army. You have brought your army corps to Pultúsk, routed: here it is
(“Arnauts” was the Tsarévich’s favorite expression when he was in
around him. An infantryman came to the fire, squatted on his heels, held
around them cannon balls were flying, of which he was aware not so
aroused him. He started and opened his eyes.
arrangement of the festival in honor of Bagratión, for few men knew
arrangements of the house, he interrupted himself:
arrangements to the minutest detail remain the same.”
arranging a dinner in honor of Prince Bagratión at the English Club.
arrival, thought in another way. Of course, she, a handsome young woman
artillery company, a head and shoulders taller and twice as broad
artilleryman to Prince Andrew. “Not like your honor!”
artilleryman, wiping away the blood with his coat sleeve, as if
artillerymen, some of whom were fighting, while others, having abandoned
artillerymen, Túshin, and the cadet exchanged silent glances as they
A rustle of starched petticoats and the whispering and laughter of
as a child, there was no longer in her singing that comical, childish,
as a friend that frees the soul grown weary in the labors of virtue
As always happens when women lead lonely lives for any length of time
as a mark of their gratitude for the benefits he had conferred on them,
as a petitioner on behalf of this young man. You see...” but
as a true hussar in this battle, had been wasted. Their squadron
as author of the military plan, argued that Bonaparte might easily
as a veranda.
as Borís. “Count! I am wounded in my right hand” (and he showed his
as elsewhere, he was surrounded by an atmosphere of subservience to
a servant. From there they passed into another room. A man in strange
a seventy-pound weight were tied to it. He could run no more. The
as ever. A solitary tallow candle burned in the anteroom.
as far as Moscow and to stay with him there. Meeting a comrade at
ashamed; he felt that he was occupying someone else’s place here
ashamed of himself, he said, as if merely asking his father to let him
as he expected he was appointed an adjutant to the governor general of
as he felt himself to be at that moment. He was conscious that here
a shell burst in the midst of that dense throng, killing some and
as his own. What also conduced to Bagratión’s being selected as
a short pause, “but everyone lives in his own way. You lived for
As I do not intend to be at your house again for reasons you know
as if astonished at the word. “Well, you see, I’m building. I mean
as if continuing a conversation the subject of which had often been
as if he felt a little confused before his son. “Now, if you would
as if she had to give some final necessary instructions.
as if stirred to his heart’s core and himself regretting and laughing
as impracticable, he arranged for the erection of large
as I remember Nikólenka. Him—I just shut my eyes and remember,
As is usually the case with people meeting after a prolonged separation,
asked and answered at the same instant. He was alone in the middle of a
asked him to tell the Emperor. What do you think he replied? ‘But, my
asked Natásha, so seriously and excitedly that it was evident that what
asked one of the ladies.
asked Rostóv, with a contemptuous smile.
asked to give up all he possessed.
asked to play on the clavichord. Anatole, laughing and in high spirits,
asked to see the portrait of the aunt’s husband on the box lid.
asked Weyrother several times to repeat words he had not clearly heard
ask himself. It was as if the thread of the chief screw which held his
“Ask him to wait,” and the sound was heard of a chair being pushed
asking.” But dying was also dreadful.
ask you to put the money on your cards,” replied Dólokhov. “Don’t
asleep, nor even remain in one place, but had to jump up and pace the
a slightly contemptuous smile, he said: “Yes, there are many stories
a slipper for his left foot. With a childlike smile of embarrassment,
as long as I live.”
as many persons are to me—father, sister, wife—those dearest to
“As may happen,” said Rostóv.
a smile he could not repress as he recalled his reception at Brünn.
as much self-confidence as if he were addressing school children—that
As often happens after long sleeplessness and long anxiety, he was
A soldier on the march is hemmed in and borne along by his regiment as
a soldier’s cross, equally shabby cadet’s riding breeches lined with
A space like a street was left between each two lines of troops. The
“A splendid reply!” said Napoleon. “Young man, you will go far!”
“A splendid soldier, splendid! ‘What am I attached to!’ Ha, ha,
as possible to conceal his own part in the improvements that had been
as reported by the division commanders, Ostermann and Sedmorétzki, and
as she sat in her room. But owing to the superstition that the fewer
As she was crossing the anteroom she saw through the window a carriage
assigned to the commander of the Pávlograd regiment in which Rostóv
as something generally known. But it was the first time he had heard
As soon as Nicholas entered, he was enfolded in that poetic atmosphere
As soon as the singing was over, another and another toast was proposed
assumed a dignified expression, which with characteristic tact she had
assured himself from the way Rostóv looked at it that his coat had been
“A staff officer was here a minute ago, but skipped off,” said an
a star-shaped light. At one side of the table was a small carpet with
as the “angel incarnate.”
“As the enemy’s left wing rests on wooded hills and his right
as the guest of honor, to enter first. Bagratión was embarrassed, not
as their officer—all looked at their commander like children in an
“As there’s no one to fall in love with on campaign, he’s fallen
as they enjoyed their Rhine wine, sauté, and ices, and however they
as they have heard it described by others, and as sounds well, but not
as they watched their young people executing their newly learned steps,
As this Ápsheron battalion marched by, the red-faced Milorádovich,
a storm at the square, cut his way in, slashed right and left, how his
a story, heard from her aunt but finished in her own way, which she
“As to your business,” Prince Andrew continued, addressing Borís,
A strange feeling of exasperation and yet of respect for this man’s
a stuffy room, so a whiff of youthfulness, energy, and confidence of
a suffering child and to wring her little hands even with some
as well as that the French were outflanking our left. The general
as were all the words he spoke that day, and Count Ilyá looked joyfully
As when a window is opened a whiff of fresh air from the fields enters
asylums, and schools were to be established on all the estates. Some of
as you and Princess Mary call it, are the chief source of all error and
as you may, always remain the same backs and foreheads.”
as young Bezúkhov! Yes, I pity him from my heart, and shall try to give
as young people often do. “No, I am too happy now to spoil my
“As you please... really... I think so... but as you please,” said
“As you see,” he said.
at a command, everyone began to run.
at a full gallop so that he outstripped the others. Ahead, the enemy was
at all as I ran,” thought Prince Andrew—“not as we ran, shouting
at all as it really was. Rostóv was a truthful young man and would on
at any rate his light-blue eyes gazed for about two seconds into
at a soldier who lay prone, with blood on his uncovered head. The
at Bagratión over each other’s shoulders, as if he were some rare
at balls, amiably smiling in the society of the most brilliant women,
At dawn on the sixteenth of November, Denísov’s squadron, in
At daybreak on the seventeenth, a French officer who had come with
At dinner Anna Mikháylovna talked the whole time about the war news
At dinner, conversation turned on Pierre’s marriage.
at Dólokhov and his eyes dropped, the something terrible and monstrous
At eight o’clock Kutúzov rode to Pratzen at the head of the fourth
a terrible thing! Quelle terrible chose que la guerre!”
At first he heard the sound of indifferent voices, then Anna
at first impossible to enter the drawing room door for the crowd of
at first irregularly at varying intervals—trata...tat—and then more
At first Prince Andrew read with his eyes only, but after a while,
At five in the morning it was still quite dark. The troops of the
at her reproachfully. “And who is it she takes after?” thought the
at her timidly over his spectacles, and like a hare surrounded by hounds
at him. After this volley the regimental commander clutched at his leg;
a third, Count Arakchéev, if his nerves were not too weak.”
at his hesitation and, trying to arouse his former devotional feeling,
at his own sensibility, when Princess Mary entered. He hurriedly took a
at his partner with a merry and triumphant air, suddenly stamped with
at home again. He felt that he had grown up and matured very much. His
At home, they had not yet gone to bed. The young people, after returning
at intervals, and the bullets passed somewhere in the fog singing in
at irregular intervals as before, followed by one or two cannon shots,
at Kutúzov’s.
At last seizing a soldier by his collar he forced him to answer.
“At least, change your coiffure,” said the little princess.
at Markóv, probably expecting Markóv to pick it up for him, and how
atmosphere characteristic of homes where there are very young and very
atmosphere made itself so strongly felt in the Rostóvs’ house as at
atmosphere of an army, announcing the approach of something decisive
at one another.
a toy, seeing the effect these prearranged receptions had on Pierre,
at Prince Andrew with cool intensity, walking straight toward him and
at Schön Grabern, what shall we not do now when he is at the front? We
At six in the evening, Kutúzov went to the Emperor’s headquarters
attacked the men collecting wood in the copse. It was no longer possible
attack instead of being attacked, and so render the whole of this
attack our headquarters, and the commander in chief has to ask for a
attacks. Both generals are angry, and the result is a challenge on
attacks the Prussians. The Prussians are our faithful allies who have
attained.
attain that knowledge and are still infinitely far from our aim; but
attend to the voice of their commander, or would they, disregarding him,
attention.
attention. Dohktúrov, a little man, sat opposite Weyrother, with
attention. He looked now at the Pratzen Heights, now at the sun floating
attention. Napoleon apparently remembered seeing him on the battlefield
attention of all to Borís’ narrative was shown by Hélène. She asked
attention to something within her that is only seen in pregnant women,
attention to the verses.
attentively to what Prince Vasíli said, but kept glancing at Princess
At that moment, as the Horse Guards, having passed him, disappeared in
At that moment Borís clearly realized what he had before surmised, that
at that moment made itself felt.
At that moment the door opened.
At that moment, with noiseless footsteps and with the businesslike,
At that time in the Rostóvs’ house there prevailed an amorous
at the Arkhárovs’ ball, talked about the war with Field Marshal
at the beautiful Hélène with her radiant face and at the red, broad,
At the beginning of March, old Count Ilyá Rostóv was very busy
at the bottom of the sleigh beside Rostóv, who grew more and more
at the club dinner.
at the council—the coming battle and the victory that would certainly
at the door,” and Natásha ran across the drawing room to the dancing
at the doors, but after all he did at last enter first. He walked shyly
at the faces of his suite, young and animated as his own. Czartorýski,
At the front an altercation occurred between an Austrian guide and a
at the head of a movement that had already become unrestrainable. He was
at the least firing. The Emperor’s gratitude was announced to the
at them.
at them and hack them to pieces, their proximity now seemed so awful
at the map, but at Prince Andrew’s face.
At the moment the door opened and the stranger came in, Pierre felt a
At the Olmütz review he had seemed more majestic; here he seemed
at the period of youth when there seems so much to do that there is no
at the sound and then, smiling at his own sensations, stood still. The
At the very instant he did this and uttered those words, Pierre felt
at the world is so opposed to yours that we shall not understand one
attire appeared at the door. Willarski, stepping toward him, said
attitude toward him that had taken place in society.
Augesd.
“Auntie, darling, do tell me what it is!”
Austerlitz, Borís was unable to see either Prince Andrew or Dolgorúkov
Austrian and Russian troops, both those freshly arrived from Russia and
Austrian army of Ulm. They are the same battalions you broke at
Austrian Council of War at which Suvórov crowed like a cock in reply to
Austrian general, continuing to read, frowned angrily and jerked his
Austrians, and all at once discovered from the cannon balls discharged
Austrian, to report and explain, and to his headquarters where he had
Austria,” said Mortemart. “The Emperor of Austria can never have
authorities to secure advantageous means of communication for herself
authority in his voice. “Who invented Him, if He did not exist? Whence
a very bad way of deciding whether a battle was won or lost. Those who
a very long time. “If anyone finds this silence inconvenient, let him
a victory over Bonaparte, just when I’m not serving. Yes, yes, he’s
a visit. “I am starting on a journey of inspection, and of course I
“A visitor,” answered Antón.
avoided looking at the young couple, and heedless and unobservant as
avoided the blow. “Thought... Blackguards...” shouted the prince
avoid General Buxhöwden who by right of seniority should be our chief.
avoiding gardens and enclosures, going over new and unknown ground, and
avoid seeing all these suffering men, and he felt afraid—afraid not
awaited their fate. The firing died down and soldiers, talking eagerly,
aware of his existence. At the quarters of the commander in chief,
aware that in front, behind, and on all sides, other Russian columns
away.
away and he had just managed to catch her, “didn’t he tell you how
away? But where to? It’s one—let them sing!”
away from her. “Destroying the army, destroying the men! And why? Go,
away her tears on her sister-in-law’s knee.
away. Involuntarily recalling his wife’s past and her relations with
A week later Pierre gave his wife full power to control all his estates
A week later, Pierre, having taken leave of his new friends, the Masons,
a white horse followed by his suite, and said something in passing:
awkward and uncomfortable, and her burden oppressed her now more than
awkward to attract everyone’s attention and to be considered a
a word to the questions addressed to him. But on entering Moscow he
a worthy dwelling place of the Great God,” he added, and closed his
a wrathful wrinkle on her rather prominent marble brow. With her
a yawn. “Plenty of time,” he repeated.
back.
back, “give me your hand.” She took her sister-in-law’s hand and
back to the house.
backwards and forwards and was at last brought to the doors of the
“Bad! Bad!” exclaimed Pierre. “We all know what is bad for
bad. But Anatole was dumb, swung his foot, and smilingly examined the
“Bad! But it’s not that, my friend—” said Dólokhov with a
bad for another traveler, and for himself it’s unavoidable, because
badly through his spectacles, but that his wife’s connection with
“Bad news! He’s not among the prisoners nor among the killed!
Bagratión and Dolgorúkov ride past with their adjutants. All the fear
Bagratión appeared in the doorway of the anteroom without hat or sword,
Bagratión cast his large, expressionless, sleepy eyes round his suite,
Bagratión gave no further orders and silently continued to walk on in
Bagratión’s detachment was reunited to Kutúzov’s army.
Bagratión stopped and, before replying, tried to see Rostóv’s face
Bagratión’s troops, which had not yet advanced into action but were
Bagratión. “Wait till tomorrow morning, we’ll find out everything
bags into the carts, got their muskets ready, and formed rank. The
bald head, over which she again looked at the letter and the portrait,
Bald Hills. Prince Andrew, glancing at Pierre, broke the silence now and
ball, flying close to him, caused him to duck and bend over his horse.
ballroom.
balls! I can’t tell you. And the Tsarévich was very gracious to all
ball was even happier. They were both dressed in white muslin with pink
bandage was again removed and more than ten voices said together: “Sic
band, came up and in angry tones asked the artillerymen for water.
bandy-legged domestic serf in a peaked cap and sheepskin coat.
bank, hesitating to step onto the ice. The general on horseback at the
bare chest. He was conducted from that room along passages that turned
baritone.
barrier except the barrier of his own will.
bathhouse, a lodge, and a large brick house with semicircular façade
battalion and regimental commanders mounted, crossed themselves, gave
battalions and artillery pass by and go forward and then Generals
battalion to disperse them. During one of these attacks they carried off
battalion would follow him.
batteries ranged on the slopes of the Pratzen Heights, directed at our
battery and the heroic endurance of Captain Túshin and his company,”
battery when two balls, and then four more, fell among our guns, one
battle.
battle, a list of whom has been sent me under flag of truce.”
battle, and by the sight of the gallant Ápsherons, his comrades in
battle and, in spite of the remonstrances of his courtiers, at twelve
battle and were engaged in peaceful occupations, the cavalry feeding the
battlefield.”
battle is won by him alone. Kutúzov is removed and he is appointed...
battle the soldiers excitedly try to get beyond the interests of their
beams of mild and majestic light around, and already he felt himself
be anyone’s lackey, but I who have nothing but my brains have to
bears!...”
bear the whole burden on his shoulders. Fancy what he had to go through!
be at stake. But this one is too light, it’s not becoming!”
beautiful eyes grew dim, red blotches came on her face, and it took
beautiful eyes. Last night a proposition was made me on your account
beautiful Hélène, whose eyes several times met those of the handsome
beautiful, radiant eyes. It was as if joy—a supreme joy apart from the
beauty as she glided away. “And how she carries herself! For so young
be better dressed than others, and would rather deprive himself of many
be brought here well wrapped up in felt. I must have two hundred pots
be carried back with it oneself. Bolkónski only tried not to lose
be carried out, was forgotten. Now, entering into Weyrother’s plan,
because he could not. In the middle of a figure he beckoned to Rostóv
because it concerned not himself but another, his daughter, whom he
“Because when once a man starts on military service, he should try to
become a habit. Schemes and devices for which he never rightly accounted
become calmer since I began to live only for myself.”
become completely changed, and had quite left behind his former habits
become cruel and harsh, are conscious of it, but cannot restrain
become habitual to him and, his handsome head held high, entered his
becomes a man who values his honor, perhaps too hastily, but we won’t
become thoroughly conversant with that unwritten code with which he had
be done; he felt that everybody, including his mother and sisters, was
Bedouin twice and successfully put him to the showy trot in which the
be dozing. His head sank forward and then he roused himself.
been able to free himself but that Prince Vasíli (who had rarely before
been bewildered. At that time, the Russians were so used to victories
been brought up in the most aristocratic circles.
been engrossed by the same thoughts ever since the day he returned from
been looking at.
been minutely described. Princess Mary was sitting alone in her room,
been ready, but they still delayed and all were silent.
been recommended to Prince Andrew he had already risen above the general
been refused. He asked in a hesitating, piteous voice.
been so pleased at Olmütz and according to which an ensign might rank
been taken by the French as a trophy.)
been thinking about you.”
been trying first one remedy and then another. Worn out by sleeplessness
Been under fire already?” asked Borís.
been unjust to the Austrians and especially to Weyrother. What
been vicious only because he had somehow forgotten how good it is to
befallen his son.
before action which he had experienced as previously, all the inner
before?” and again he told himself that it was impossible, that there
before and the path to the hothouse, along which the prince was in the
before and was less frequently at home.
before coming to the dinner he had had his hair and whiskers trimmed,
Before dawn he had slept for a few hours, and refreshed, vigorous, and
Before dinner, Princess Mary and Mademoiselle Bourienne, who knew
Before five in the evening the battle had been lost at all points. More
before going down she went into the room where the icons hung and, her
before. Having taken a kerchief from the cupboard, Willarski bound
Before he reached him, Rostóv, who was a splendid horseman, spurred
before him but the motionless earth and the stubble around him. There
Before him, on the right, Rostóv saw the front lines of his hussars and
before it was halted facing the enemy. Again, as at the Enns bridge,
before, or am I mistaken now? No, she is not stupid, she is an excellent
before Prince Andrew could finish, an aide-de-camp came in to summon
before Rostóv had time to make out what the black thing was that had
before the battle, the figure of the insignificant little Napoleon, and
before the Jews.”
before the master arrived. Everywhere preparations were made not for
before the usual term and has proposed to me to be your sponsor. I
began.
began for the first, second, and third columns, which had gone down into
began popping corks and filling the champagne glasses. After the fish,
began reading. The old prince, now and then using abbreviations, wrote
began speaking clearly and definitely. Reasons were found for the
began. “They’ll be announcing that the gentlemen are in the drawing
began to be said. These reasons were the treachery of the Austrians, a
began to devise and carry out a plan of how Princess Mary should be
begin,” he whispered, and taking up his glass, he rose. All were
beginning of the action.) “I think I sent you?” he added, turning to
beginning to feel for the pretty and provocative Mademoiselle Bourienne
begin the engagement.
begin, when did it all come about?” And here he was sitting by her
begun to think of the last station and was still pondering on the same
behavior to women Anatole had a manner which particularly inspires in
behind. And now here we stand hungry.”
behind him Bondarchúk, an hussar he knew, jolted against him and looked
behind moved infantry. The commander in chief was standing at the end of
behind. One of them said something strange, not in Russian. In among the
behind the Emperor. The Ápsheron men, excited by the Tsar’s presence,
behind them, another fell in front and splashed Dólokhov with blood.
being (and which struck Pierre especially by contrast with his own
being carried by. She looked out. The men servants were carrying the
being imposed on him which he could not fulfill, and pleased him as an
being moved, and the probing of his wound at the dressing station.
being rose in her imagination, and carried her into a totally different
being said, thought, and felt that day by its rider.
being too much loved; and besides, you are free, you could throw it
believed he would be reborn to a new life.
believe everything you’re told. You were told...” Hélène laughed,
“Believe me,” said Prince Dolgorúkov, addressing Bagratión, “it
believes, in the speaker’s tone of conviction and earnestness, or
Bells rang, the stewards rushed forward, and—like rye shaken together
below.
Below, where the fight was beginning, there was still thick fog; on the
Bending forward in his armchair he said: “Le Roi de Prusse!” and
bending his forehead to hers just touched it, and pressed her hand so
Beneath his smile Rostóv saw in him the mood he had shown at the club
be out of your way! Do go somewhere, anywhere... to the devil!” he
be parted from her) would be gained, so pacifying himself with this
“Be quiet, backbiter!” said Dolgorúkov. “It is not true; there
be ready to fulfill His will.” With this consoling thought (but
Berg put on the cleanest of coats, without a spot or speck of dust,
Berg took the opportunity to ask, with great politeness, whether, as was
Berg was mentioned, by those who did not know him, as having, when
be shaken in her determination.
beside Hélène. “This happiness is not for you,” some inner voice
beside him. “That must be the enemy’s camp!”
“Besides how can I ask the Emperor for his instructions for the right
Besides this refined selection of society Anna Pávlovna’s receptions
beside the old prince.
best of officers could do in his position, he was in a state akin to
be talked over at length. At last the conversation gradually settled on
be they what they might.
be thus boldly, provocatively happy.” “And what nonsense all this is
betraying her sympathy for the “daredevil,” as she called Dólokhov.
better not look,” he thought, but having reached the bushes he glanced
between himself and that lofty infinite sky with the clouds flying over
between them gleamed blue infinity. He did not turn his head and did not
be very glad to do all in my power both for you and for this dear young
be virtuous. Not a trace of his former doubts remained in his soul. He
bewildered look and passed by without a word. A woman rushed out and
be worthy of her. And that is what we shall see.”
beyond ceremonies and meaningless prayers and are now instructed in
Bilíbin, “as you know, my dear prince, I never leave headquarters. I
Bilíbin’s letter which was written in French. He read without
Bilíbin was now at army headquarters in a diplomatic capacity, and
Bilíbin), what he had read began to interest him more and more. When he
black-agate eyes at the frightened and happy Natásha.
black figures of hussars, but in the distance was still the same misty
blame. The troops meanwhile stood growing listless and dispirited. After
bleed him and patch him up. He will drag about as a cripple, a burden to
bleeding hand with a handkerchief tied round it) “and I remained at
blindfolded) questioned him as to who he was, when and where he was
blinked, went red, got up and sat down again, struggling with himself
blissful face “like a vewy devil,” as Denísov expressed it.
blood on it. “Ah, here are people coming,” he thought joyfully,
blood. On seeing this, Pierre moved forward with his breast toward the
blood rush to his heart and had again to get up and move about and break
Blood was gushing from its leg as from a spring. Among the limbers lay
blush.
blushing.
blushing—“of asking the commander in chief. He has had a letter from
body. Drowsiness was irresistibly mastering him, but he kept awake by
Bogdánovna.
Bogdánovna advised Prince Andrew to leave the room.
Boguchárovo lay in a flat uninteresting part of the country among
bold forehead that bent over her hand and answered his question by
boldly, “if you wish to refuse one who is not only a brilliant and
“Bolkónski!” he whispered, his voice trembling from a consciousness
Bolkónski in order to arrange a match for him with the daughter of that
Bolkónski noticed the hussar’s state of mind, and it amused him. With
Bolkónski recognized Prince Repnín whom he had met in Petersburg
Bolkónski referred to Anatole as a “pupil”) “for the sake of my
Bolkónski took the opportunity to go in to get some details of the
Bolkónski, who spoke with suppressed agitation.
Bolkónski, wishing to profit by his friendliness and obtain for himself
Bonaparte, and how badly the latter would fare now, especially if the
Bonaparte, having come up at a gallop, stopped his horse.
Bonaparte like? How did he impress you?”
Bonaparte, ‘that Your Majesty should be received and treated in my
Bonaparte, there is a difference,” remarked Bolkónski.
Bonaparte was anathematized and in Moscow nothing but the coming war
BOOK FIVE: 1806 - 07
BOOK FOUR: 1806
book had been sent him by someone unknown. One thing he continually
BOOK THREE: 1805
boots between the dining and drawing rooms, hastily greeting the
Borís.
Borís and Borís was to forward them to Nicholas. The letters were from
Borís, grown more manly and looking fresh, rosy and self-possessed,
Borís inquired what news there might be on the staff, and what, without
Borís listened attentively to each of the speakers, awaiting his turn,
Borís made a grimace.
Borís promised to fulfill her wish and was about to begin a
Borís received no clear explanation of why it had been necessary for
Borís rose to meet Rostóv, but in doing so did not omit to steady and
Borís smiled, as if he understood what Prince Andrew was alluding to
Borís smiled circumspectly, so that it might be taken as ironical
Borís to tell them about his journey to Glogau and in what state he
Borís was excited by the thought of being so close to the higher powers
Borís with the happy smile seen on the faces of young men who have been
born, and so on. Then he was again led somewhere still blindfolded,
bosom as it rose and fell.
both knew, an expression thoughtful and sad. This expression in Princess
bottles of wine with him and, despite the jolting ruts across the
Bourienne aroused her. She raised her eyes, and two steps away saw
Bourienne flushed, and gave the princess a frightened look.
Bourienne had long been waiting for a Russian prince who, able to
Bourienne—I shall have to get rid of her. And how is it she has not
Bourienne. Princess Mary felt his look with a painfully joyous emotion.
Bourienne’s head at the very time she was talking to Anatole about
Bourienne, unfolding her white napkin with her rosy fingers. “His
Bourienne was often touched to tears as in imagination she told this
Bourienne. When she entered with her heavy step, treading on her heels,
Bourienne who had not yet seen her.
Bourienne with a radiant face that said: “I know nothing, I am the
Bourienne, with her ribbon and pretty face, and her unusually animated
bowed head.
boy... the countess... promoted to be an officer... thank God... How
braggart and his son, no doubt, is a fine specimen,” he grumbled to
brain—that’s all that’s left me!” And at the same time he said
brandishing the slab.
brave?”
breast with the other hand and to repeat after someone who read aloud
breath and beating heart he moved toward the Rhetor (by which name the
breathing, her movements, her beauty. Then it would suddenly seem to him
breeches and arm.
brick buildings, built to plan, were being built by serfs whose manorial
bright and happy eyes at her sister-in-law.
brightening up.
brighter and more energetic. He was slightly flushed after galloping two
bright home, his fluffy fur coat, his quickly gliding sleigh, his
bright. Sónya ran away, but Natásha, taking her brother’s arm, led
bright, sparkling blue eyes into his antagonist’s face. His mouth wore
   Bring glory then to Alexander’s reign
bring himself to part from his daughter and give her to a husband. The
bring him to thee, could take him by the hand and show him to thee. But
broken leg, that lay screaming piteously beside the harnessed horses.
broken off, the porch, and the post by the side of the pavement. He
broke up two squares, your excellency.”
brother, and that Anna Mikháylovna was preparing them for it. Bold as
brother Hippolyte told me about your goings on. Oh!” and she shook her
Brotherhood has made application for you to be received into our Order
brotherhood of man,” he kept saying to himself, associating these
“brother-instructor” as he called the Grand Master.
brother Rhetor, and awaited his further commands.
brothers, and burned with impatience to set to work with them.
brothers more worthy than he would test him and that Pierre had only to
brother who prepared a seeker for entrance into the Brotherhood was
brought from Italy, representing an angel with outspread wings ready to
brought his snuffbox to rest and, without looking at Weyrother or at
brought into Wischau from our outposts. This officer was Savary. The
buildings—schools, hospitals, and asylums—on all the estates
built in order to have a nook of one’s own in which to be quiet. And
built lodge close to the pond. Antón, a man who had looked after Prince
bullets. They reached the front, several bullets sped over them, and
bully,” thought Pierre, “to kill a man means nothing to him. It must
bursts of song and music and the inconsequent but friendly prattle of
business!”
bustlingly searching for something.
But although Alpátych, frightened at his own temerity in avoiding the
“But am I not too cold with him?” thought the princess. “I try
but Anna Pávlovna—who was in the excited condition of a commander on
but a roll of volleys of musketry from the slopes of the hill before
But as a youth in love trembles, is unnerved, and dares not utter the
But, as he had to say something, he began by asking her whether she was
but as sorrow was manifest in every smile, the sound of every word, and
but attacked and captured by a superior enemy force as a result of one
but at that moment the thought occurred to her that her fate would be
But at the moment when he imagined himself calmed by such reflections,
But before he had finished reading, a stentorian major-domo announced
But before he had finished speaking, Prince Andrew, feeling tears of
But before Pierre could decide what answer he would send, the countess
But before Prince Vasíli had finished his playful speech, Pierre,
“But between not recognizing him as Emperor and calling him General
but Borís... No!” (She shut her eyes.) “No! there’s nothing at
But Borís noticed that he was preparing to make fun of Berg, and
But Dólokhov did not go away; he untied the handkerchief around his
“But don’t hurt my little horse!” said the Alsatian good-naturedly
but evidently the crisis was over and he was convalescent. Prince Andrew
“But for God’s sake, be careful, you know how it may affect your
but had never spoken to her of love. Now he felt that it was inevitable,
but had on one of her best dresses. Her hair was carefully done and her
But haste was becoming imperative. Cannon and musketry, mingling
but he could not make up his mind to take the final step. He felt
but he did not explain to himself what these new relations were.
But he scowled at her angrily though also with suffering in his eyes,
“But how is it the doctor from Moscow is not here yet?” said the
“But how often I have felt proud of her, proud of her majestic beauty
but I am still so weak that I love my life, the meaning of which is only
but I do not believe it. I have no right to, and can’t, believe it.”
“But I do not know, Father!”
“But if for any reason you don’t feel inclined to talk to me,”
but I have killed her, killed... She won’t get over it! She won’t
“But I have nothing here,” replied Pierre, supposing that he was
but instead of the band a choir began singing a cantata composed by Paul
“But in what position are we going to attack him? I have been at the
“But in what was I to blame?” he asked. “In marrying her without
“But it can’t be he, alone in the midst of this empty field!”
but it is a beautiful voice that must be trained.” Only they generally
“but it must be brought to a head. The day after tomorrow will be
but it was too late. She was looking at them with an expression they
“But I wish it,” he said. “I beg you—give it him!”
but joyous and eager crowd down the hill at their disordered foe.
but looked at him with a contemptuous smile, waiting for the valet to
but managed meanwhile to look round repeatedly at his neighbor, the
But Milorádovich was at that moment evidently thinking of anything
“but nothing more would come of it. There will soon be a battalion of
but only changed character. The horses were replaced by others from a
but on the left flank the columns of infantry, cavalry, and artillery,
But on Tuesday evening, having come to Hélène’s splendid salon,
But our stories are the stories of men who have been under the enemy’s
but remarked that besides these changes it would be necessary to go into
But Rostóv did not reply.
but said, in a careless and even rude voice, that it happens to
“But she’s stupid. I have myself said she is stupid,” he thought.
but she was too excited to eat anything and kept wriggling about on her
but shouldn’t we get the gypsy singers as well? You military men like
“But tell me, what is he like, eh?” said Prince Andrew again.
“But that’s all rubbish,” Natásha chattered on. “And is
“But that’s just the same as myself—they are not others,”
“But that’s the Grand Duke, and I want the commander in chief or the
But the officer thrashed him because he had to get on as quickly as
But the staff officer did not finish what he wanted to say. A cannon
But the talk in every group was chiefly about the Emperor Alexander. His
“But they heard him at the council of war and will hear him when he
but to go home alone, see his sisters, brother, mother, and father,
button of his waistcoat.
but went on turning uselessly in the same place.
“But what do you mean by living only for yourself?” asked Pierre,
      * “But what the devil was he doing in that galley?”
but when he reached it he found it was a road. Having come out onto
But when Katie brought the required dress, Princess Mary remained
but which possesses qualities resembling those of the symbol.”
“But why talk of me?... Talk to me, yes, tell me about your travels
but why, whither, and who they were, it was impossible to make out.
“But with such ideas what motive have you for living? One would sit
but would probably never even inquire and would never know that the
“But you despise me. You who are so pure can never understand being so
“But you know how it all ended, don’t you? You heard of the duel?”
Buxhöwden is commander in chief by seniority, but General Bennigsen
Buxhöwden’s part and an epileptic fit on Bennigsen’s. But at the
by a far more serious matter than a desire to show his contempt for
by a feeling of desire while stooping over the snuffbox at Anna
by Anna Pávlovna, was about our diplomatic relations with Austria and
by Bolkónski—an adjutant of Kutúzov’s, who’s a friend of mine.
by Borís arrived at the palace to find Dolgorúkov. Everyone at
By evening, the adjutants had spread it to all ends and parts of the
by her husband, Mortemart, the delightful Prince Hippolyte who had
by highfalutin words, and Germans by logical arguments to show them
By his age he should have belonged to the younger men, but by his wealth
by his home circle as the best of sons, a hero, and their darling
by its gray dress. “But no! Why did this thought never occur to me
“By purifying and regenerating our members we try, thirdly, to improve
by someone’s order, the battery had continued firing and was only not
By the dim light, to which Pierre had already become accustomed, he
by the disorderly movement of the Russian columns, and from all
by the fire. One of them stumbled.
“By the way, your excellency, I should inform you,” he
by those troops that they were themselves in the front line and had
by, tried to make a joke, saying that Kutúzov had evidently failed to
by two considerations: his wife’s guilt, of which after his sleepless
By “what was due from the Ryazán estate” Prince Vasíli meant
by which the total exceeded the round sum of forty-three thousand; and
cadet, supporting one hand with the other, came up to Túshin and asked
called her nephew—and playing with him.
called him this morning?”
called the colonel of the regiment and said a few words to him.
calling him a court weathercock and an old satyr.
calling him in a whisper.
“Calm yourself, my dear. I will go to my father,” she said, and went
came a letter from Kutúzov informing the prince of the fate that had
came a man wearing a strange shako and a blue cloak, swarthy, sunburned,
came and leaned on his elbows, facing her and beside Mademoiselle
came in from his club, cheerful and contented. Nicholas, hearing him
came thy conception of the existence of such an incomprehensible Being?
came together and crowded in the large drawing room by the door of the
came to the conclusion that he would not find Bald Hills dull either.
came to these balls with an air of condescension and found them most
came with the news that the prince could not attend. Prince Andrew came
“Can a sleigh pass?” he asked his overseer, a venerable man,
can both fall on his flank and pursue him over the plain between
candlesticks like those used in churches. Two of the brothers led Pierre
candles were relit and he was told that he would see the full light; the
“Can he really be going away leaving me alone without having told me
can I retain in some degree of purity the liquid I receive.”
Can it be possible?” she thought, not daring to look at his face, but
cannonade was dying down, but the rattle of musketry behind and on the
cannon aimed at me?”
cannon and the crowd were dragging it out. A cannon ball killed someone
cannon balls at the French with both hands.
cannot attain the knowledge of which you speak.”
cannot, disappoint them. But how will it be? I do not know, but it
cannot know Him. You do not know Him and that is why you are unhappy.”
can say all this there,” remarked Dolgorúkov.
can’t bear those old men! Eh?”
can’t be! Only to get past them quicker, quicker!”
can’t get them from anyone else. He’s not there himself, so you’ll
can’t understand. I was there all the time giving orders and had only
can without hurting others.”
“Can you imagine it?” and he began describing how the Guards, having
capable of receiving it.
“Captain, for God’s sake! I’ve hurt my arm,” he said timidly.
Captain von Toll chanced to ride to the same spot, and seeing the
captured by the French because the enemy could not surmise that anyone
carabineers.
card, putting a small stake on it, and beginning to play.
care about them in so far as they are harmful or useful. And most of
carefully wrote twenty-one.
care, this was a mere stranger. Glancing, however, at Borís, he saw
carriage, and the solitude of the road, all had a gladdening effect on
carriage at full speed about an hour before along that very road and
carried away by passion. Oh, only my poor mother...”
carried the sovereign at reviews in Russia bore him also here on the
carry him to the dressing station.”
carry out the count’s wishes, seeing clearly that not only would the
carry them out, so he takes a regiment, a division—stipulates that no
casement. The cold wind flapped the ends of her kerchief and her loose
casket for Mamma’s name day and then going home. I was so happy, so
catches it and obeying the impulse that wheel begins to creak and joins
catching the curtain of the cot. Each made the other a warning gesture
cavalry and here he noticed a stir and signs of preparation for battle;
cavalry in front, behind it the artillery, and behind that again the
cavalry was brought in, convoyed by a sótnya of Cossacks. Evidently the
celebrating awards they had received for the campaign, and made
censured, should not be held to blame.
center of the table, Prince Vasíli attracted everybody’s attention.
center, the reserves, and Bagratión’s right flank had not yet moved,
ceremonious welcomes (which he knew Pierre would not like), but for just
certainly is communicated very surely, and flows rapidly, imperceptibly,
certainly should not, speak like that,” their glances seemed to say.
certain, nothing at all except the unimportance of everything I
certain. There’s Lise, married to Andrew—a better husband one would
chair, and began deliberately with a smile:
chair, he drew up with a click of his spurs and bowed to her, Natásha
chair regardless of her governess’ remarks. After dinner, she rushed
chance, letting the seven be dealt to the right rather than to the left,
chance of delay and flight when the longed-for moment comes and he is
changed!... Where are the candles?... Tea!...”
CHAPTER I
CHAPTER I
CHAPTER I
CHAPTER II
CHAPTER II
CHAPTER II
CHAPTER III
CHAPTER III
CHAPTER III
CHAPTER IV
CHAPTER IV
CHAPTER IV
CHAPTER IX
CHAPTER IX
CHAPTER IX
CHAPTER V
CHAPTER V
CHAPTER V
CHAPTER VI
CHAPTER VI
CHAPTER VI
CHAPTER VII
CHAPTER VII
CHAPTER VII
CHAPTER VIII
CHAPTER VIII
CHAPTER VIII
CHAPTER X
CHAPTER X
CHAPTER X
CHAPTER XI
CHAPTER XI
CHAPTER XI
CHAPTER XII
CHAPTER XII
CHAPTER XII
CHAPTER XIII
CHAPTER XIII
CHAPTER XIV
CHAPTER XIV
CHAPTER XIX
CHAPTER XIX
CHAPTER XV
CHAPTER XV
CHAPTER XVI
CHAPTER XVI
CHAPTER XVII
CHAPTER XVIII
CHAPTER XX
CHAPTER XXI
character, but more so recently, since in the new reigns of Paul and
“Charge!” shouted by an officer who was urging his thoroughbred to
charitable to my poor aunt who adores you. Go and keep her company for
charming girls. Every young man who came to the house—seeing those
charming that only a fool would renounce such happiness.”
chattering voices had reached her from the corridor, went into Princess
chessmen with his delicate white fingers while awaiting Berg’s move,
chief, and our first foe, Buxhöwden, is vanquished; we can now turn
chief’s and with the exception of Prince Bagratión, who declined to
chief’s room.
chief steward wrote every year telling him of fires and bad harvests,
chief, your excellency?” said Rostóv, with his hand to his cap.
child. “But no, it is impossible, I am too ugly,” she thought.
childlike smile which had not once appeared on his face since he left
child’s little chair while, frowning and with trembling hands, he
choked him, and leaning his elbows on the window sill he began to cry,
choose. I give you freedom. Only remember that your life’s happiness
chorus.”
chose and placed cards, and watched those broad-boned agile hands in the
circumstances and persons he met. Of these plans he had not merely one
clanking his spurs, whirled rapidly round, and, striking his left heel
clavichord was. “It’s no use your going to the commander in chief.
cleaned pairs with spurs had just been placed by the wall. The servants
clear.
clearness, and charm that it seemed as if it were all a lost and
clear upright figures; he emptied the glass of warm champagne that was
clinking of spurs were heard at the door, and the young count, handsome,
cloak and felt boots, he went to the little princess’ apartment.
cloak looking timidly at me,” he thought. “And what does she
clock. One wheel slowly moved, another was set in motion, and a third,
close by, who heard him muttering.
closer together and a report spread that they were ordered to halt:
close that the expression of his face could be seen. And the excited,
cloths.
clouds gliding slowly across it. “How quiet, peaceful, and solemn; not
club, but met in private houses in intimate circles, and the
clutched the crupper of his saddle and, spurring his horse, galloped to
coachman’s, was teasing Kutúzov’s old cook whom Prince Andrew knew,
coachmen and footmen, who, with loud shouts, dragged his sleighs up to
coats.
coat, the traveler sat down on the sofa, leaned back his big head with
cock, but the elder members glanced severely at the wit, making him
code, but under this unwritten law. He felt now that merely by having
coiffure, Mademoiselle Bourienne’s and Anatole’s smiles, and the
collapsed so that I don’t live at all—everything seems hateful to
collar and cap, went out for his usual walk. It had snowed the day
colonel of forty to whom Denísov had introduced him.
column advanced into action.
column coming up to meet the Ápsherons.
column marches... The third column marches...” and so on, read
column, Milorádovich’s, the one that was to take the place of
columns, their bayonets glittering, were moving continuously in one
“Come along, our Matvévna!” he said to himself. “Matvévna” *
“Come, dear princess,” said Mademoiselle Bourienne, “just one more
“Come here, Wostóv. Let’s dwink to dwown our gwief!” shouted
come. He was alone now, except for a soldier who was sitting naked at
“Come later.” And she went in, closing the door behind her.
“Come, let’s argue then,” said Prince Andrew, “You talk of
“Come now, deal!” exclaimed Rostóv.
“Come now, just this one more little card!”
“Come now, what about your Roi de Prusse?”
come on and will meet them with the fire of the whole battalion’—and
comes from that! Even then I felt it,” he thought. “I felt then that
come, were all there at the appointed time.
coming action from Dolgorúkov. He felt that Kutúzov was upset
coming. And Nicholas, who had vainly suffered all the dread that
coming closer to Pierre. “In token of generosity I ask you to give me
“Coming, friend.”
coming to us of their own accord,” incautiously remarked the little
commander in chief.
commander in chief. Bagratión knew that as the distance between the two
commander in chief. He interrupted him, talked rapidly and indistinctly,
commander in chief here, and if all is lost it is for me to perish with
commander in chief’s suite. He was in a state of suppressed excitement
commanders. And then that happy moment, that Toulon for which he had
commanders, and with a consciousness of being too late spreading through
commanders are: Herr General Wimpfen, le Comte de Langeron, le Prince de
command of the infantry went toward his horse with jerky steps, and
command of the Third District, and my only way of avoiding active
command to the general next in seniority, Count Buxhöwden, having sent
commence the action, and wishing to avert responsibility from himself,
commiseration on Rostóv, who saw that Túshin with his whole heart
commit crime, die, or perform deeds of highest heroism, and so he could
companion, Dólokhov had come straight to his house, and Pierre had put
company, which alone had maintained its order in the wood and, having
company, your honor. I don’t know where... such bad luck!”
compared to the lofty, equitable, and kindly sky which he had seen and
completely altered. He was not rich, but would spend his last groat to
composed and printed in the hero’s honor. Bagratión, on seeing the
composure, “now there’s this recruiting. My father is chief in
composure, waiting for a display of the eccentricities his father had
comrade Berg’s best wishes for success, rode to Olmütz to see
concentrate. “There we shall encounter difficulties, and there,”
concentration of fighting at one point, and the hesitation of all the
concentration on some one thought.
conclude our campaign and we can return to winter quarters, where fresh
condition.
confess and ask for money he had no right to after giving his word of
confession; he felt himself in the presence of one socially a complete
confidence, and love as I have for you. Then I am young. Mamma does
confidence, flatter him, become intimate with him, and finally make his
confidence the personality of the Freemason inspired in him and his own
confirmed by Pierre’s rupture with his wife, was the talk of society.
confirmed in this conclusion by the fact that Dólokhov left immediately
“Confound him, he’s a fool!” said Rostóv.
“Confound you and your Karl Ivánich!” He took the glass with the
Confused and ever-increasing crowds were running back to where five
confused him still more. He stood before Bagratión with his lower
confused when she saw Prince Andrew. He covered his face with his hands
confusion and fear that showed itself on Prince Vasíli’s face.
confusion what did or did not happen?
congratulations and greetings from acquaintances that met him on all
connected in his memory with Prince Andrew.
   Conquest’s joyful thunder waken,
conscience that God has implanted in our souls.”
conscientiously studied the dispositions and the unfamiliar locality. He
consciousness that something great and mysterious was being accomplished
conscious of the warmth of her body, the scent of perfume, and the
conscious of this unseen line, and the question whether they would cross
conscious that another line of thought had sprung up, and while thinking
conservatories and the beauty of a flower that had just opened, and
considered him a criminal, and a year later they executed those who
considered myself injured, and Louis XVI was executed because they
considered worthy to hear it had to come to the countess, for she
consider it a sacred duty to fulfill that person’s wishes. Do you wish
consolation for our defeat by the memory of former victories; and the
consolation? What evil and error are there in it, if people were dying
constant composure and complacency and lack of all interests or desires,
constantly considered it a duty to assure Pierre that he was greatly
consultations very valuable for the proprietor and troublesome to
consultations were detached from real affairs and did not link up with
contemptuous smile, evidently prepared beforehand to meet all objections
continually driving round or coming upon wounded men, was out of range
continued—remembering Dólokhov’s conversation with Kutúzov and his
continued, “we owe today’s success chiefly to the action of that
continue their flight? Despite his desperate shouts that used to seem
contrary one must try to make one’s life as pleasant as possible.
convalescence. Dólokhov lay ill at his mother’s who loved him
conversation with her, when Anna Pávlovna called him away on the
convey....”
convoy officer, who said rapidly: “We must halt here: the Emperor
cook calls it—has disagreed with me.”
cords on his coat and took a card with that number and tried staking the
corner of his card and, instead of the six thousand he had intended,
correct, others that it was not, and explained the false rumor that had
Cossacks and then the first and second squadrons of hussars and infantry
cost correct, or remedy, the mistake if he had made one, so that he,
coughed, swallowed, and said in French that she was very pleased to see
could be heard above the three hundred others. He nearly wept. “To the
could be heard. It was there Prince Andrew thought the fight would
could clearly distinguish their bandoliers, red epaulets, and even their
could disclose it to me.”
could have been devised. This combination of Austrian precision with
could have the effrontery to continue firing from four quite undefended
could hear the footstep of someone in thick felt boots, and a voice that
could no longer be averted but was taking its course independently of
could not bear her look but turned away with a sob.
could not break away from her, and that though it would be a terrible
could not possibly be, and so did not deliver the order.
could not remember what it was that people say. He looked at her face.
could not reply.
could not scream like that—came from the bedroom. Prince Andrew ran to
council, he remained in the room.
Councilor of State, and insisted on the young man accompanying him to
Count Bezúkhov he did not let go his hold of the lad. He had the air of
“Count! Count!” shouted Berg who ran up from the other side as eager
countenance Bonaparte, and to cause me, and us in general, annoyance and
countess.
countess had not yet come. But now steps were heard at the door, steps
countess. Her son’s growth toward manhood, at each of its stages,
countess’ house.
“Countess, I have done w’ong,” Denísov went on in an unsteady
“Countess Natásha,” answered Denísov.
“Countess...” said Denísov, with downcast eyes and a guilty face.
countess” to have a rest, but remembering something else of
countess, who sat holding in one hand the snuffbox with its portrait and
Count Ilyá Rostóv, hurried and preoccupied, went about in his soft
Count Ilyá Rostóv separately, as the organizer of the banquet. At that
“Count Ilyá Rostóv’s son?” asked Dolgorúkov.
Count Markóv, and Prince Vyázemski—did not show themselves at the
Count Markóv? Count Markóv was the only man who knew how to handle
count, money and all things necessary for the uniform and equipment
count never be able to find out whether all measures had been taken for
Count Rostopchín, Valúev, and Narýshkin. Rostopchín was describing
“Count Rostóv.”
countrymen. Thanks for the fire—we’ll return it with interest,”
Count,” said Berg, lighting his pipe and emitting rings of smoke.
Count Tolstóy, who had ridden out to the battlefield with others in
couple of words with him, Pierre felt unable to disappoint him.
Courage. 6. Generosity. 7. The love of death.
courage, but she looked straight into his handsome face as it came near
   Courage conquest guarantees;
courage had it not been that just then they heard the rattle of musketry
Courage, my angel.” She kissed Lise and was about to leave the room.
course.” Perhaps he did not really think this when he met women—even
courts only strengthened his desire to belong to that higher world.
covered his eyes with his hand and pressed von Toll’s hand.
covered with melting snow, the frost having begun to break up during the
“Cover yourself!” even Denísov cried to his adversary.
crack and there was a glimpse of something blue, of ribbons, black hair,
crackling of wood fires near and afar, merged into one tremulous rumble.
creaking of her corset as she moved. He did not see her marble beauty
cried at each shot: “Fine! That’s good! Look at it... Grand!” The
criminal,” came into Pierre’s head, “and from their point of
crimson float on the surface of that milky sea of mist. The whole French
critical moment the courier who carried the news of our victory at
crossed one on the other on her breast, and to him, too, her face seemed
crossed the road, and began riding up the hill at a gallop toward the
cross it and ride over the black field up the hillside. To keep to the
crowding around the dams and banks of the ponds near the village of
crowd, they had got wedged in at the approach to the dam and, jammed in
crushed, but angry and working unnaturally, she saw that hanging over
crying.
curious embarrassment among some of those present. Sónya, Dólokhov,
curious to know what was going to happen and what would be revealed to
curtain aside and for some time his frightened, restless eyes could not
curtain flapping and blew out the candle with its chill, snowy draft.
Curving her arms, Natásha held out her skirts as dancers do, ran back
cynically Dólokhov had praised his wife’s beauty to him and from that
d’affaires.
dancer, and one of the best matches in the city.
dancer, but smiling as only happy girls of fifteen can smile. When
dancers do, Natásha, rising energetically from her heels to her toes,
dancing master) gave for his pupils during the holidays.
dangerous.
dangers. During these wanderings, Pierre noticed that he was spoken
dark and the glow of two conflagrations was the more conspicuous. The
dark corner. And this someone was he—the devil—and he was also this
darkness, the man paused, then moved with cautious steps toward the
darkness, was suddenly lit up by a new brightness, full of significance.
darkness. “Why not?... It might easily happen,” thought Rostóv,
dark... Steady!” he cried to his fidgeting horse.
“Darling Denísov!” screamed Natásha, beside herself with rapture,
dashing young hussar!
daughter!”
daughter.
daughter, and while he laughed the expression on his face clearly said:
daughter, but for a minister! For me, there are no ministers!”
daughter-in-law, “but she need not make a fool of herself, she’s
daughter is so young, and I thought that, as my son’s friend, you
daughter.)—“My dear boy... Lëlya... I am very pleased.” (His
    * Daughter of Matthew.
daughter of Prince Vasíli, but visualized her whole body only veiled
daughter’s happiness.
daughter. She lowered her head and was ready to burst into tears.
daughter were having one not less important. Natásha came running to
day before, he wished to do what the young man wanted. Having been sent
day he had lost. He was happy as a lover when the longed-for moment of
day in Moscow. All Denísov’s Moscow friends gave him a farewell
days’ march and the enemy’s outposts after a brief interchange
days was still thin—moved. His gleaming eyes were fixed intently on
days with her, asked her to sleep in her room, and often talked with her
day until then, but he could no longer do it. He could not, any more
dead. All that he saw and heard seemed to confirm this terror.
dead or wounded horses and harnessing fresh ones, and shouting in his
dear boy,” and he drew Pierre’s arm downwards, “it is simply a
“Dear, dear! But still tell him to come to the club—it will all blow
“Dearest... and me!”
“Dearest, I’m afraid this morning’s fruschtique *—as Fóka the
“Dearest,” said the little princess after breakfast on the morning
dear fellow!” and for some unknown reason tears suddenly filled his
dear general, I am engaged with rice and cutlets, look after military
“Dear me, how you have changed!”
“Dear me!” said his father, who was in a specially good humor. “I
“Dear me!” said Rostóv.
“Dear me! Then what are you up to now?”
dear sir—took on yourself responsibility for the guidance of a young
death’s head. The stranger sat without stirring, either resting or, as
de beaucoup de mérite), a newly appointed maid of honor and her mother,
deceitful German, whom he would not only kill with pleasure but whom
deceived you. Let us go to Mamma.”
December, nothing was said about the war and the last battle, as
de châle, but at this last ball only the écossaise, the anglaise, and
decidedly lost bearings, you know that a letter was received from him
decided now or never. She lowered her eyes so as not to see the gaze
decided that day, but that they also knew what she thought about it. She
decided to play until that score reached forty-three thousand. He
decided to send the letters and money by the Grand Duke’s courier to
Decide, my dear, good, gentle Marie, whom I have always loved as a
declared, was extraordinary and had achieved miracles of valor. The
deeds, and while dying he expressed the love his actions had proved.
deepest where the land lies lowest.
defeated. A week after the gazette report of the battle of Austerlitz
defective commissariat, the treachery of the Pole Przebyszéwski and of
defile through narrow village streets when we are marching against the
dejection and hopelessness)—at any rate, Pierre longed with his whole
delay and advised waiting for something else before advancing had been
deliberately so that everyone could hear:
“Delightful!” said Bolkónski. “But I have come to you, Prince,
delightful to see.”
delight of frenzy. He flung down the slab, broke it, and swooping
(delivered by the French alone) was still to be heard from numerous
delivers its teaching not in words only but also by other means, which
demanded that he should submit. Feeling himself in their power, he
    * Denísov.
Denísov?”
Denísov also came back and stayed with them. The first half of the
Denísov, and now Moscow memories—and he again hurriedly opened his
Denísov bent over her hand and she heard strange sounds she did not
Denísov, Denísov! We’re almost there!”
“Denísov, don’t make fun of it!” cried Rostóv. “It is such a
Denísov first went to the barrier and announced: “As the
Denísov gave no answer.
Denísov nice?” she asked.
Denísov raised his head, coughed, and made no answer.
Denísov’s a fine fellow. But that’s all nonsense. The chief thing
Denísov’s favorite barcarolle. Natásha was preparing to sing.
Denísov’s horse, Bedouin, was in debt all round, to his comrades and
Denísov’s short stature not noticeable and he looked the fine fellow
Denísov, to Rostóv’s surprise, appeared in the drawing room with
Denísov was looking at her with enraptured eyes.
Denísov was shown to the room prepared for him, and the Rostóvs all
“Denísov! We’re here! He’s asleep,” he added, leaning forward
Denísov, who had settled down by the roadside with a flask and some
Denísov with his voice and mustache, and Telyánin and all that affair
Denísov, with sparkling eyes and ruffled hair, sat at the clavichord
departure Hélène returned to Petersburg, she was received by all her
depends on your decision. Never mind me!”
depraved ideas of these days. I said so even at the time when everybody
depraved woman,” he repeated, “but dared not admit it to myself.
depressing and unsolved problem.
depth of his heart. In one place the peasants presented him with bread
derision. “I ought to know the Emperor by now, after the times I’ve
descending the valley. That moment of moral hesitation which decides
descent lit up, and facing it a black knoll that seemed as steep as a
descriptive part of the letter. “And what a soul! Not a word about
desire to do good to his neighbor.
desire to show his friend as soon as possible that he was now a quite
desirous of hiding her adoration for Hélène and inclined rather
despair at failing in a Scripture examination, his borrowing money from
despair, not knowing where to or why he was now riding.
Despite Count Bezúkhov’s enormous wealth, since he had come into an
“Despite my great respect for old Kutúzov,” he continued, “we
Despite the weakness of age, which had become particularly noticeable
destruction of the Prussian army at Jena and Auerstädt and the
detachment, moved from the place where it had spent the night, advancing
detail! No, my dear fellow, no conditions better than our present ones
“Devil take ‘em!” he muttered, while his head was still covered by
“Devil take them!” he muttered, and after listening to the verbal
devoid of any foundation. Prince Bagratión turned to the old colonel:
devotion to the sovereign, Rostóv pictured to himself an enemy or a
dictated the dispositions in German, and now, much exhausted, he arrived
did I come here?” he wondered.
did neither: a look of animosity appeared on his face and the other
did not, and do not, in the least care about that scoundrel of a clerk
did not calm her excitement. Suddenly her door opened softly and her old
did not draw closer to Sónya, but rather drifted away from her. She was
did not even make him a curtsy. She fixed her eyes on him in amazement,
did not, for instance, say to himself: “This man now has influence, I
did not interest her—or by a silent look and smile which more palpably
did not let him and, on the other, Pierre himself feared to begin to
did not let it out of her hands. The tutors came, and the nurses, and
did not want or could not carry away with them. Austrian column guides
did not wish to, believe that.
did not wish to confess.
“Didn’t I tell you,” she went on, turning reproachfully to
did still harder work on their own land. He did not know that the priest
didst thou, and why did the whole world, conceive the idea of the
did that day. But no sooner had Natásha finished her barcarolle than
did they not interest him, but he took no notice of them and at once
did this and that, all would be well; and he did what was demanded of
different, and better, Pierre than he had been in Petersburg.
different companies did not get mixed. But our left—which consisted
different from that of its elders which is often insincere, Nicholas
different one from that which he had ridden at the review, and bending
different tones. Rostóv reined in his horse, whose spirits had risen,
difficulties had told Nicholas that this was all he could let him have
difficult to imagine happier people, and that God only knew what would
difficulty.
difficulty.
digested his sufferings alone.
dinner.
dinner and at other times, when as if tired of everyday life he had felt
dinner and looked about, blinking and scowling, or, with fixed eyes and
dinner, but providing it and serving it all up, that’s not their
diplomatic career in comparison with Pierre’s happiness. The old
diplomatic discretion tormented him, and he was happy to have in Prince
diplomatist fresh from Berlin with the very latest details of the
directed to—Pierre and Hélène. Prince Vasíli mimicked the sobbing
direction of the conflagration. As if urging each other on, the soldiers
direction toward the valley and disappearing one after another into
“Directly!”
disbelieved both the princess’ hints and the letter, but he feared
discipline and zeal in the service. He brought with him into our
disconcerted. The sight of the discomposure of that old man of the world
disheveled head from the hot pillow.
dismal influence of cannon balls flying from the French batteries
disordered. The French cannon did not reach there and the musketry fire
disorganized, I stopped in the road and thought: ‘I’ll let them
displease you. However,” he added rising, “you know my name and
disposed to treat the young heir in the most friendly and flattering
dispositions...”
“Dispositions for an attack on the enemy position behind Kobelnitz and
dispute.
dissatisfaction and reproach. “Old though he may be, he should not, he
dissatisfied with him, and also that at the Emperor’s headquarters
distance, but down the hill before him. “It’s the French!”
distance where no one had been before him. Bagratión called to him from
distant, most intimate, memories rose in his imagination: he remembered
distinctions which may infringe equality. Fly to a brother’s aid
distinguish a mounted man from one on foot. Napoleon, in the blue cloak
distinguished dignitary and a Swiss who had formerly been tutor at the
distorted out of all likeness to his former self, and the flourishing of
distraught yet angry expression on the faces of these two men, who
distrust in Bolkónski’s emphatic opinion yet not feeling able fully
Dmítri, and several acquaintances, and the countess reread the letter
“Dmítri,” said Rostóv to his valet on the box, “those lights are
do?”
doctor and expecting another for whom they had sent to town, they had
doctor who had entered the hall after him (they had met at the last post
does not produce the slightest stir—a blind man has left it. There are
does not quite see it; more particularly as it is he and his corps who
doesn’t have intrigues nowadays? Why, if he was so jealous, as I see
doing a little—though I did very little and did it very badly? What
doing!” said the officer and rode off.
“Do I remember Nicholas?”
Dolgorúkov; and though you may not know it, the fact is that now
Dolgorúkov laughed merrily.
Dolgorúkov, looking round at Bilíbin with a smile.
Dolgorúkov, one of the warmest advocates of an attack, had just
Dolgorúkov, the victor at Wischau, was sent with Savary to negotiate
Dolgorúkov to the Emperor.
Dolgorúkov was still insisting that the French had retreated and had
dolls and who was still having lessons.
Dólokhov and looked sorrowfully at him. Denísov, Rostóv, and
Dólokhov, and words of honor?... All nonsense! One might kill and rob
Dólokhov began to deal seriously. Oh, how Rostóv detested at that
Dólokhov cut him short, as if to remind him that it was not for him to
Dólokhov himself during his convalescence spoke to Rostóv in a way no
Dólokhov looked at Pierre with clear, mirthful, cruel eyes, and that
Dólokhov made no reply.
“Dólokhov, Mary Ivánovna’s son,” she said in a mysterious
Dólokhov—now an officer—wounded in the arm, and on foot, with
Dólokhov often dined at the Rostóvs’, never missed a performance at
Dólokhov or answering him. The footman, who was distributing leaflets
Dólokhov paused.
Dólokhov, Pierre saw clearly that what was said in the letter might be
Dólokhov pressed Rostóv’s hand and burst into tears.
Dólokhov’s clear, cold glance met Rostóv as soon as he entered the
Dólokhov’s face.
Dólokhov’s hand.
Dólokhov’s hands and thought, “Now then, make haste and let me have
Dólokhov’s home: on the third day he received a note from him:
Dólokhov, slamming down the pack of cards, put it aside and began
Dólokhov’s offer,” he said, articulating his friend’s name with
Dólokhov’s proposal and Iogel’s ball, seemed to have grown thicker
Dólokhov’s second, and after dinner he discussed the arrangements for
Dólokhov. Suddenly a cannon ball hissed so low above the crowd that
Dólokhov was a secret to no one but himself. Pierre absolutely
Dólokhov, who had no reason to preserve the honor of a man who was
Dólokhov, whom everyone in the house liked except Natásha. She almost
Dólokhov who was in the midst of the crowd forced his way to the edge
dominated everything else and soared above all their affected chatter.
done. Have you chosen a post in which you might be of service to your
done no harm to anyone; why must I suffer so? Help me!” her look
done, the Rhetor said:
done to me?”—said her charming, pathetic, dead face.
done up.
Do not break your ranks on the plea of removing the wounded! Let every
do not suppose me to be so bad. With my whole soul I wish to be what you
“Don’t be unkind,” cried Anna Pávlovna from her end of the table
don’t care a straw about anyone but those I love; but those I love,
“Don’t come in,” she said to the old count who was following her.
“Don’t! Don’t! What are you about?” whispered their frightened
don’t forget to put out my new coat,” added Rostóv, fingering his
don’t know and never shall know, for the love of these men here,” he
“Don’t, Natásha! What nonsense!” she said, hoping it was a joke.
don’t remember Borís. I don’t remember him a bit.”
“Don’t say that to me! I want nothing. I love you as a brother and
“Don’t speak to me... I beg you,” muttered Pierre hoarsely.
don’t understand. Perhaps Princess Elizabeth and Princess Mary know.
“Don’t you wecollect what bad use I made of your lessons?”
door and his expression of sleepy indifference suddenly changed to one
door, as though he had long expected him.
door behind him and satisfied himself that there was nobody else in the
“Do order them to form into battalion columns and go round the
door? Oh, she is a pearl among women, Princess,” he added, turning to
     do, Sire.”
“Do this for my sake, mon cher; after all, she had to put up with a
doubled. To this Prince Andrew answered with a smile that he could
doubt, and self-derision, which appeared on his face against his will,
doubt filled her soul. Could the joy of love, of earthly love for a
doubt it now. Rostóv rode in the direction pointed out to him, in which
doubt of victory, especially on this day when what is at stake is the
down, and smiled affectionately.
down below, but higher up at the village of Schlappanitz where Napoleon
downcast head; and he began to pace the room, glancing occasionally at
down in her easy chair, now taking her prayer book, now kneeling before
down on a sofa in the next room.
down. One bullet and then another whistled past him. He mustered his
down on her with outstretched hands shouted, “Get out!” in such a
downstairs to his own room. A quarter of an hour later the old count
down the hillsides, and clouds of cannon smoke rolling, spreading,
downy lip was open and she was smiling joyfully. Prince Andrew entered
dowry and take Mademoiselle Bourienne into the bargain. She’ll be the
“Do you hear how he’s walking?” said Tíkhon, drawing the
do you know he has fallen in love with Sónya?”
“Do you remember him?” Natásha suddenly asked, after a moment’s
“Do you remember we had a talk about cards... ‘He’s a fool who
“Do you want anything?”
dragging it by the staff, ran on with the battalion. In front he saw our
drank much, and eagerly. But those who knew him intimately noticed that
drawing him down put her arm round his thin, scraggy neck.
drawing room. The guests began to disperse, some without taking leave
drawing room with her habitual skill. The large group, in which were
dressed alike, in new pale-blue frocks, and were both fresh, rosy, and
dressed, at a round table in the clean quarters allotted to them,
dressed gay young men on splendid, well-groomed, fresh, only slightly
dressed. Princess Mary’s self-esteem was wounded by the fact that
dress, have it fetched. Really! You know the fate of your whole life may
dress her would prolong their banter and insistence. She flushed, her
dressing gown every day, he invariably became confused and begged her to
dress, Mademoiselle Bourienne’s ribbon, Princess Mary’s unbecoming
dress with her little hand, now arranging the scarf and looking at her
drew Anatole, whom she hardly knew, into these amusing recollections of
drew in his legs and sat up, seeking a firm center of gravity. He sucked
drink?”
drink shop or fall ill. Just as I could not stand his terrible physical
driven their two-horse carts loaded with wheat and had returned dusty
driver’s leg. Their spirits once roused were, however, not diminished,
drive the princess away by that scream... “Killed!”
drive up, went to meet him.
drooping as he broke into a gallop.
drops and again went up to the cot.
drove his huge spurs in violently, and the horse, flourishing its tail
drowsiness overpowered him, red rings danced before his eyes, and the
dry hands clenched with vexation at her not understanding a sum in
duel he did not go to his bedroom but, as he often did, remained in his
duelist and rake, and every now and then he glanced ironically at
duel prove? That you’re a fool, que vous êtes un sot, but everybody
due to her misfortune. When conversation turned on her husband Hélène
Duke Constantine Pávlovich, who commanded the Guards. The Rostóvs
Duke’s orders the men had marched all the way in step (a practice on
During Rostóv’s short stay in Moscow, before rejoining the army, he
During that stay in Petersburg, Borís became an intimate in the
During this transfer he felt a little stronger and was able to look
each face, appraising the possibilities of establishing intimacy with
each occasion had been driven back by grapeshot from the four isolated
each of those present, and the advantages that might accrue. He took
each time with fresh pleasure and each time discovered in it fresh
eagerness and briskness presented a marked contrast to the dissatisfied
eager questions from all sides. The whole moving mass began pressing
Early in the year 1806 Nicholas Rostóv returned home on leave. Denísov
easy.
edge of the clearing. The seconds, measuring the paces, left tracks in
   E’en fortunate Napoleon
efforts to seem calm.
“Eh, brother! They’ve all bolted long ago!” said the soldier,
Eh, Dmítri! Gallop off to our Moscow estate,” he said to the factotum
“Eh, is anything hurting you?” asked the soldier, shaking his shirt
“Eh, is she pretty?” he asked with a wink.
eighty thousand allied troops rose from their bivouacs to the hum of
either,” he thought to himself, “I have done nothing wrong. Have I
either,” he thought. “Yes, I did not know anything, anything at all
either the place they were leaving or that to which they were going.
Ekonómov.
elated. He had noticed a solitary tree ahead of him. This tree had been
elbows, as if to say: “You can tell me your views later, but now be so
elbows turned outwards, his hands on his knees, and his shoulders
elders which seems to say to the older generation, “We are prepared to
else.
else.
else, my dear boy, let me tell you it’s quite likely you’ll have to
else, runs upstairs and does up her hair and wags her tail and is unlike
else the Tsar did.
embarrassed him. He was like a man entirely absorbed in some occupation.
embarrassed voice, though it sounded severe to Denísov—“but my
embarrassing situation, and the expression on his face was invariably
embraced him and lifting his spectacles kissed his friend on the cheek
embracing Denísov. “Nicholas wrote us... Natásha, Véra, look! Here
embracing Prince Vasíli.
Emperor Alexander hurriedly to Kutúzov, glancing courteously at the
Emperor Alexander’s visit to Potsdam, and of how the two august
Emperor and the whole army, especially while the smoke hung over
Emperor at once rode up to him, offered his services, and assisted him
Emperor Francis continued to look about him and did not listen.
Emperor had only just fallen asleep and so Savary had to wait. At midday
Emperor himself rode round his bivouacs. The soldiers, on seeing him,
Emperor not everyone could understand, and with his whole soul he shared
Emperor,” said Rostóv, and was about to spur his horse.
Emperor’s arrival, lay several killed and wounded soldiers whom there
Emperor’s eyes met Rostóv’s and rested on them for not more than
Emperors. Upon them the undivided, tensely passionate attention of that
Emperor. The Emperor Francis, a rosy, long faced young man, sat very
Emperor,” thought Rostóv.
Emperor was pale, his cheeks sunken and his eyes hollow, but the charm,
employed by lively chatty people, and consisting in the assumption
Empress’ Field, not understanding the significance of the firing, nor
Empress’ Field,” said he clearly and distinctly.
empty and that the nurse had been hiding the dead baby. He drew the
emptying his glass at one gulp he dashed it to the floor. Many followed
   Enchantress, say, to my forsaken lyre
encounter an enemy invisible ten paces off. But the columns advanced
end of the meal. He winked at the butler, whispered directions to the
end spurred his horse.
enemies, he tried to continue reading. But feeling this to be senseless
enemy?”
enemy, do not avenge thyself except by doing him good. Thus fulfilling
enemy under the Emperor’s command. Commanded by the Emperor himself
energetic a character. He is so accustomed to unlimited power that he is
energetically than anyone, led the guests into the drawing room, and
engaged; he was shouting “Hurrah!”
enjoyable. That year two marriages had come of these balls. The two
enjoyment by sympathy with anyone’s sorrow,” she felt, and she said
enlightenment?”
enlighten their minds, by means handed on to us by tradition from those
enormous whole.
enough, at the end of the feast proposed the Emperor’s health. “Not
“Enough! What nonsense! Above all, try to be respectful and cautious
entered, as if to say: “Yes, that’s how I want you to look.”
entered the drawing room elegantly dressed in the uniform of an
entered the room.
entered the room. Prince Vasíli approached first, and she kissed the
entering the house occupied by Kutúzov, asked for Bolkónski. Prince
entering the misty region with a sound of hoofs and wheels and now and
entertaining supposition.
entertainment at the gypsies’, with the result that he had no
enter the drawing room? Even if I like him I can’t now be myself with
enthusiasms, dreams, and hopes of happiness or goodness, in Prince
enthusiasm—was only the loss of the battle of Austerlitz, the
entice him to marry my daughter and lend me the forty thousand rubles
entrance to the dam raised his hand and opened his mouth to address
entrusted to him, was pedantic in the fulfillment of his duties, severe
entrusted to his care and whom he intended to benefit.
enveloped in those beams, he heard his voice, that kindly, calm,
envious and Natásha could not help joining in.
equals, while his eyes occasionally sought out his fine well-set-up
erect, almost on tiptoe, with a soldier’s obsequious expression on his
erect on his handsome black horse, looking about him in a leisurely and
err, and in nothing more than in what they consider right and wrong.”
escapade made everybody feel confused. Denísov blushed too, but smiled
escape it all, and felt that Dólokhov knew that he could save him from
especially appealed to Pierre. The important mystery mentioned by the
especially the youngest, the pretty one with the mole, who often made
Essen corps arrived and Prussia took our side.
essential to speak the whole truth.
estate near Moscow, and to receive many people who formerly did not
estates. His new brethren gave him letters to the Kiev and Odessa Masons
estates in the south and there attending to the welfare of his serfs.
eternal, and infinite in all His attributes?...”
eternity.” And again he twisted the screw with the stripped thread,
    * “Europe will never be our sincere ally.”
even by a ball dress.
even Denísov was nothing compared to Dólokhov—“you must understand
even every footstep in that house since the terrible news had come, so
evening.
evening in advance of him, and he and his son arrived next day.
Evening passed, night came, and the feeling of suspense and softening of
evening to get in) “I only wished to say that we are wrong to fight
evening was this:
evening when the rewards bestowed by the Emperor were mentioned.
even know if it would be a good thing (he even felt, he knew not why,
even more beautiful than it had been three days before at the review. It
even more merrily than on the previous night. Denísov celebrated his
Even people who had formerly been spiteful toward him and evidently
even their faces, more and more distinctly. They were our Horse Guards,
event. In the English Club, where all who were distinguished, important,
even wish to know of his existence but would now have been offended
ever because Anatole’s presence had vividly recalled to her the time
ever was Borís resolved to serve in future not according to the written
every advantage. What receptions we had in Poland! What dinners and
everybody, for another ten years. It would be far easier and simpler for
Everybody laughed a great deal. At the head of the table, where the
everybody! Not forgetting anyone. I always said when he was only so
Every day he said to himself one and the same thing: “It is time I
everyone!
everyone adopted toward him the tone of men who know something others do
everyone ducked. It flopped into something moist, and the general fell
everyone he could stop, but got no answer from anyone.
Every ten seconds a cannon ball flew compressing the air around, or
everything became clear, and in all corners of Moscow the same things
everything from society and giving nothing in return. You have become
everything!” (He put one arm around Pierre and the other around his
everything in perfect order, only one little thing is lacking, namely,
everything is calculated, and I don’t like that. But Denísov...”
everything may be over for me! All these memories will be no more, none
everything over with, and I happen to be there, I’ll go at once, to
Everything seemed so futile and insignificant in comparison with the
“Everything’s still the same with them,” thought Nicholas,
“Everything’s the same with them. They know nothing about it! Where
everything was becoming more and more happy and animated. “Oh, how I
Everything within and around him seemed confused, senseless, and
every word and movement was described with ecstasy.
evidence of the advantages of attacking that what had been discussed
evident he had reflected on this subject more than once, and he spoke
evidently also felt depressed and constrained with his visitor, “I am
evidently did not realize what they were doing.
evidently expecting him to bow or to step out of his way. Prince Andrew
evidently forced. Not only the guests but even the footmen waiting at
evidently not because he was shaven but because they had never grown.
evidently those in front had halted. All remained where they were in the
evidently weakened, was undertaking nothing.
evidently wished to draw him on.
evidently wishing to give her words a very definite meaning. “I
evil can there be in it if unfortunate people, our serfs, people like
evil. Le prochain—your Kiev peasants to whom you want to do good.”
exactitude, what minuteness, what knowledge of the locality, what
“Exactly, not a hair’s breadth farther,” answered Prince Vasíli,
exalted personages passing in the streets in their elegant carriages
exasperated whisper, evidently meaning to wound his sister.
exasperated with one another and, long after the action had begun on
exceeded twenty thousand rubles. Dólokhov was no longer listening to
excellency!”
excellency... I had no men... your excellency.”
Excellency Prince Vasíli Kurágin and his son, I understand?” she
excellency. Shall I go with some of my hussars to see?” replied
excellent dinners for the officers at every halting place. The regiments
except to Pierre and Hélène, whose presence he seemed not to notice.
excitement and to being unaccustomed to speak of abstract matters in
excitement, rushed toward the drawing room door, probably in order to
exclaimed, and immediately seizing him by the shoulder and looking
excuse his costume.
excuses now! It’s your turn to sing the ba’cawolla—I entweat
executed him—also for some reason. What is bad? What is good? What
existence of such an incomprehensible Being, a Being all-powerful,
expected this.
expeditions to Olmütz to visit a certain Caroline the Hungarian,
experienced a variety of most complex sensations. He felt afraid of what
experience that feeling during those memorable days preceding the battle
explained Prince Andrew. “The others, one’s neighbors, le prochain,
explanation with Nicholas, Sónya twirled about before she left home
exposed, and without fuel or forage, so something must be done, and, as
exposing himself to the first blows of the enemy, for there must be no
expressed disapproval of Dólokhov’s living at their house, and how
expressed his opinion more openly. He shrugged his shoulders when Pierre
expresses his opinion to Kutúzov, to Weyrother, and to the Emperors.
express his opinion as he had hoped to, left on him a vague and uneasy
expressing disapproval and dislike of Kutúzov.
expression and went out again without saying a word. She looked at
expression, looked observantly and sympathetically at the father and
expression of her father’s. His face wore that expression when his
expression she did not understand, and lay down again. He was suffering
expression the sculptor had happened to give the angel’s face, Prince
expression, though many of them knew that what he was saying was a lie
extends along Kobelnitz and Sokolnitz behind the ponds that are there,
extinguished and some spirit lighted, as Pierre knew by the smell, and
extraordinary intelligence, the more so as in the depth of his heart it
eyes.
eyes.
eyes and indicating Hélène with a sorrowful gesture. “Ah, she is
eyes and saw close before him the head and ears of the horse he was
eyes at her sister-in-law.
eyes attracted him irresistibly.
eyes. “But I’ll go to Bezúkhov’s myself. Pierre has arrived, and
eyes fixed on the dark face of a large icon of the Saviour lit by a
“Eyes front!” Then, like the crowing of cocks at sunrise, this was
eyes full of tears and of thoughts, gazing shiningly and imploringly at
eyes grew dim. By the expression of her father’s face, not sad, not
eyes grew moist. “Hurrah!” cried the three hundred voices again,
eyes. He really was in love with the Tsar and the glory of the Russian
eyes he was every day more and more connected with her, that it was
eyes. His shriveled old hands were folded and on the finger of one of
eyes kept closing, and in his fancy appeared—now the Emperor, now
eyes off him. His brother and sisters struggled for the places nearest
eyes rolling as he sang, with his small, husky, but true voice, some
eyes, Rostóv re-entered that world of home and childhood which had no
eyes to complete the show of prisoners, could not fail to attract his
eyes. What she found hardest to bear was to know that on such occasions
face assumed the coarse, unpleasant expression peculiar to him. Shaking
faces. (He distinctly saw an old French officer who, with gaitered
face, shook his head, and going up to him silently kissed him on the
faces of the crew bustling round the guns, from the sight of the blood
face was animated, which, however, did not conceal its sunken and faded
face with Prince Andrew, who came out frowning and looking old. Pierre
faculty, so invaluable in society, of composure and imperturbable
failed him. He was seized by panic and could not go where it was
faint with fear lest the baby should be drowned in the font, and awaited
faire dans cette galère?” * occurred to him, and he began to laugh at
false. He was happy to be seeing him. He knew that he might and even
familiar gallop of coquetry, without any ulterior motive or any
familiar to Rostóv; the other on a beautiful chestnut horse (which
family, but was kept all summer in Moscow by his new duties. Dólokhov
family life continually rose in her imagination. She drove them away and
family’s, and his friends’, and the enemy’s intention to kill him
family, was the most gifted with a capacity to feel any shades of
famous order of the day to General Bennigsen:
fancies.
Farther and farther he rode away, stopping at other regiments, till at
farther into the region where the army was already in action.
farther, probably along the line of the French camp. Rostóv no longer
fastened to the cording of his uniform and, indicating a bandaged arm,
fastening his coat. When he had finished, he turned to Bezúkhov, and
“Faster!” came the word of command, and Rostóv felt Rook’s flanks
fate. It is in your hands.”
father?”
father and Andrew. I shall be so happy when she is his wife. She is so
father and Anna Mikháylovna, that it had something to do with her
“Father! Andrew!”—said the ungraceful, awkward princess with such
father, Count Bezúkhov, and showed them her own box. Princess Hélène
father, he feels for you.”
father... It’s bad....” he reflected, but while he was thinking this
father, muttered in a whisper:
father’s case.
“Father,” she said, “do not turn away from me, let us weep
father’s letter, he returned to the nursery.
father’s nature showed itself in Pierre. He felt the fascination and
father’s room, that huge room in which Count Bezúkhov had died.
father’s room with the good-humored and victorious air natural to
“Father, tell me how it happened,” she asked through her tears.
father to fits of bloodthirsty rage. And when after Pierre’s
father with a laugh.
fault!” and her voice quivered like that of a child about to cry.
fault. What’s he to do if he has such luck?... And it’s not my fault
fear, and the thought that he might be killed or badly wounded never
fear’s all gone, and your only thought is not to let him get away!’
fears nothing so much as a general battle is impossible.”
fear this will oblige one half the army to shoot the other.”
features, gave him a rather comical expression. Bekleshëv and Theodore
Fédya, my dear count; that, believe me, is why I am so fond of you. Few
feeble voice, so high pitched and irresolute. His face grew more and
feel afraid.”
feeling of a hare fleeing from the hounds. One single sentiment, that
feeling of devotion returned to him even more strongly than before. When
feelings. But much as all the rest laughed, talked, and joked, much
feeling; sharing with the young folk of the Rostóvs’ household a
feel that in that place and on that day, it was improper to speak so of
feel,” thought he, “if she saw me here now on this field with the
feet in low shoes, Iogel flew first across the hall with Natásha, who,
feet in their overboots on the table, and began to reflect.
feet into his slippers and his arms into the sleeves of his dressing
feigned—or so it seemed to Rostóv. He put his horse to a trot to
fellow.”
fellow.”
fellow,” he said abruptly and eagerly, “I must confess to having
fellows on the staff who get rewards without doing anything!”
felt a wish to speak to the stranger, but by the time he had made up his
felt coat, stretched his legs, and set his cap straight. The head of the
felt so glad to be free from his own lawlessness and to submit his will
felt the tension of the amorous air in the house, and also noticed a
festive around him. Nearer and nearer to Rostóv came that sun shedding
festive in his air, which, in conjunction with his firm and virile
feverish delirium or drunkenness.
field. Instead of the moving horses and hussars’ backs, he saw nothing
field of Austerlitz, enduring the heedless blows of his left foot and
fields and forests of fir and birch, which were partly cut down. The
field under fire, as he had done at the head of the Kursk regiment at
fifty members of the English Club and fifty guests were awaiting the
fighting army (with the Pávlograds on the right flank of the front);
fighting cocks preparing for battle, each vainly trying to detect signs
fighting hussar who had been under fire.
fighting Russian soldier without connections and intrigues, and to one
figure of Túshin who was sitting cross-legged like a Turk beside him.
final instructions, orders, and commissions to the baggage men
finally there were six thousand rubles for his outfit and various other
finds you to his taste as a daughter-in-law and makes a proposal to you
find the baby. At last he saw him: the rosy boy had tossed about till he
“Fine fellows, the Pávlograds!” remarked the Emperor.
“Fine men!” remarked Napoleon, looking at a dead Russian grenadier,
“Fine young fellow! Fine young fellow!” he said. “Well, come and
finger at him, “I have even heard of your doings in Paris!”
fingers twitched nervously.
fire and pressed it there!”
fired in the air; a third was striking the horse Kutúzov himself rode.
fire, fanned by the breeze, was rapidly spreading. The French columns
fire. From pain, cold, and damp, a feverish shivering shook his whole
fire! Our stories have some weight, not like the stories of those
Fires were lighted and the talk became more audible. Captain Túshin,
firing at Augesd.
firing at the Augesd Dam and was looking at the killed and wounded left
firing in the valley. Not a single muscle of his face—which in those
firing?” Rostóv kept asking as he came up to Russian and Austrian
firing was, he began to look for the general and his staff where they
firmly.
firmly believed in the possibility of the brotherhood of men united in
firmly resolved to answer his father-in-law. Moreover, the words of the
firmness and certainty of his vocation, which radiated from his whole
first because Pierre appeared to his hussar eyes as a rich civilian, the
first of all devote some time to solitude and self-examination and do
first pair of gloves, a man’s, he said that Pierre could not know
first regiment roared “Hurrah!” so deafeningly, continuously, and
fish for this dinner. The count had been a member and on the committee
Five minutes later Princess Mary from her room heard something heavy
fixing his weary eyes on the paper, began to read them with a fixed and
flag let it fall from his hands. It swayed and fell, but caught on the
flank; he knew that all the guns there had been abandoned at the very
flank. In the center Túshin’s forgotten battery, which had managed to
flank now that it is nearly four o’clock and the battle is lost?
flanks was more than six miles, even if the messenger were not killed
flattered by this. Anna Pávlovna arranged the different groups in her
fleeing crowd. A mounted general separated himself from the infantry and
floundering silvery fish in the watering can, on that dam over which for
flower; Natásha, half grown up and half child, was now childishly
flung it away. Tíkhon caught it and handed it to a footman. The little
fluttering above the fire and remembered a Russian winter at his warm,
fluttering in that light. Túshin had not returned, the doctor had not
fly! Gracious me, they did rattle past! It’s time I knew the Imperial
fly upwards. The angel’s upper lip was slightly raised as though
followed by their suites. Kutúzov, affecting the manners of an old
followed proved that the commander in chief at that moment was absorbed
followed was like the first movement of the main wheel of a large tower
following budget:
follows:
“Folly... folly! Death... lies...” he repeated, puckering his face.
food.
foolish as soon as he uttered them, while on the contrary Hippolyte’s
“Fool... or dummy!” he muttered.
foot, and galloped on.
footmen, and awaited each expected dish with some anxiety. Everything
footsteps. Pierre rose and said it was getting late. Prince Vasíli gave
foot, which he was then touching with his own under the clavichord.
for!”
for about a minute.
for a long time, always in the same fog, descending and ascending hills,
For a long time he could not utter a word, so that the Rhetor had to
For a moment he dozed, but in that short interval innumerable things
for an answer. His birth and position in society were not bad. “Well,
for an instant, but there was no second report as he had expected. He
for a seat.
force had already descended into the valley toward the ponds and lakes
force their way through them with bayonets.
forefather Adam to our own times, is that temple reared which is to be
forehead. He went to the cot in confusion, sure that he would find it
forehead, over which was beautiful light-brown hair smelling of pomade.
forehead was moist. Prince Andrew touched the head with his hand; even
foreign cavalry with red epaulets, probably French. He could see nothing
foresight for every eventuality, every possibility even to the smallest
forestall him, threw off his fur coat and ran on tiptoe through the
“Forever?” said Prince Andrew. “Nothing’s forever.”
forget all that.... She says: ‘I shall love him always, but let him be
forget. But, my dear, will you not give us a little hope of touching
forgetting that it was unbecoming for the girls to see men undressed,
“For God’s sake... I can’t walk. For God’s sake!”
forgot them. His head was burning, he felt himself bleeding to death,
forgot the sovereigns’ presence. “Lads, it’s not the first village
for her. When the little princess had grown accustomed to life at Bald
for him, Prince Bagratión sat at dinner, talking with some commanding
for himself. He remembered his mother’s last letter. “What would she
for his life, but for the courage he needed and which he knew would not
for his part tried to pretend to the count that he considered these
for his reply, surrounded him, and led him to the drawing room. It was
for life, but I don’t understand that, I forget quickly.”
formed.
formed a definite idea of what an attack was and were expecting to hear
formed up at intervals, and wheeled round other similar masses of
Formerly in Anna Pávlovna’s presence, Pierre had always felt that
former position after the campaign, had returned to Petersburg and come
former pupil of his.
forming a complete whole with her dress, but all the charm of her body
forming up within twice the range of a musket shot. The general in
for more than anything else in the world, did not know how to approach
For more than a week preparations were being made, rough drafts of
for my sake! Did you know?”
for negligence or inefficiency so staggered him that, forgetting the
for Petersburg alone.
for Prince Andrew.
for that. Yes, for that alone! I shall never tell anyone, but, oh God!
for the aged? And is it not a palpable, unquestionable good if a
for the future, Pierre’s journeys and occupations, the war, and so
for the hussars to retreat with the infantry. They were cut off from
“For the last time I say to you—turn all your attention upon
for the most part handsome fellows and, as is always the case in an
for themselves.
for the next battle are planned by him alone. Nominally he is only an
for these simple, kindly people.
for the society of ladies, began to come often to the house, and the
for the tenth time, Molière’s words: “Mais que diable allait-il
for this failure, the enemy placed ten guns to the right of the village
for trees and gullies for men and continually discovering his mistakes.
fortune. Suddenly he heard a familiar voice repeating something to him a
For two days after that Rostóv did not see Dólokhov at his own or at
forty paces’ distance nothing could be seen. For three minutes all had
for us. The field marshal looks on and waits for letters addressed
forward, and experienced great happiness.
“Forward, lads!” he shouted in a voice piercing as a child’s.
forward. Of Bolkónski, nothing was said, and only those who knew him
forward toward the old man with a forced and timid smile.
“Forward, with God!” said Bagratión, in a resolute, sonorous voice,
forward with unnatural speed but yet stayed on the same spot. From
“For what have you come hither?” asked the newcomer, turning in
for wine.
for your neighbor? Have you ever thought of your tens of thousands
found a kind of tantalizing satisfaction.
found out, nothing discovered,” Pierre again said to himself. “All
found the count with it in his hand, sobbing and laughing at the same
found the Prussian army. Borís, speaking with deliberation, told them
“Fo’ward, with God, lads!” rang out Denísov’s voice. “At a
français,” said Dolgorúkov, with grave satisfaction. “Good,
frankly, I don’t want to. I am speaking of the staff in general.”
freedom and told her that one way or another he would never cease to
free.’ Isn’t that lovely and noble! Yes, very noble? Isn’t it?”
Freemasonry presented itself to him.
free, so lighthearted! And I did not realize how happy I was! When did
French!”
French colonel who had been taken prisoner by our dragoons. Our officers
French column, with its officers leading, appeared from below the hill.
French, he did not know. There was no one near.
Frenchman also stopped and took aim. Rostóv closed his eyes and stooped
Frenchman remembers his bayonet and stabs him....”
Frenchmen, and though but a moment before he had been galloping to get
French pronunciation which she could allow herself when conversing with
French, smoke appeared all along their uneven ranks, and musket shots
French to pass him, had made a bayonet charge with two battalions and
French) to Prince Vasíli. “It’s not as at Annette’s * receptions
French to suppose that here—in the center—the main Russian forces
French troops who are being raised in France will join us, and the peace
French were putting out the fire which the wind was spreading, and thus
Frenchwoman very readily and, looking at her with a smile, talked to her
fresh and pretty face yet more attractive.
fresh anecdotes were heard of individual examples of heroism shown by
freshness, an unconsciousness of her own powers, and an as yet untrained
“Fr... fr...” snorted Prince Bolkónski. “The prince is making a
friend Bolkónski, whom he had not seen for two years.
friend, but Nicholas avoided him. With that peculiar feeling of youth,
friends had pledged themselves in an indissoluble alliance to uphold
“Friendship laughs at distance,” began Prince Vasíli in his usual
friend’s look was now still more clearly expressed in the smile
fright were amused by Pierre’s lisp and the new words they had not
from actions which would torment him afterwards.”
“‘From all my riding,’ he writes to the Emperor, ‘I have got a
From all sides reports reach me,” etc.
From all sides were heard the footsteps and talk of the infantry, who
from behind still came the shouts: “Onto the ice, why do you stop? Go
from Denísov, rode past too, at the rear of his squadron—that is,
From early morning strenuous activities and efforts had begun and by ten
From early morning the smart clean troops were on the move, forming up
from headquarters behind the village to the left, and thither Rostóv
from him, and Rostóv felt as in a dream that he continued to be carried
from him, though she knew that already, and remarked that they might
from his cheek. Prince Andrew forced his way to him.
from his horse in a pool of blood. Nobody gave him a look or thought of
from his son.
from home, at dinners, parties, and balls.
from Másha, the lady’s maid, the necessary report of how handsome the
from my heart as to an old acquaintance.”
from Pétenka—he took part in it—and it’s all true. When
From that day the eldest princess quite changed toward Pierre and began
from the army to Sergéy Kuzmích, in which the Emperor said that he was
from the crumpled heap under the table would save him, now counted the
From the deafening sounds of his own guns around him, the whistle and
“From the direction, it must be the enemy,” repeated Rostóv.
From the direction of Olmütz in front of them, a group was seen
from the drawing room.
from the field of battle with the pale and terrified Ober-Hofmarschal
from the hints contained in his letter and given by the little princess,
from the masses around them, the smoke and the increasing fog, to see
from the theater, had had supper and were grouped round the clavichord.
from the wood, mustered the men who were woodcutting, and, allowing the
from this distressful life, and leads it to its place of recompense and
from understanding—how am I to put it?—I am afraid my way of looking
from which occasional puffs were blown by an invisible smoker.
from which spectacles have just been removed, had also a frightened and
from which the shouting came. He felt both frightened and pleased to be
front.
front and back. Her bust, which had always seemed like marble to Pierre,
front line, as if their differences would be settled there amongst the
front of the infantry, who had to wait.
front of the ranks. Suddenly one shot after another rang out from the
front of us.
frowning.
frowning and silent.
frowning and taking his daughter’s hand; he did not kiss her, but only
    * Frühstück: breakfast.
fugitives returned, the battalions re-formed, and the French who had
fulfill the one which enjoined every Mason to set an example of moral
fulfill Thy will?” And scarcely had she put that question than God
full speed. Rostóv, fearing to be crushed or swept into the attack on
furies and rages at everyone and everything, seizes the letters, opens
furlough after Christmas to return with him to their regiment. His
gaily.
Galicia he had managed to deal with the Grand Duke when the latter
galloped up to Kutúzov and asked in the Emperor’s name had the fourth
galloping toward him. They were our Uhlans who with disordered
gasping voice. “Where are we? In Moscow, I know. I don’t matter,
gathered round Nicholas in the sitting room.
gave her the answer in her own heart. “Desire nothing for thyself,
gave no answer, she left the room.
gave us time to retreat. The retirement of the center to the other side
gave zest to his pleasures. He spent the greater part of his time away
Gavríl to pay a sleigh driver, his kissing Sónya on the sly—he now
gazed at his delicate fingers which rapidly twirled by its corners
gaze drooped his eyes sadly and again took to twirling his snuffbox.
general attention, and Anna Pávlovna felt that the novelty she had
‘General Bonaparte.’”
general conclusion which he had arrived at from his interview with
general conversation.
general engagement in which he was taking part, more than that, he was
general expanded his chest and rode, frowning, beside him to the
general grumbled at his wife when she asked how his leg was. “Oh, the
general, in Russian, speaking with the French intonation he affected
generally do describe it, that is, as they would like it to have been,
generally happens to the narrators of cavalry attacks had not happened
general movement; that something was constantly expected of him, that if
general roar.
generals.
generals. But one could not tell from that significant look whether he
generals in full parade uniforms, with their thin or thick waists drawn
generals in the crowded hut, feeling embarrassed as he always was by the
generals were saying.
general who had served blamelessly for twenty-two years, flushed by a
general who, watch in hand, was saying it was time they started as all
gentle childlike smile, and Hélène smiled too.
gentleman—evidently not sharing Borís’ conception of the advantages
Gentleman of the Bedchamber, which at that time conferred the status of
gentleman,” said the postmaster, entering the room followed by another
gentlemen changed his position on seeing Borís. The one who was writing
“Gentlemen, I thank you all; all arms have behaved heroically:
“Gentlemen,” said Dólokhov after he had dealt for some time.
“Gentlemen, the dispositions for tomorrow—or rather for today, for
gentleness and affection. He could not refuse the post, or rather the
“Gently, gently! Can’t you do it more gently?” said the Emperor
German—I congratulate him! I can’t make out what the commander at
Germans.
Germans, and everyone was convinced that a dangerous muddle had been
Germans’ muddling! What stupid devils!”
get married. What about you? That’s what I want to know.”
“Get onto the ice, over the ice! Go on! Turn! Don’t you hear? Go
getting up and speaking in a muffled and guttural voice.
girl,” he sometimes said to himself “she never makes a mistake,
girls and avoiding their eyes.
girls’ voices came from the adjoining room. The door was opened a
girl would be decided that evening. The visitors were seated at supper.
“Give him a seat,” said Túshin. “Lay a cloak for him to sit on,
give no opinion on such an important government order, and Berg laughed
given receptions) now hardly let a day go by without having an evening
given to raise recruits, ten men in every thousand for the regular army,
giving the messenger a significant look.
“Glad to do our best!” shouted the soldiers.
glad, very glad indeed, that my brother has distinguished himself so.
glance became more animated as his conclusions became more hopeless.
glanced angrily at Berg, then, meeting his eyes, hid his face behind the
glanced at Berg with a smile.
glances without coloring, but even the old countess and Natásha blushed
glancing at Prince Vasíli and at her father with her beautiful eyes.
glancing into the drawing room, where he saw Véra and his mother with
glass.
glass. Letting her arms fall helplessly, she sat with downcast eyes and
glass of vodka and the dinner; and the staff officer with the signet
glide across that lofty infinite sky! How was it I did not see that
gloom, but a dark sea swelling and gradually subsiding after a storm.
glorious task for which he was chosen. I shall await your most gracious
go.
“Go across to our hosts: they invited you,” added Borís.
“Go and choose Denísov. He is a real dancer, a wonder!” he said.
go and tell Lise.”
God!” And without noticing that he was singing, to strengthen the si
God be with him,” thought he, relishing his own goodness of heart,
“God be with you, general!” said the Emperor.
“Go, dear,” said Princess Mary.
“God is merciful....”
“God is merciful, birdie.”
“God is merciful, doctors are never needed,” she said.
God,” Pierre went round the table and saw a large open box filled
God,” said Pierre, regretfully and with an effort, feeling it
God, without Whose care not a hair of man’s head can fall?
“Go! Go! Killed in battle, where the best of Russian men and
“Go!” he repeated, amazed at himself and glad to see the look of
going on, but strain his attention as he would he could not understand
going on in front. Whether all the enemy forces were, as we supposed,
going straight on through the conservatory, neither seeing nor hearing
going. The Emperor was wounded, the battle lost. It was impossible to
go into that. But consider the position in which you are placing her and
“Go, my dear fellow, and see whether the third division has passed the
gone, Pierre did not go to bed or order horses but paced up and down
“Gone to bed?” asked the prince.
“Gone to bed,” replied the voice of Demyán the house steward, who
good as to look at the map and listen.” Langeron lifted his eyes with
“Good-by, my dear fellow,” said Túshin. “Dear soul! Good-by, my
good gifts? Are you content with yourself and with your life?”
good-natured, sincere, and animated levity. “But you see... another
good old days. Denísov, flushed after the mazurka and mopping himself
“Good!” said the Rhetor quickly, apparently satisfied with
good thing really.”
“Go on! Go on! Give it them!” he mentally exclaimed at these sounds,
goot to come to ze front and see dat zis position iss no goot? I don’t
go? That way is nearer.”
“Go!” the quivering voice repeated. And Prince Vasíli had to go
go there anyhow and I have already spoken to him about you. We shall
got into bed, all kept awake a long time that night.
“Go, Tit! Thresh a bit!”
“Go, Tit, thresh a bit!” said the wag.
go to him himself, and tell him what ought to be done in a tone of
gown, he went to the couch on which he slept.
“Gracious heavens! The young count!” he cried, recognizing his
grandfather called him). The baby Prince Nicholas lived with his wet
Grand! Look at the smoke, the smoke!” exclaimed the artillerymen,
“‘Grant leave to retire to his country seat to an old man who is
grant.” Nor did he say to himself: “Pierre is a rich man, I must
grant rewards, and he was himself often surprised at the rapidity of his
grateful for the benefits conferred on them. Everywhere were receptions,
grateful look, but was still expectant and looking for someone. The old
grave, moment I did not tell you the whole truth. I think there is no
gray everyday dress. Now please, do it for my sake. Katie,” she said
grayish color.
great; all he could hear was: “ahahah!” and “rrrr!”
great deal from the deceased,” said Prince Vasíli to him, handing him
greater reasons.”
great man! Let us drink to his health and to the certain defeat of the
great many officers like him were always coming there and that everybody
greatness....”
greatness, the unimportance of life which no one could understand, and
greeting was riding quickly. When the soldiers of the regiment in front
grew still kinder. The younger sisters also became affectionate to him,
grew still louder and merged into a general roar that only an army
groans, which seemed to melt into one with the darkness of the night.
ground like cliffs and slopes. Anywhere, on any side, one might
ground ten paces apart to mark the barrier. It was thawing and misty; at
grow imperceptibly from the cradle to manhood, did not exist for the
growing ever stronger and fuller and merging into a deafening roar.
growing excited. “What about your son, your sister, and your
grown furious, now at Borís, now at Bolkónski. “Yes, many stories!
Guard and line regiments, Russian and Austrian. Among them were grooms
Guards?” asked Napoleon.
Guards charged, followed the line of reserves, going far round the place
Guards passed Rostóv before he heard them shout, “Hurrah!” and
Guards. Prince Andrew came up to him and took his hand.
Guards, that they not only did not wish to, but simply could not, be
Guards, wearing a cocked hat with its peaks front and back, with his
guessing Rostóv’s thought.
guest of honor and hero of the Austrian campaign, Prince Bagratión, to
guest. “Poor girl, she’s devilish ugly!” thought Anatole.
guidance. The universal experience of ages, showing that children do
gun, a horse), from the sight of all these things a fantastic world of
gunner with his shako knocked awry, pulling one end of a mop while
guns. On the contrary, the energetic action of that battery led the
guns on the hillock.
guns smashed, and no supports at all.”
habit of ridiculing the Masonic beliefs—“I am afraid I am very far
habit of walking, had been swept: the marks of the broom were still
had accumulated at the sight of all that was being done in the army.
had also convinced the sovereign Emperors of.
had always seemed to him that he really was very kind and intelligent.
had a splendid march. You know, of course, that His Imperial Highness
had been added to Mademoiselle Bourienne’s toilet which rendered her
had been carried out and in what state were the serfs whom God had
had been decided to advance immediately and give battle to Bonaparte.
had been doing, as though it were all an old-time story, and he listened
had been got ready for him, glancing now and then at the newcomer, who,
had been increased by a half. And so Pierre was delighted with his visit
had been insulted through his daughter. The insult was the more pointed
had been killed at the beginning of the engagement and within an hour
had been killed or not and whether the cannon had been captured or
had broken up the French troops.
had come into Pierre’s room after the funeral. With drooping eyes
had crossed that line and not only was there nothing terrible, but
had driven the old prince to town returned bringing papers and letters
had entered and left the town with their bands playing, and by the Grand
had entered. The most solemn mystery in the world continued its course.
had first learned to say “pear” and then “granny,” that this son
had first seen the enemy and fired the first shot, and that the corner
had fixed on that number because forty-three was the sum of his and
had followed, and only the heavens promised peace. Toward morning
had followed him like an eagle, three steps at a time. Having received
had grown so dark that one could not distinguish the uniforms ten paces
had had to retreat and had made their withdrawal in perfect order. The
had happened to him, but could not do so. Such a storm of feelings,
had happened. What had happened? Nothing. He had merely understood that
had heard that a rumor of his duel had reached the Emperor and that it
Had he repented of his unbelief? Was he now there? There in the realms
had instantly noticed her brother’s condition. But, though she noticed
had killed five Frenchmen, a third had loaded five cannon singlehanded.
had left Paris and how he had liked that city. Anatole answered the
had never been to blame, might be held responsible at headquarters
had no connection with the matter in hand. His haggard face was yellow.
had not been time to move. The Emperor, surrounded by his suite
had not known it I should not have addressed you. Your view of life is a
had not left Prince Vasíli’s and felt with terror that in people’s
had not told all and that there was something in his feelings for the
had not yet begun. Not wishing to agree to Dolgorúkov’s demand to
had prevailed. She drew her brother’s attention to the maid who was
had read, and listened to what was passing in the nursery. Suddenly he
had read thus far, he crumpled the letter up and threw it away. It was
had revealed to him. A week after his arrival, the young Polish count,
had ridden up to him in a violent passion, shouting: “Arnauts!”
had seemed as extraordinary to her as if there had never existed the
had sent in good time to Moscow for a doctor and were expecting him at
had slept badly that night, those around him reported. The cause of this
had sunk, her lip was drawn up, and her eyes drawn down.
had the ear of the company.
had then said.
“Had there been no Bagratión, it would have been necessary to
hairs painfully in the knot. Then he drew his face down, kissed him, and
ha!” laughed Prince Bolkónski, and Anatole laughed still louder.
Half an hour later, the Rhetor returned to inform the seeker of the
half-closed eyes he looked at Rostóv, bowed slightly and wearily, and
halfway. Fine orders!” was being repeated on different sides.
hall all sat waiting, silently and alert. In the outlying serfs’
“Hallo, Gwíska—my pipe!” came Vasíli Denísov’s husky voice.
hall, where Denísov was sitting on the same chair by the clavichord
halted. Prince Andrew was behind, among the immense number forming the
halted, the Austrian argued that not he, but the higher command, was to
handed him, smiled at Dólokhov’s words, and with a sinking heart,
handful of scoundrels. It will soon be over, it can’t be that, it
hand he held carefully back, because he wished to support his right
hand in passing and draw it downwards, or absent-mindedly hold out his
handkerchief, and pipe.
handkerchief to his wounded cheek and pointing to the fleeing soldiers.
hand, lay Prince Andrew Bolkónski bleeding profusely and unconsciously
hand, rode up smiling to the Emperor to congratulate him on the victory.
hands and occasionally ran his eyes over the score against him. He had
hands asking for their blessing, and that he kissed Véra, Natásha, and
hands, he looked more closely at the ring, with its skull—a Masonic
hands high, shied, throwing back its ears; but the pockmarked Guardsman
handsome, happy young face, he experienced a feeling of tenderness
handsome open face of the man who might perhaps be her husband absorbed
hands that are unclean.” While the Grand Master said these last words
hands. Then, sighing, he added: “My son’s fate is in your hands.
hands which show the time, so the result of all the complicated human
hand to his ear toward Weyrother, with the air of a man absorbed in
hand with it and knew he must not do so. Having advanced six paces and
handwriting. On receiving it, he ran on tiptoe to his study in alarm and
hanged,” said Prince Andrew with a smile. “So I am serving because
    * “Hang these Russians!”
happened, he was said to be insanely jealous and subject like his
happened to you in Moscow was a misfortune.”—“I regret it very
happening in front of him. Nesvítski with an angry face, red and unlike
happen!” she said, looking at herself in the glass. “How shall I
happen to them when they were free, but he insisted, though reluctantly,
happiest, merriest times for him and the whole family. Nicholas brought
happiness and of children, but her strongest, most deeply hidden longing
happiness), feeling the eager bustle around him, and hearing the fitful
happiness or peace of mind. Can anything in the world make her or me
happiness possible, and that is just what you want to deprive him of.
happiness. The old princess sighed sadly as she offered some wine to the
happy and smiling. Véra was playing chess with Shinshín in the drawing
happy world of his own. She fancied a child, her own—such as she had
hard.... For ages, from our forefather Adam to our own day, we labor to
Hardly had Prince Andrew started than he stopped him.
“Hardly,” said Bagratión. “I saw them this evening on that
harnessed and packed the wagons and tied on the loads. The adjutants and
“Has anything come from Andrew?” she asked.
has blundered looks at an examiner.
has come down to us from the remotest ages, even from the first man—a
has his stand, and there’s Zakhár himself and still the same horse!
has proposed to Sónya!”
hastening her steps. “You young ladies should not know anything about
haste, trying to escape notice, closed the door, and began to read the
“Has the snow been shoveled back?”
hast thou denied?” he suddenly asked with exulting austerity and
have been as good as Weyrother’s, but for the disadvantage that
have been difficult to stop that crowd, it was even impossible not to
have certainly acquired a taste for war, and it is just as well for me;
have dared to say so, knew it and blushed scarlet every time Dólokhov
have done the same!...” thought Princess Mary.
Have just this moment received by special messenger very joyful
have killed so many that there’d have been a heap of them.”
have liked to sympathize with what Pierre was saying, but could not.
have obliged me to give this refusal.”
Have received another letter about the Preussisch-Eylau battle
have said. And he was still more angry at having omitted to say it. He
have seen how he said it! I know he did not mean to say it, but it came
“Have some brought from the reserve,” said Napoleon, and having gone
have stayed longer.”
have the carriage to drive to town:
have the courier horses. It was plain that he was lying and only wanted
have to go in and ask the princesses; and from there go on to the
have to prove to them what he had not merely convinced himself of, but
have virtuous aims,” said Pierre, feeling ashamed of the inadequacy
   Have we not Bagratión?
“Have you?” he said. “Well, how did it go?”
having become entangled in the saddle. Where our men were, and where the
Having by a great effort got away to the left from that flood of men,
having convinced himself that he was asleep, took up a paper and in
Having descended the hill at a trot, he no longer saw either our own or
Having disentangled his leg, he rose. “Where, on which side, was now
Having entered the courtyard of a large house where the Lodge had its
Having galloped safely through the French, he reached a field behind
having given orders to his company, sent a soldier to find a dressing
Having given several more orders, he was about to go to his “little
Having led him about ten paces, Willarski stopped.
Having left that soldier who was evidently drunk, Rostóv stopped the
Having lifted her head and let her arms droop lifelessly, as ballet
having mounted drew himself up very straight and tall and rode to the
Having passed the Guards and traversed an empty space, Rostóv, to avoid
having passed Uvárov’s cavalry he clearly heard the sound of cannon
Having reached the left flank, instead of going to the front where the
having rested after yesterday’s march, were sitting, clean and neatly
having said this laughed. Everyone turned toward him.
Having said this, Napoleon rode on to meet Marshal Lannes, who, hat in
head and at the little arms and legs which showed under the blanket. He
head. As he rode up to the camp he thought how he would impress Borís
head cook, about asparagus, fresh cucumbers, strawberries, veal, and
he added: “But beware, dear brother, that these gloves do not deck
he added that Prince Vasíli was also there. When Tíkhon came to her
head in perplexity—perhaps because the banner really interested him,
head, laughing with an officer who had sat down beside him. A third was
headlong after Anna Mikháylovna and, dashing at her, flung herself on
headlong speed with no time to consider what this movement might lead
head, pulled it off, and showed the blood congealed on his hair.
headquarters, and having ascended a dark staircase, they entered a small
headquarters. But on the afternoon of that day, this activity reached
headquarters in the morning and had started the whole movement that
headquarters was still under the spell of the day’s council, at which
head (the pains had just left her). Strands of her black hair lay round
health?”
health of our Sovereign, the Emperor!” he roared, “Hurrah!” and
health was drunk, Pierre, lost in thought, did not rise or lift his
healthy body, and all the affection and care of his family. “And why
he always thought only of whatever he was engaged on.
heard.”
heard, and again something in his face twitched—“That is just why
heard, and out of the foggy darkness the figure of a sergeant of hussars
heard a rustle behind him and a shadow appeared under the curtain of
heard before, others simply enjoyed hearing how the master talked, while
heard curses on Bonaparte, “the enemy of mankind.” Militiamen and
heard distinctly.
heard musket fire quite close in front of him and behind our troops,
heard them, and we shall all do our duty. But before a battle, there is
heard the quick rustle of the countess’ dress. She came up to them.
heard the words as he might have heard the buzzing of a fly. Not only
heard this Sónya blushed so that tears came into her eyes and, unable
heard, your honor, that a minister is coming to visit your honor.”
hearers—who like himself had often heard stories of attacks and had
hearing or understanding her own words, what she had told hundreds of
Hearing that cry and seeing to whom it was addressed, Nesvítski and the
hearing these words her face changed and something brightened in her
hearing with pleasure the whistle of bullets evidently aimed at him.
heart in the presence of the unfathomable did not lessen but increased.
“He asked you, and Vasíli Dmítrich * is also going.”
heated horses, exchanging remarks and smiling, had stopped behind the
“Heaven knows what a fright might do.”
He began pacing the room. The screaming ceased, and a few more seconds
He began the rescript again and again, but as soon as he uttered
   He brings foemen to their knees,... etc.
He came to the point at once, treating her ceremoniously.
he can’t help plowing and mowing; if he didn’t, he would go to the
he chanced to meet Dólokhov’s handsome insolent eyes, Pierre felt
He checked himself, fearing to seem naïve, yet he felt an irresistible
he clutched at his head. “Who is going to get me the flowers? Dmítri!
he consoled himself. “And besides, what have I done to bring it about?
He continued to pace the room, looking gloomily at Denísov and the
he could from a Frenchman into the wood. Besides, to tell everything as
He could not look calmly at the standards of the passing battalions.
He could see puffs of musketry smoke that seemed to chase one another
he described the whole campaign with a fearless self-censure and
he did not do it he would grieve and disappoint many people, but if he
(he did not even dare to dream of that), but simply to die before his
He did not find Prince Andrew in Olmütz that day, but the appearance of
he did not look at them: he looked only at what was going on in front
He did not regain consciousness till late in the day, when with other
He did not reply.
He did not see, hear, or understand anything clearly. Only now and
he did not see him and had no opportunity of seeing him, he often spoke
He discussed estate affairs every day with his chief steward. But
He drew back and a real tear appeared in his eye.
He embraced his daughter, and then again Pierre, and kissed him with his
He enlivened the whole party. The wax candles burned brightly, the
He entered the drawing room with his usual alert step, glancing rapidly
“He exists, but to understand Him is hard,” the Mason began again,
he felt himself to be. At the right beat of the music he looked sideways
He felt that at a single word from that man all this vast mass (and he
he felt that this did not forward matters at all. He felt that these
He filled the girls’ albums with verses and music, and having at last
he. “Fine, very fine! You have done up your hair in this new way for
He finished and, getting up, embraced and kissed Pierre, who, with tears
he, going to the door and looking into the nursery.
he got his wound. This pleased Rostóv and he began talking about it,
he had been ordered to look for the commander in chief, he could not,
He had evidently not slept that night. He looked about distractedly and
he had lain there some time, he was told to get up, and a white leather
he had left. All the others let him go, and he ran to her. When they
he had left Petersburg, and wrote enthusiastic letters to his
he had not thought about it until that moment. The officers’ laughter
He had often before, during the last six weeks, remained alone with her,
He had Pierre at hand in Moscow and procured for him an appointment as
he had ridden about two miles and had passed the last of the Russian
he had said absent-mindedly: “Yes, she’s good looking,” he had
he had to do, not with fools, but with men who could teach him something
he had too long been thinking of so painfully to the exclusion of all
He half rose, meaning to go round, but the aunt handed him the snuffbox,
“He has been set down. He died,” replied someone.
“He has forty thousand men at most,” replied Weyrother, with the
“He has perspired,” said Prince Andrew.
He hated her and was forever sundered from her. Despite Denísov’s
he heard some French spoken he at once began speaking to the officers,
“He higher iss dan I in rank,” said the German colonel of the
he himself was pining for the dear princess, and how she showed him the
He imagined himself as an enormously tall, powerful man who was throwing
He imagined men such as he had himself been a fortnight ago, and he
He implored Rostóv to go on and prepare her.
He involuntarily remembered how Dólokhov, who had fully recovered his
heiress in the same way. All this might, he thought, turn out very well
“He is a man in a gray overcoat, very anxious that I should call
“He is a nervous, bilious subject,” said Larrey, “and will not
“He is a very, very nice, honest, and pleasant fellow,” answered
“He is not to be apprehended by reason, but by life,” said the
“He is one of the most remarkable, but to me most unpleasant of
He jumped up at the sound of her light step.
He knew no one, and despite his smart Guardsman’s uniform, all these
He knew this at that moment as surely as if he had been standing at the
“He knows of course what this loss means to me. He can’t want my
he lacked that strength of will which he had known in himself and really
he. “Laughing at us old fellows!”
he lay down on the leather sofa in front of a round table, put his big
He lay down on the sofa meaning to fall asleep and forget all that
held. All the commanders of columns were summoned to the commander in
held it below her waist.
held it till evening and have gone in to dinner with it) and drew his
held the hand of his betrothed in silence, looking at her beautiful
He leaned his whole massive body across the table.
He left the room and went to the waiting room where Alpátych stood with
Hélène.”
Hélène, and that thought both alarmed him, as if some obligation were
“Hélène!” he said aloud and paused.
Hélène nor she at him. But she was just as terribly close to him. He
Hélène raised her voice and became more and more excited, “A man
Hélène sat silently side by side almost at the bottom of the table, a
Hélène. “Separate! That’s a thing to frighten me with!”
Hélène’s face became terrible, she shrieked and sprang aside. His
Hélène’s hand several times. After a while they were left alone
Hélène smiled, with a look implying that she did not admit the
Hélène’s presence (as a lover should be), but had not yet proposed
Hélène still sat talking just as before.
Hélène, then she turned to Pierre with the same words of welcome
Hélène turned to Pierre with the beautiful bright smile that she gave
He listened and heard the sound of approaching horses, and voices
He looked intently and inquiringly into his friend’s eyes, evidently
he looked very grim he said nothing to anyone.
help being aware of it, just as we cannot renew an illusion we have once
“Help comes from God alone,” he said, “but such measure of help as
“Help him up. Sit down, dear fellow, sit down! Spread out the cloak,
helplessly on the sofa.
helplessly spread out, stood with his broad chest directly facing
help, would inform her.
he made himself when going into battle, and he was more amiable to the
he made up his mind that Prince Andrew had been killed, and though he
he marked the figures in his clear, bold hand.
he meant to do, and abandoning herself to him followed his lead hardly
he might be, did not expect. He was so used to submitting to Prince
He might... not only might but should, have gone up to the sovereign. It
He moved as if to rise. The generals bowed and retired. It was past
“He must first receive the trowel,” whispered one of the brothers.
He must think that I, too, am afraid of him—and in fact I am afraid of
he need only have bent his head a little to have touched them. He was
he needs money for food; the man said an officer had once given him a
He opened his eyes and looked up. The black canopy of night hung less
he passed it. Pierre began to feel a sense of uneasiness, and the
He paused a little while.
He paused, and just as he was about to say something more, another ball
He paused and sighed, evidently trying to calm himself.
He paused, his gaze still on Pierre, and moved aside on the sofa by way
He quickly entered the small reception room with its still-unplastered
her.
her already,” he said, evidently trying to entertain a visitor with
her and about to crush her was some terrible misfortune, the worst
her and for himself, and in a nervously emotional and softened mood he
her as a distant beauty far removed from him, as he had seen her every
her beauty and her remarkable skill in appearing silently dignified in
her because you must, and that wouldn’t do at all.”
her companions’ not having the least conception that it could be
“Here at least we shall have the benefit of your company all to
here,” came the voice of an hussar, past whom Rostóv was riding in
he reeled and sank on the snow.
he reflected, “there is no riding round it now. I must look for the
“Here he is at last!” shouted Rostóv. “And Berg too! Oh, you
“Here he is... our own... Kólya, * dear fellow... How he has
here is now settled, and I ought to have been off long ago. Here is
“Here it is! The decisive moment has arrived. My turn has come,”
“Here it is!” thought he, seizing the staff of the standard and
here I’ve brought the prince’s wedding candles to light before his
He remembered his honeymoon and blushed at the recollection.
He remembered the expression Dólokhov’s face assumed in his moments
here on Friday.”
here, run away, bury myself somewhere?” passed through his mind. But
“Here’s to the health of lovely women, Peterkin—and their
her eyes became serious. At that moment she was oblivious of her
her eyes off him, and smiling and holding her breath. He gave her a
Her eyes were smiling expectantly, her downy lip rose and remained
her face, and then immediately he saw beside her Dólokhov’s handsome,
Her fate was decided and happily decided. But what her father had said
Her favorite sonata bore her into a most intimately poetic world and
her foot into the other. Sónya, when he came in, was twirling round and
her friend as if she did not consider her worthy to hear what she meant
Her glittering eyes, filled with childlike fear and excitement, rested
her handkerchief too. Pierre was kissed, and he kissed the beautiful
her heart. Happy the man who wins her! With her the least worldly of men
her. How often when considering her character I have told myself that
her in five minutes before and, despite the fixed eyes and the pallor of
her inflamed and perspiring cheeks, her charming rosy mouth with its
her little nephew as best she could. Mademoiselle Bourienne, too, seemed
her mother, quite excited.
her neck as soon as she overtook her in the sitting room.
hero himself with his paltry vanity and joy in victory appear,
her—please don’t! It is too painful for her!”
her, Rostóv thought, but just now there were so many other pleasures
her?” said the old prince angrily. “What an idea! I’m ready for it
her seducer when she loved him?” he thought. “God could not have put
herself! Glad to throw her father over! And she knew I should notice
herself in a white satin dressing gown embroidered with silver and with
her sufferings or with their relief. The pangs began again and Mary
her sympathy for Pierre, but by involuntary intonations and a half smile
her—thou or you?”
Her voice sounded so serious and so sad that the chirping of the birds
her white teeth. She met Prince Vasíli with that playful manner often
her with perfect sincerity, and with the naïve and firm conviction
he said. “Perhaps you are right for yourself,” he added after
He said something more, but Rostóv did not wait to hear it and rode
“He’s arrived!”
he saw French cannon and French troops on the Pratzen Heights just where
he saw turrets and a church. What need to hurry? What was he now to say
he saw which way the wind was blowing, and his low opinion changed into
“He’s dead—why carry him?” said another.
He shaved and scented himself with the care and elegance which had
he shouted, “and then I shall reserve the right to state my opinion
he shrugged his shoulders and raised his hand to the kerchief, as if
hesitating voice. “I thank you. I agree with all you have said. But
hesitation and uncertainty among his conductors. He heard those around
(He smiled ironically.) “But even if he also took up a position in
he spread a map on the table. “All eventualities have been foreseen.
He still had all the letters in his hand. Opening them mechanically he
He stopped and remained silent for a long time.
he stopped short on his heels, stood so a second, stamped on the spot
he sung a second, a third below the high note. “Ah, God! How fine! Did
“He’s very young to come to meddle with us.”
he thought out his plans beforehand he could not have been so natural
he thought, stopping for a moment with a sinking heart, and then
He took the pistol in his hand and began asking about the working of the
He touched his horse and having called Milorádovich, the commander of
He tried to say more, but faltered.
he unhooked his saber. He came out from behind the chairs, clasped his
he was admitted to the Emperor, and an hour later he rode off with
He was evidently so busy that he even forgot to be polite to the
He was flushed and bathed in perspiration, though the room was not hot.
he was in contact with the springs that set in motion the enormous
He was joyfully planning this new life, when Prince Vasíli suddenly
He was pleased at the gratitude he received, but felt abashed at
he was proud to be at the head of such a nation and would endeavor to be
He was riding almost along the front line. A handful of men came
he was riding was one he had bought from a Cossack during the campaign,
he was sent away. Hippolyte is her brother... Prince Vasíli is her
he was sent. This was the brilliant charge of the Horse Guards that
He was singing in passionate tones, gazing with his sparkling
He was thinking that Prince Andrew was unhappy, had gone astray, did not
he was told in Russian, German, and Czech by the crowd of fugitives who
he was told that he would now see the lesser light. The bandage was
he was to wear at the meetings, and finally of the third, a pair of
he went forward uneasily over the rough field with the awkward gait of
he went nowhere and spent whole days in reading Thomas à Kempis, whose
He went over his vices in his mind, not knowing to which of them to give
He went straight up to Prince Vasíli.
He went to his bed, drew a purse from under the clean pillow, and sent
he will hit me in the head, or elbow, or knee. Can’t I go away from
He wished to explain to Dolgorúkov a plan of attack he had himself
He wished to take a decision, but felt with dismay that in this matter
He woke up and looked round for a while with a startled expression,
he wondered as he got up: and at that moment he felt that something
he would certainly be taken prisoner. Kutúzov remained in the same
he would expand his chest, raise his head, and rejoice at his good
he would have been mentioned among the officers found on the field of
he would have done at that moment had Hélène not fled from the room.
he would into that foggy distance: now something gleamed gray, now there
he would rush through the whole suite of rooms without drawing breath,
He would say a lot of pleasant things, ask you to dinner” (“That
he would slap in the face before the Emperor. Suddenly a distant shout
hidden by dense mist. Having given orders in the commander in chief’s
higher ground it was clearing, but nothing could be seen of what was
high—I always said....”
highly honored guest, took possession of him as it were, without waiting
Highness,” and pointing to the Grand Duke who with his high shoulders
Hills, she took a special fancy to Mademoiselle Bourienne, spent whole
him.
him.
him.
him all the way. He thought angrily of the pleasure he would have at
him a look of stern inquiry, as though what Pierre had just said was
him and did not stop but rode on and on, continually mistaking bushes
him and Hélène. “Well, what of it, if you all know it?” thought
him and he was at once blindfolded again.
him, and only as he kissed her hand on taking leave said unexpectedly
him and she wished and tried to please him as much as possible.
him. “And why should she marry?” he thought. “To be unhappy for
him; but most of all, he felt joyful that the moment had come when he
him, but still that happy result always remained in the future.
him, carried the infant round the battered tin font and handed him over
him disputing in whispers and one of them insisting that he should be
him do what he pleases,’ she used to say of me. One day I asked her if
him feel confused by her smiles and her own confusion when meeting him.
him for those words, bullets flew hissing across the regiment and across
him full directions which he had written down for his own guidance as to
him?” he asked.
him, he does not know Russian.”
him he is a fool, that’s all!”
him,” he thought, and again he felt something terrible and monstrous
him if not to join in at least to listen to what he was saying. But the
him into the sitting room, where they began talking. They hardly gave
him merged in Rostóv’s mind into a single feeling of terror and pity
him my whole staff and all that belongs to it, advising him if there is
him. On the day of Prince Vasíli’s arrival, Prince Bolkónski was
him, or perhaps for that very reason, the prince, though he continued
him, or what was said of him; he was only glad that people were standing
him out of the booth at Grunth. He was shouting in a gasping voice:
him pleasure. The enemy’s guns were in his fancy not guns but pipes
him. Prince Vasíli’s two valets were busy dressing him, and he looked
him, push him, do anything but kiss him—a thing everybody did. But
him. Rostóv was particularly in need of money now that the troops,
himself.
himself.
himself?
himself after his recent loneliness and freedom from cares so beset and
himself, and this fresh opportunity for action gave him new energy
himself an insignificant atom in it) would go through fire and water,
himself had vanished. He was filled with happiness at his nearness to
himself, he kept in touch with the circle which confers success and
himself, he rose, threw back his head, and with resolute steps went
himself. I am called in to help sort the letters and take those meant
himself in the palace at Potsdam.
himself.... Not a word! About some Denísov or other, though he himself,
himself one with his horse, rode past the Emperor with a frowning but
himself to the count, who was looking inquiringly at him.
himself, was shouting to Kutúzov that if he did not ride away at once
himself. What angered him was that the coming of these visitors revived
him several questions about his journey and seemed greatly interested in
him several riders with white plumes in their hats. In a moment everyone
him so when I see him!”
him surrounded by children whom, by the count’s generosity, he was
him.” The mere thought of her father’s look filled her with terror.
him. The pain in his arm became more and more intense. Irresistible
him to come. There were other guests and the countess talked little to
him to deliver.
him to die. Others are being born and there are plenty of them as it is.
him to hear something more, nodded and turned to him with a cheerful
him too, just opposite Gúryev’s house... Old Gúryev.... Oh, but
him up and lent him money. Pierre recalled how Hélène had smilingly
him what consolation I can.”
him with her usual smile.
him. You know the story of the handkerchief? It is delightful!”
him ‘Your Majesty,’ but who, to his chagrin, got no title from
hindmost of these men wearing similar shakos was a Russian hussar. He
hints began to make the countess anxious and she glanced uneasily at
Hippolyte interrupted her with the words: “Le Roi de Prusse...” and
Hippolyte laughed as if ashamed of laughing.
his acquaintance and joyfully welcomed the rich newcomer, the
his acquaintances, to overtake his regiment which was already in Poland.
his attention wandered from the book and the Square and he formed in
his beautiful daughter Hélène.
his being alone and despondent! A strange face may seem unpleasant or
his breast. Among them stood a man whose white shirt was stained with
his camp,” said he. “What does that mean? Either he is retreating,
his collar as if escaping, was sitting almost asleep in a low chair,
his company? If you were cleverer and more agreeable, I should prefer
his daughter that morning. Princess Mary well knew this painstaking
His despair was all the greater from feeling that his own weakness was
his dressing gown and smiled slightly, as if expressing respectful
his easy life in Moscow, entered the room.
His efforts had not been in vain. The dinner, both the Lenten and the
his example, and the loud shouting continued for a long time. When the
his eye as a miller wakes up when the soporific drone of the mill wheel
his eyes at the sight.
his eyes. “Can they be French?” He looked at the approaching
his eyes he heard in front of him, where the enemy was, the long-drawn
his face, gave him a peculiar vivacity and shiftiness of expression.
His face shone with self-satisfaction and pleasure.
His face was terrible and piteous to see, especially from its helpless
his fat chest uncovered, stepping unevenly and timidly in one slippered
his father and his fatherland. To the great regret of myself and of the
his father’s peculiarities, and partly because he needed solitude,
his feverishness increased and he grew delirious. Visions of his father,
his future depended—whether he would follow the same old road, or that
His grandfather, who was his godfather, trembling and afraid of dropping
his hand.
his hand and at the head of a regiment—he fell as a hero, worthy of
his handkerchief, and again: ‘Sergéy Kuzmích, From all sides,’...
his hands to the blaze, and turned away his face.
his having been picked up on the battlefield by the people of the
his head.
his head and again assuming his former tone of a dull, unreasoning, but
his head, and with inimical politeness lurking in the corners of his
his head he let it droop and again closed his eye.
his horse indolently and carelessly. Rostóv recalled their quarrel of
His huge figure, with arms hanging down and with a puckered, though
his husbandry.
his last parting from his father and his wife; he remembered the days
his legs almost gave way, it seemed to him that he was tired out. He
his lips in his sleep and breathing evenly.
his lips without uttering a sound. He wished to say, “Yes, a vile,
his lower jaw.
his mouth, he turned with his glass to Pierre.
his old friend and the possessor of such enormous wealth, to the caprice
his own had taken possession of his brain and at that moment afforded
his own pleasure, chose to chat with Lieutenant Drubetskóy. More than
his own superiority. It was as if he said to them: “I know you, I know
his own way, gave an order. No one said anything definite, but the rumor
His passion for the Emperor had cooled somewhat in Moscow. But still, as
his pistol, and then he felt with surprise that of all the men he knew
his plate, and proposed a toast, “To the health of the hero of our
His plate seemed to him not quite clean, and pointing to a spot he
his present state.
his relations with old friends, all his plans for his future, were
his saber. Only ten paces divided them. Dólokhov lowered his head to
his saber, the soldiers all continued to run, talking, firing into the
His servant handed him a half-cut novel, in the form of letters, by
his ship is sailing, but on the day of battle—heaven knows how and
his shrill, harsh voice. “The road is not swept for the princess my
his side had been attempting a reconciliation), and he also went up to
his son and seizing the little princess’ arm as if she would have run
his son by both hands, he cried, “Now I’ve got you, so take the
his speech, which he used in extreme cases when special persuasion was
his superiors by his promptitude and accuracy and had arranged his money
his time. But he is growing old, and though not exactly cruel he has too
his time there.
his Toulon, or his bridge of Arcola. How it would come about he did not
his typically southern French face during the whole time of the reading,
his usual jokes, but noticing that what he was saying redounded to
his verses, bowed to Bagratión. Everyone rose, feeling that dinner
his voice. “She is living in Moscow and you are here. Remember,
his wealth, and being in the habit of lording it over these people, he
his weapons clean and polished to the utmost, and every horse groomed
his whole soul what the stranger said. Whether he accepted the wise
his wife, and by an anonymous letter he had received that morning, which
his wife said—met for supper at Prince Vasíli’s. All these friends
his wife’s room. She was lying dead, in the same position he had seen
“Hm!—his excellency is a puppy.... I got him his appointment in the
“Hm... Hm...!” growled Pierre, frowning without looking at her, and
“Hm! Hm!” muttered the prince, sitting down.
hoarsely. Prince Andrew winced and, clutching his head, went out and sat
holding up a threatening finger. “He is such a worthy and excellent
“Hold your tongue, Pétya, what a goose you are!”
Hollabrünn and have pursued ever since to this place. The position we
hollows and snow-covered pools of water.
home now for the first time after eighteen months again brightened his
home reading a book and trying to fathom the significance of the Square,
home,” said the valet.
home. Should he go to headquarters next day and challenge that affected
honorable, Count,” or, “Were he as clever as you,” and so on,
honorable, of Bezúkhov? And Fédya, with his noble spirit, loved him
honored guests sat, everyone seemed to be in high spirits and under the
honor? Knowing him to be an only son, to challenge him and shoot so
honor of the French infantry, so necessary to the honor of our nation.
honor to choose me to be their marshal; it was all I could do to get
honor, was terrible.
hoofs and the jingling of showy cavalry in blue, red, and green braided
hoofs and wheels. Amid the general rumble, the groans and voices of the
hoped. She prayed for her brother as living and was always awaiting news
hoped to lead he still lived the old life, only in new surroundings.
hoping to find him alone. When he came in and saw an hussar of the line
horse a little in front of his marshals. He gazed silently at the hills
horse of a batman or groom of some important personage and began to
horses and Ilyá Iványch. I don’t think Ilyá drives anyone except
horses and the infantry collecting wood.
horses in horsecloths. Then came a cart, and behind that walked an old,
horses were already galloping. Rostóv heard the thud of their hoofs
horse with his spurs, and giving it the rein leaped lightly over. Only
hospital at Ostrolenka till I recover. In regard to which I humbly
hospitality, did the honors to the prince.
hospitals. The one and the other may serve as a pastime. But what’s
hours’ sleep before morning and felt cheerful, bold, and resolute,
household, a common anxiety, a softening of the heart, and a
house lay behind a newly dug pond filled with water to the brink and
house, now and then opening her door when someone passed and watching
houses from his door. It seemed to him the horses were not moving at
house was dominated by the same feeling that Princess Mary experienced
“How about the horses?” he asked, without looking at Pierre.
How am I to renounce forever these vile fancies, so as peacefully to
“How am I to understand you, mon père?” said the princess, growing
how can I, an insignificant mortal, show His omnipotence, His infinity,
“How can one talk or think of such trifles?” thought Pierre.
“How can the Emperor be undecided?” thought Rostóv, but then even
“How dare you take it?” he shouted.
How did it begin? I traveled from Moscow with Prince Vasíli. Then there
How d’ye do, old fellow?” he said, turning to an old man who was
“How easy it is, how little effort it needs, to do so much good,”
However, at nine o’clock the prince, in his velvet coat with a sable
“However, if you command it, Your Majesty,” said Kutúzov, lifting
“However, I think General Kutúzov has come out,” said Prince
however they might change the setting and adornment of that face, it
“However, this is not at all interesting. Let us have dinner, and then
How have you spent it? In riotous orgies and debauchery, receiving
“How is it I am not moving? I have fallen, I am killed!” Rostóv
“How is that?...” began Prince Andrew, who had for long been waiting
how is that?” said different voices.
“How it will be there I don’t know, but all will be well!” thought
how long his unconsciousness lasted. Suddenly he again felt that he was
“How much longer? How much longer? Oh, these insufferable streets,
how one day soon after his marriage he came out of the bedroom into his
How quickly! Now I know that not because of her alone, nor of myself
“How she loves me!” thought Princess Mary. “How happy I am now,
“How strange it is,” said Véra, selecting a moment when all were
“How sweet she is—she will be a weal beauty!” said Denísov.
how the Russians had been overwhelmed by flying Austrians and had had to
how they had been made much of in Russia, Poland, and abroad. They spoke
how to behave with her. The evening before, in the first happy moment of
“How understand me!” cried her father angrily. “Prince Vasíli
“How was it a gun was abandoned?” asked Bagratión, frowning, not so
hugging and kissing him. Another and yet another creature of the same
human skull with its cavities and teeth. After reading the first words
“Humbug! Nonsense! Humbug, humbug, humbug!” cried Prince Bolkónski,
humility.
humming infantry as by a frame.
humor and dissatisfied with the affair, and so did not exert themselves
hundred rubles he had a long column of figures scored against him,
hundred rubles was left of that money, so that this seven of hearts
hundred yards after that before he saw to his left, across the whole
hung low over the field of battle on the horizon. It was growing
“Hur-a-a-a-ah!” came a roar of voices. “Let anyone come my way
“Hurrah—ah!—ah!” rang a long-drawn shout from our ranks, and
“Hurrah! Hurrah! Hurrah!” thundered from all sides, one regiment
“Hurrah!” rang the enthusiastic voices of the officers.
“Hurrah!” shouted Prince Andrew, and, scarcely able to hold up
“Hurrah!”... Then the general march, and again “Hurrah! Hurrah!”
hurriedly interrupting Bagratión.
hurriedly: “I will tell you some time how it all happened. But you
husband of a beauty, and in a word—an old woman; and secondly because
hussar revels and life in the fighting line, the other of the pleasures
hussars, flushing and addressing an adjutant who had ridden up, “so
hussars, told them to follow him, and trotted downhill in the direction
“I...”
I, above all, who am to blame for everything. Help me, teach me, and
I alone have any influence with my father, and now and then can save him
“I am.”
I am.”
“I am afraid for the baby,” she said to Mademoiselle Bourienne:
“I am afraid,” said Pierre, smiling, and wavering between the
“I am asking you when you last heard from Bolkónski,” repeated
“I am not in the cavalry, Colonel, but I am a Russian general and if
“I am not talking about you,” he said, “I don’t know you and,
I am overwhelmed with business and it is purely out of charity that
“I am ready for everything,” said Pierre.
“I am so glad you’ve come!” said Natásha, without answering him.
“I am very sorry you did not find me in yesterday. I was fussing about
“I am waiting, Your Majesty,” answered Kutúzov, bending forward
“‘I am wounded and cannot ride and consequently cannot command the
“I begin ab ovo. ‘The enemy of the human race,’ as you know,
“I believe it, I believe it, fwiend, and I share and appwove...”
“I bestow it with pleasure,” said Napoleon. “And who is that young
“I burned this to prove my love for her. I just heated a ruler in the
“I called once or twice at your house,” said Rostóv, reddening.
I can do.” And his fancy pictured the battle, its loss, the
“I cannot pay it all immediately. Will you take an I.O.U.?” he said.
“I can’t tell you how much I have lived through since then. I hardly
ice and into the water and oftenest of all among the crowd that covered
ice. Crowds of soldiers from the dam began running onto the frozen pond.
“I commanded a squadron,” replied Repnín.
I dare say, is braver than any of them. He says nothing about his
idea of the means by which our holy Order will help you to reach your
I did not think he would get it to you so quickly.... Well, how are you?
idleness, but would grow fat and die. The third thing—what else was
idle, vicious life!” but dared not break the silence.
I doing? Aren’t they laughing at me? Shan’t I be ashamed to remember
I do not begin, sire, because we are not on parade and not on the
“I do not know what you think, Father,” whispered the princess.
“I do not understand,” said Pierre, feeling with dismay doubts
I do not yet know. There will be time enough to think about love when I
“I... don’t...” he muttered, holding up two fingers to his cap.
“I don’t know. I think if he writes, I will write too,” she said,
“I don’t understand,” he said, “how it is that the mind of man
I don’t want him.” (He looked at his blushing daughter.) “Are you
I envy him, but you want to make him what I am, without giving him my
“I expected help from you and I get none, none from you either!”
“I expect so.”
if about to tell a good story he put down the cards, leaned back in his
If at first the members of the council thought that Kutúzov was
if complaining of Kutúzov.
“If he could attack us, he would have done so today,” said he.
If he is standing before Brünn...”
“If he starts a row I’ll go away,” said Prince Anatole. “I
“If He were not,” he said quietly, “you and I would not be
“If I’d been in Nikólenka’s place I would have killed even more
“If I have time,” answered Nicholas. “But I promised the
if in search of something. Before dinner the old prince, of whom she was
“If it is true that Monsieur Denísov has made you a proposal, tell
“If only they would be quick!” thought Rostóv, feeling that at last
if she had not meant it seriously. It makes it as if you were marrying
“If we fought before,” he said, “not letting the French pass, as
if we occupy the villages of Sokolnitz and Kobelnitz, whereby we
if you are in love, marry him!” said the countess, with a laugh of
“If you are refusing for my sake, I am afraid that I...”
“If you are resolved, I must begin your initiation,” said the Rhetor
if you have firmly resolved to join our Brotherhood.” (Pierre nodded
“If you like, your honor!”
“If you please, your excellency, Pétrusha has brought some papers,”
“If you really want it,” said he.
“If you won’t answer, I’ll tell you...” Hélène went on. “You
“I had not the pleasure of seeing you,” said Prince Andrew, coldly
I had to express my own desire...” She had no time to finish. The old
“I have already refused,” she said hurriedly.
I have a presentiment that for the first time I shall have to show all
“I have come to you with a message and an offer, Count,” he
“I have done my best for him, and I can assure you the education there
I have done that though badly and to a small extent; but I have done
“I have had a proposition made me concerning you,” he said with an
“I have heard of you, my dear sir,” continued the stranger, “and
“I have met loving, noble, high-minded men, but I have not yet met
“I have no money with me,” he said.
“I have not referred to this out of curiosity, my dear sir, but for
I have received what was due from the Ryazán estate and will keep it;
“I have the pleasure of addressing Count Bezúkhov, if I am not
“I... hope... for guidance... help... in regeneration,” said Pierre,
“I imagine that Freemasonry is the fraternity and equality of men who
“I?... I’m going to Petersburg,” answered Pierre, in a childlike,
“I intended to re-form them beyond the village, your excellency,”
“I? I? What of me? Leave me out of the question. I’m not going to
I know for certain that you won’t marry her.”
“I know from reliable sources that the Dowager Empress is taking a
“I know people consider me a bad man!” he said. “Let them! I
“I know your outlook,” said the Mason, “and the view of life you
I know you will pray over it. Well, pray if you like, but you had better
I’ll go to the general and ask him.” He readjusted himself in the
I’ll just finish dealing, and then Ilyúshka will come with his
“I’ll kill you!” he shouted, and seizing the marble top of a table
I’ll let her see....”
I’ll see.” The old prince snorted. “Let her marry, it’s all the
“I’ll sing for you a whole evening,” said Natásha.
I’ll teach you to think!” and lifting his stick he swung it and
“I’ll tell you what, my dear fellow,” said Prince Andrew, who
“I’ll trust you.”
illumined, and plunge him into the depths of unknown and undefined
I love so that I would give my life for them, and the others I’d
    * “I love you.”
    * I love you.
“I love you all, and have done no harm to anyone; and what have you
Ilyá has sent you to ask for strawberries and fresh pineapples.’ We
Ilyúshka, the one who danced at Count Orlóv’s, you remember, in a
imagination a new plan of life. On the previous evening at the Lodge, he
imagine...”
imagined oppressors whose victims he would rescue. Of the three
imagining himself before his own officers, insisted on his soldierly
“I make bold to ask your excellency to move a little for this
I’m alive, that is not my fault, so I must live out my life as best I
“I’m certain of it; you’ll see.”
immediately.
immediately starting to run along the hall and up the warped steps of
immediately told him that this man could be useful, and without any
immensity of the power they constituted.
“I’m not a goose, but they are who cry about trifles,” said
“I’m not such a fool.... Just you try it on.... Allez-vous
“‘I most ardently desire,’ writes the King of Prussia to
impatient and sets to work himself and finds letters from the Emperor
impatient the nearer they got to Moscow.
impending action. From privates to general they were not expecting a
impending battle, under a heading which he also read out:
imperturbable calm she did not begin to speak in front of the valet.
impetus, and Princess Mary long remembered the dying creak of that
implied that, for certain considerations he could not know of, this was
importance, he returned again, called back the cook and the club
important and unimportant, all of whom he knew, as if they were all
Impossible!” And suddenly he was seized by a panic of fear for himself
impossible for him to return to his former conception of her, that he
impossible... Oh, how pleasant it was at home!... The knave, double or
impressionable, smiling young faces (smiling probably at their own
impression of those voices and faces and a sense of loneliness merged
impression. Whether Dolgorúkov and Weyrother, or Kutúzov, Langeron,
“I must also inform you,” said the Rhetor, “that our Order
In 1806 the old prince was made one of the eight commanders in chief
in a bad temper, and in the morning Tíkhon had already advised the
in a cheerful voice:
In a corner of the hut stood a standard captured from the French, and
In a corner of the room something red and tiny gave a grunt and squealed
In a day or two we shall all have to take part in a greater and more
in all sincerity—not as a future Mason but as an honest man: have you
in, and sinking heavily into an armchair.
in any case. He has forwarded me a letter from Borís. Thank God, Borís
in a shovel—the guests who had been scattered about in different rooms
inattentive, but you had talent—oh yes, you had talent!”
in chief’s office were gathered Kutúzov himself, Weyrother, and the
inclination—practical business.
income which was said to amount to five hundred thousand rubles a year,
incomparably higher than a general, and according to which what was
in comparison with eternity?”
incomprehensible—the death of one she loved.
In consequence of this discovery his whole manner of life, all
inconvenient, unseemly, and impossible to do so.
in conversation—Count Rostopchín, Prince Yúri Dolgorúkov, Valúev,
in couples and he himself rode along the line trying to master the
increased tenfold, and their life, which seemed to have been passed in
increasing, seemed like someone’s breathing. He listened intently to
incredible, unheard-of, and impossible event of a Russian defeat,
     * “Indeed, Sire, we shall do everything it is possible to
“Indeed? Yes, yes!” said Borís, with a smile. “And we too have
indicated that if he was not dancing it was because he would not and not
indicating a captive French dragoon who was being brought in on foot by
indicating her to the gentlemen, said: “Voilà Marie!” Princess Mary
indications, he saw clearly that the allies believed him to be far away
indifferent air, and glanced into the little drawing room. Pierre and
indifferently quiescent till the moment when motion is transmitted
indignantly. “I come to ask you what to do, and you call it
indiscretion, one might ask about our plans.
in discussion with the sole object of offending one another. But the
indisposition was the strong impression made on his sensitive mind by
individual commanders and inquiring into details of the action and our
I need.” But when he came across a man of position his instinct
“I never go back on my word,” he said. “Besides, Sónya is so
“I never invited them. They came to disturb my life—and there is not
inevitable pain showed itself.
infantry.
infantry and cavalry and took up its appointed position. Not only the
infantry, and having reached the village of Gruntersdorf they halted. It
infantry, cavalry, and artillery. How was it that two guns were
infantry in different uniforms; now was heard the rhythmic beat of
infantry officer who just before the battle had rushed out of
infants in arms met him to thank him for releasing them from hard
influence of a variety of exciting sensations. Only Pierre and
influence of the dark, graceful girl who loved another.
informing the prince that as soon as the action began he had withdrawn
“Inform the prince that labor has begun,” said Mary Bogdánovna,
in four different provinces. He had arranged this for himself so as to
in French.
in front of him and that the enemy must be at least six miles away.
in front of him was misty darkness. Rostóv could see nothing, peer as
in front of them, and that the columns moving near Pratzen constituted
In general at Bald Hills the little princess lived in constant fear, and
in good spirits, he mounted his horse and rode out into the field
in Great Russia, which formed the larger part of his property, and left
in hand.
in her eyes, which, for an instant, glanced at Pierre, Prince Vasíli
in his fine gray eyes, and on his delicate lips the same capacity for
in his hand, was sitting there with a smile of deep emotion on his face,
in his horse before the Emperor.
in his large elongated hand on blue paper as follows:
in his mind an unsettled question he always tried to stifle, one about
in it by spring.
In Kiev Pierre found some people he knew, and strangers hastened to make
in Kishenëv with only a Moldavian peasant woman to help instead of a
in life, one she had not yet experienced, irreparable and
in love. The marshals stood behind him not venturing to distract his
in love with the Tsar,” he said.
in Mary Bogdánovna’s trembling white hands.
in me. I have been told that her brother Anatole was in love with her
in military matters.
in my opinion was nothing of the kind. We civilians, as you know, have
innocent youth.
in November, 1805, announcing that he and his son would be paying him
In November, 1805, Prince Vasíli had to go on a tour of inspection
inn, where two roads parted. Both of them led downhill and troops were
in on bad company. Rostóv flushed up on noticing this, but he did not
in our army. His own strategic plan, which obviously could not now
in our house, aren’t they?”
in our lack of understanding we see only our weakness and His
“In our temples we recognize no other distinctions,” read the Grand
In Petersburg, as in Moscow, Pierre found the same atmosphere of
in pure, correct French many interesting details about the armies and
inquiring look. He was about to stoop over her hand and kiss it, but
inquiring what she was to do with these people. On leaving them, Anna
in Rostóv’s soul! And this something was apart from everything else
insane—unprofitable to himself, to the count, and to the serfs—made
“In short, hoping to settle matters by taking up a warlike attitude,
insignificance, aware of being but a drop in that ocean of men, and
in silence, and then the same joke was repeated.
insolent, hard, and mocking face as he had seen it at the banquet, and
in some respects a brilliant match for the dowerless, orphan girl. From
inspired by the Emperors’ presence were eager for action. The
in spite of himself (although he knew how far it was safe to trust
In spite of Prince Andrew’s disagreeable, ironical tone, in spite of
in spite of this, both the face and words of his new acquaintance were
Instantly his regret at not having been in action and his dejected mood
instead of firing it, flung it at the Frenchman and ran with all his
instead of that he only excited himself more and more.
instructing in reading, writing, and religion. On all his estates Pierre
instructions his father had sent and taking the correspondence and his
instructions to Major Ekonómov, he could not help taking notice of the
insufficient, and he kept expecting something more, more and yet more.
intended for you too. Give them to the woman whom you shall honor most
intended to take up our position and begin the action, but were on this
intended to visit all his estates and see for himself how far his orders
intention of killing your man as quickly and surely as possible, and
intention of proposing, and today or tomorrow he would probably ask
intention to part from her forever.
interesting and entertaining. After the field marshal’s departure
interpreted. The life of old Prince Bolkónski, Prince Andrew, and
intervene. Prince Andrew looked at Túshin from under his brows and his
interview? Why negotiate, and above all why retreat, when to retreat is
“In that case...” began Willarski, but Pierre interrupted him.
“In that case he is inviting his doom by awaiting our attack,” said
“In that case we can go,” said Willarski. “My carriage is at your
in that happy mood in which everything seems possible and everything
in the army, besides the subordination and discipline prescribed in the
in the assurance that the rumors about the Emperor being wounded were
In the autumn of 1806 everybody had again begun talking of the war with
In the autumn the Rostóvs returned to Moscow. Early in the winter
In the beginning of the winter of 1805-6 Pierre received one of Anna
in the common motion the result and aim of which are beyond its ken.
In the darkness, it seemed as though a gloomy unseen river was flowing
In the deathlike stillness only the tramp of horses was heard. This
in the drawing room, talking to the little princess and Mademoiselle
In the Emperor’s suite all exchanged rapid looks that expressed
In the Emperors’ suite were the picked young orderly officers of the
In the evening, after supper, when all were about to retire, Anatole
In the evening Andrew and Pierre got into the open carriage and drove to
in the evening,” reported Rostóv, stooping forward with his hand at
In the fresh morning air were now heard, not two or three musket shots
in the hair, the hair combed up, and the blue scarf arranged lower on
in the house on the Povarskáya rose before him with such vividness,
In their childlike glee, aroused by the fire and their luck in
in their own play.
in their power.
In the letter from his parents was enclosed a letter of recommendation
in the mean jocular way common to anonymous letters said that he saw
In the meantime, not only was it known in the maidservants’ rooms that
In the middle of his story, just as he was saying: “You cannot imagine
in the middle of the line that had seemed so terrible—and now he
in the mist.
In the morning all that was left of the night mist on the heights was
In the night he called his valet and told him to pack up to go to
in the other the letter, and pressing them alternately to her lips.
In the rearguard, Dokhtúrov and others rallying some battalions kept up
In the room next their bedroom there was a confusion of sabers,
“In the seventh place, try, by the frequent thought of death,” the
In the spring of 1807 he decided to return to Petersburg. On the way he
in the streets of Petersburg in an old uniform. He made friends with
In the third circle, Narýshkin was speaking of the meeting of the
In the village of Hosjeradek there were Russian troops retiring from
in the world and above everything in the world. “What were losses, and
intimately. Prince Andrew spoke with some animation and interest only of
intimately regretted that he had died so young, leaving a pregnant wife
into action as arranged, and after going behind other columns for
into her heart an impulse that was against His will. My wife—as she
into his room one evening in the official and ceremonious manner in
in to inform the commander in chief of this and, availing himself
“In token of obedience, I ask you to undress.”
intonation, look, and expression, pricked up her ears from the beginning
into sobs.
into the corridor and met—coming out of the door of the Emperor’s
Into the insignificant, trifling, and artificial interests uniting that
in to the utmost, their red necks squeezed into their stiff collars, and
into the valley. He greeted the men of the foremost regiment and gave
into the water. He tried to right himself but fell in up to his waist.
into the water, or when he challenged a man to a duel without any
intoxication. He felt as though he were the center of some important and
invent him,” said the wit Shinshín, parodying the words of Voltaire.
involuntarily, came up and sat down beside him.
involuntarily noticed that one of them was bleeding, and galloped on.
in war on our own frontiers, with and for the King of Prussia. We have
in Zherkóv, looking uneasily around. He had not seen the hussars all
Iogel’s were the most enjoyable balls in Moscow. So said the mothers
I only wanted to know your opinion,” and Anna Pávlovna let Pierre go.
“I ought to tell you that I do not believe... do not believe in
“I peg of you yourself not to mix in vot is not your business!”
“I promised to pay tomorrow,” said Nicholas.
“I quite understand,” answered Princess Mary, with a sad smile.
I really take it? How fortunate!” he thought.
irreparable. There was no insult on either side. Allow me to
irresistible human need for sleep. He really was asleep. Weyrother, with
irresistibly attractive to Pierre.
irresolution communicated itself to the men.
“I said from the first,” declared Anna Pávlovna referring to
is a very good thing, but not for you—I don’t suppose you ever had
“I saw him myself,” replied the man with a self-confident smile of
“I saw the Pávlograd hussars attack there, your excellency,” chimed
“I say, Berg, my dear fellow,” said Rostóv, “when you get a
“I say, Father, joking apart, is she very hideous?” Anatole asked,
“I say, Rostóv,” said Dólokhov clearly, smiling and looking
“I say, shall we soon be clear? They say the cavalry are blocking the
“I say, we’ve been in the front line! Our regiment attacked!” said
is called weak character, do not seek a confidant in their troubles. He
is Denísov!”
“Is everything quite all right?”
is for myself.”
is good to have a friend like the prince,” she said, smiling at Prince
I shall conclude will be worthy of my people, of you, and of myself.
I shall expect you, Drubetskóy. Au revoir!” exclaimed Prince Andrew,
“Is he really to be my husband, this stranger who is so kind—yes,
“I should never dare to say that I know the truth,” said the Mason,
“I should not be doing my duty, Count,” he said in timid tones,
is interrupted. He listened to what Langeron said, as if remarking,
“Is it for visitors you’ve got yourself up like that, eh?” said
is much better than ours.”
is not abashed now, so she cannot be a bad woman!” He had often begun
is nothing but a trick! He has retreated and ordered the rearguard to
is not my fault that I want it and want nothing but that and live only
is now on the staff.”
isn’t it logical?
“Isn’t she exquisite?” she said to Pierre, pointing to the stately
“Is Papa at home?” he asked.
is so fond of?” He remembered his mother’s love for him, and his
is, stormed and stormed and stormed! It was not a matter of life but
is such men as he who decide the fate of nations,” added Bolkónski
“Is that so? And what did he say?” inquired Bolkónski.
is that the Emperor is here. How he looked at me and wished to say
is the baby born?”
is the one held by the majority of people, and is the invariable fruit
is the only thing left me—not singing!” his thoughts ran on. “Go
“Is this good or bad?” Pierre asked himself. “It is good for me,
“Is this your saber?” asked Pétya. “Or is it yours?” he said,
“Is this your saber?” he shouted.
is vanity, all falsehood, except that infinite sky. There is nothing,
it.
it.
it.”
it and wished to hear it again. In her voice there was a virginal
it appears that we are within sight of the enemy and must give battle.
it. At that moment it meant nothing to him who might be standing over
“It can’t be helped! It happens to everyone!” said the son, with
“It can’t be!” said Rostóv. “It must have been someone else.”
it dashed, some forward and some back, drowning one another.
I tell her how I’ve seen the Emperor?) Natásha... take my
I tell you he is in our hands, that’s certain! But what was most
it. Fr... fr... fr! And don’t I see that that idiot had eyes only for
“I think I may congratulate you,” whispered Anna Pávlovna to the
“I think the battle will be lost, and so I told Count Tolstóy and
I think there were not many such gallant sons of the fatherland out
it. If you refuse him on my account, I must tell you the whole truth. I
“It is all, all her fault,” he said to himself; “but what of that?
“It is all very well for Rostóv, whose father sends him ten thousand
“It is done!” she said to the count, pointing triumphantly to the
“It is of great importance to me,” she said, turning with a smile
it is past midnight—cannot now be altered,” said he. “You have
“It is some letter of recommendation... what the devil do I want it
“It is the sword of Frederick the Great which I...” she began, but
“It is too late now, it’s done; besides I love her,” thought
“It may be he or it may be nothing,” muttered the hussar. “It’s
it might really have been so? Could one possibly make out amid all that
“It must be one of ours, a prisoner. Yes. Can it be that they will
it, next day, November 15, after dinner he again went to Olmütz and,
“I told you it was all lumps and holes!” the little princess
it on his coat and supported himself with it. His frowning face was
it on something, and told him to hold a pair of compasses to his left
it on the field at Schön Grabern. Young Rostóv’s ecstatic voice
it or not, and how they would cross it, agitated them all.
it really happened, it would have been necessary to make an effort of
it right to refuse a duty to which he had been appointed by the Emperor
I trouble myself about you, and you also know quite well that what I
“It’s a lackey’s job!”
“It’s all the same now. If the Emperor is wounded, am I to try to
“It’s all the same to me,” he said. “I only want to see whether
“It’s all up! I’m lost!” thought he. “Now a bullet through my
“It’s a long time since we met,” he said. “Thanks for coming.
“It’s Andrew!” thought Princess Mary. “No it can’t be, that
its broad temples and close-cropped hair, and looked at Bezúkhov. The
it’s definite and one is rid of the old tormenting doubt.” Pierre
It seemed as if from some words Borís had spoken that evening about the
it seemed as if nothing in that voice could be altered without spoiling
It seemed so natural to Pierre that everyone should like him, and it
It seemed to her that not only did everybody know that her fate would be
it seemed to him that he was being fired at. “What? What? What?... Cut
it seemed to Pierre, sunk in profound and calm meditation. His servant
it seemed to Pierre that he grew embarrassed. Pierre himself grew still
“It seems that there will be no need to bring Mary out, suitors are
itself, a petty German town, Rostóv saw the Emperor again. In the
itself, rejoicing at the Emperors’ approach, had naturally burst into
itself to him. He was already enjoying that happiness when that
it, she was herself in such high spirits at that moment, so far from
“It’s impossible,” replied another.
“It’s not that I don’t remember—I know what he is like, but not
“It’s plain that they have not all gone yet, Prince,” said
“It’s the enemy?... No!... Yes, see it is!... for certain.... But
its thunder joining the roar of the whole line along which he had
It’s true he has been reinstated, but how could they fail to do that?
its upper lip covered with tiny black hair.
its use, he does not believe in the master who made it. To know Him is
its usual semblance of a smile.
“It’s wonderful what a lot of our troops have gathered, lads! Last
it to be alleged that he had been the first to leave the range of fire,
it to its destination and make use of it.
it turns out that ‘the enemy of the human race’ pays no heed to
it turns out that we have landed ourselves in war, and what is more,
It was all that they could do to get the guns up the rise aided by the
It was evident that this strange, strong man was under the irresistible
it was impossible to get rid of them.
It was late in the evening when they entered the palace at Olmütz
it was long before their conversation could settle on anything. They
It was long since Rostóv had felt such enjoyment from music as he
It was long since the Rostóvs had news of Nicholas. Not till midwinter
“It was my fault, mon père,” interceded the little princess, with a
It was Napoleon accompanied by two aides-de-camp. Bonaparte riding
It was nine o’clock in the morning. The fog lay unbroken like a sea
It was no longer, as before, a dark, unseen river flowing through the
it was not so, that I had no right to do it. And so it turns out.”
It was not the dress, but the face and whole figure of Princess Mary
It was one of those March nights when winter seems to wish to resume its
It was plain that this cadet had already repeatedly asked for a lift and
It was Prince Andrew. The first thing he saw on riding up to the space
It was rumored that Savary had been sent to propose to Alexander
it was that the pain distracted him and prevented his seeing what he had
it was, the disorder was readily and naturally attributed to the stupid
“It was the officer, your honor, stained it,” answered the
It was the second night that neither of them had slept, watching the boy
it were not his. He examined his hand carefully, vainly trying to find
it were not my duty I would not talk to you for a moment”), was
it with you?...”
it worth thinking or speaking of it at such a moment? At a time of such
It would be different if you grudged losing a laborer—that’s how I
“It would be good,” thought Prince Andrew, glancing at the icon his
it would have been difficult for a face to express greater respect and
“It would have been hard to drive up, your honor,” he added. “I
It would not ache—it would be well—if only they did not pull it, but
it you talked about?” and Prince Andrew crooked a third finger. “Ah,
Ivánovich Kutúzov:
“I’ve come to sit with you a bit, Másha,” said the nurse, “and
I’ve nothing against it,” the prince said to himself, “but he must
“I want nothing, and I won’t be anyone’s adjutant.”
“I was coming to tell you so.”
I was right. Without boasting, you know, I may say that I know the Army
“I was there,” said Rostóv angrily, as if intending to insult the
I was to blame for not understanding her, for not understanding that
“I was very much surprised when I heard of it,” said Prince Andrew.
“I? What have I...?” stammered Pierre.
“I will do so,” said Prince Andrew, moving away from the map.
“I will give the order.”
“I will, I will, only tell me! You won’t? Then I will go and tell at
“I will tell you frankly,” said Prince Vasíli in the tone of
“I won’t say he is out of sorts, but I fancy he would like to be
“I won’t tell anyone!” and she ran off at once to Sónya.
jaw trembling and was hardly able to mutter: “I don’t know... your
jest.
Jests fell flat, news was not interesting, and the animation was
“Je vous aime!” * he said, remembering what has to be said at such
joy and happiness. On receiving the order he gave his horse the rein
joy at the approach of the Emperors. One voice was heard shouting:
joyful and mysterious taking place within her.
joyful it seemed, that her son, the scarcely perceptible motion of whose
joyfully that the men themselves were awed by their multitude and the
joyfully up to Pierre. His face was so unusually triumphant that Pierre
joys and sorrows of this world—overflowed the great grief within her.
jump, Túshin not taking his pipe from his mouth ran from gun to gun,
Just as he went in he saw that the nurse was hiding something from him
“Just as I may suppose you to be deluded,” said Pierre, with a faint
Just as in a clock, the result of the complicated motion of innumerable
Just as in the mechanism of a clock, so in the mechanism of the military
just at moments when such thoughts occurred to him, he would ask in a
Just before dinner, Count Ilyá Rostóv presented his son to Bagratión,
just left.... It is true that it was hot there,” he added, modestly.
just returned from Vienna, two diplomatists, the old aunt, a young man
just such a story—they would either not have believed him or, still
Just then at a distance behind Kutúzov was heard the sound of regiments
Kámenski, visited the English Club, and was on intimate terms with a
keen interest in the whole affair. You know she is very gracious to
keen-sighted a companion. “You know, you see right through people.
kept coming into her eyes. Anna Mikháylovna, with the letter, came on
kerchief, and the loose skin that hung under her chin.
Kiev province, where he had the greatest number of serfs, taking with
killed anyone, or insulted or wished harm to anyone? Why such a terrible
killed by a cannon ball—struck in the breast before our regiment.”
killed.” Rook tried to rise on his forelegs but fell back, pinning his
Killed them, yes!” said he, frowning angrily and turning away from
killed, you are a fool and are lost for certain. But go with the firm
kill me.” But at the same time, his left arm felt as heavy as if
“Kill the Germans!” shouted one.
kindle fires and make a noise to deceive us.”
Kindle in all hearts the flame of virtue. Share thy happiness with thy
kindness,” or, “With your excellent heart,” “You are yourself so
kind sprang from a second door and a third; more hugging, more kissing,
kind, that is the chief thing,” thought Princess Mary; and fear, which
King of Prussia and others: ‘So much the worse for you. Tu l’as
King of Prussia what he is to do if he is summoned to surrender.... All
kissed. Her father in jest tried to rouse her jealousy, and she replied
kissed her forehead.
kissed him at the same time. Only his mother was not there, he noticed
kissed him three times.
kissed Mademoiselle Bourienne’s hand. (This was not etiquette, but
kissed Princess Mary’s hand. She did not know how she found the
kisses. Her looks asked him to forgive her for having dared, by
kissing her hand, he left the room with quick resolute strides, without
kiss me,” and he offered his cheek.
knapsacks conveyed on carts, and the Austrian authorities had provided
knew that. What will be the result? That I shall be the laughingstock of
knew that when it appeared on her face, she became mute and was not to
knew till after eight o’clock.
knew what had happened to him as he knew it himself.
knight. “I’m even weady to dance the pas de châle.”
knitting a striped scarf for him.
knitting, went to the window and leaning out tried to catch the open
knocking over two horses and another tearing off a munition-wagon
knoll; if they had retreated they would have withdrawn from that too....
know!”
know all about it and understand it all,” he said. “You behaved as
know, and know for certain, that the enjoyment of doing this good is the
know, but he felt sure it would do so. The locality and the position of
know God and hate your life. There is nothing strange in that, my dear
knowing how. First he spun her round, holding her now with his left, now
Knowing that Denísov had a reputation even in Poland for the masterly
know it is all over, and forever.”
know my principles—everything aboveboard! I will ask her tomorrow in
know myself again.”
known). Drawing nearer, he recognized in the Rhetor a man he knew,
   Knows by experience, now, Bagratión,
Kórchevo—a certain Khandrikóv—is up to; till now the additional
Kronq,—chargé d’affaires from Copenhagen—a profound intellect,”
Kurágins’. All maintained a solemn silence, listening to the words
Kutúzov.
Kutúzov accompanied by his adjutants rode at a walking pace behind the
Kutúzov here woke up, coughed heavily, and looked round at the
Kutúzov laughed bitterly.
Kutúzov looked sternly at his adjutant and, after a pause, replied:
Kutúzov no one spoke of, except some who abused him in whispers,
Kutúzov’s, collected in groups and began to talk about the awards,
Kutúzov’s headquarters and the staffs of the commanders of columns.
Kutúzov’s suite like a flock of little birds.
Kutúzov, there is not a single Russian in command of a column! The
Kutúzov turned round without answering and his eye happened to fall
Kutúzov was occupying a nobleman’s castle of modest dimensions near
Kutúzov, where he inquired for Bolkónski, all the adjutants and even
Kutúzov with his staff and all of us count for nothing. Everything is
Kutúzov, with his suite diminished by more than half, rode toward a
Kutúzov, with his uniform unbuttoned so that his fat neck bulged over
Kutúzov writes...” and he screamed as piercingly as if he wished to
Kuzmích, asking what the point of the story was as he had not heard it
“Kuzmích... From all sides... and then tears,” someone repeated
labor but should die of it in a week, so he could not stand my physical
labor is as essential to him, as much a condition of his existence, as
labor was thus increased, though lessened on paper. He did not know
lad,” he said, addressing his favorite soldier. “And where is the
ladies and gentlemen than Rostóv had ever expected to see him.
ladies and, leaning on his saber and beating time with his foot, told
ladies—” He turned with the same request to Denísov who was also a
lad’s a fine fellow, a fine fellow! Well, come with me now.” He took
“Lads! here’s to our Sovereign, the Emperor, and victory over
“Lads!” shouted Milorádovich in a loud, self-confident, and cheery
lain in ambush in a ditch, now attacked the French unexpectedly.
lamp, she stood before it with folded hands for a few moments. A painful
lances and the unfolded standards fluttered against their staffs. It
Langeron’s objections were valid but it was obvious that their chief
Langeron, trying as virulently as possible to sting Weyrother’s vanity
Langeron, with a subtly ironical smile, again glancing round for support
Lannes and was thrown into confusion. Bagratión had sent Zherkóv
large and handsome eyes. He regarded his whole life as a continual round
large dark ballroom. All was the same: there were the same old card
large estate, Boguchárovo, about twenty-five miles from Bald Hills.
large leather sofa from Prince Andrew’s study into the bedroom. On
large, newly furnished Petersburg house, the happy possessor, as people
largest landowner of the province. Temptations to Pierre’s greatest
Larrey, was much more likely to end in death than in convalescence.
last campaign, Prince Peter Ivánovich Bagratión!” and again his blue
last few days. The antagonists stood forty paces apart at the farther
last interview with the gentleman-ranker—“that Private Dólokhov,
last Mademoiselle Bourienne gave a scream and ran away. Anatole bowed to
last only his white plumes were visible to Rostóv from amid the suites
last remaining strength, took hold of his left hand with his right, and
last time. And suddenly, in the most casual tone, which made him feel
“Late! It’s nearly ten o’clock,” answered Natásha’s voice.
later on. Oh, how glad I am to have you!”
latest cut, such as no one else yet had in Moscow, and boots of the
latest fashion, with extremely pointed toes and small silver spurs,
Late that night, when all had separated, Denísov with his short hand
lathe and, as usual, did not look round at her.
latterly spent whole days at home, that is, in Prince Vasíli’s house
laughed.
laughed at every word he said or that she said herself, not because what
laughed loudest.
laughing.
laughing. “Dear, dear!...”
laughing for some reason and shaking himself free.
laughing, “‘Sergéy Kuzmích... From all sides... From all sides...
lay across the bed with his head lower than the pillow, and was smacking
lazily and advanced and again halted, receiving no timely orders from
leading the Tsar’s beautiful relay horses covered with embroidered
leaned his arms on the back of the sofa and closed his eyes. Pierre
leaning with his arms on the back of the sofa, sat in his former
leaping the furrows, he fled across the field with the impetuosity he
learned that Dólokhov the brawler, Dólokhov the bully, lived in Moscow
learn from Suvórov even so simple a thing as the art of crowing like a
least have some for my sake! She must be shown that the blockhead thinks
“Leave it,” said Dólokhov, though he did not seem to be even
“Leave me alone, please leave me alone! It is all quite the same to
leave of her and of Lise, his look tender yet proud. She saw him tender
leave of Rostóv in the club porch.
leave you cold a thousand times and the thousand and first time thrill
led along a certain carpet. After that they took his right hand, placed
Left alone, Pierre went on smiling in the same way. Once or twice
left breast, and stooping down pulled up the left leg of his trousers
left foot began convulsively tapping the horse’s side with the spur,
legs and turned-out toes, climbed the hill with difficulty.) Prince
Lëlya’s name day. I will invite two or three people, and if he does
“Le Roi de Prusse?” Hippolyte said interrogatively, again laughing,
less a prey to evil and death?—death which ends all and must come
less, ate less, slept less, and became weaker every day. Princess Mary
less sincerely than the twenty-year-old Rostóv.
let him do what he vill, but I cannot sacrifice my hussars... Bugler,
letter.
letter.
letter.
letter from home and meet one of your own people whom you want to talk
letter, he now was.
letters sent through the embassy and all the searches made, his body had
letters to Nicholas from all the household were written and copied out,
letters to Princess Mary’s apartments, but did not find him there. He
letting the retreating companies pass by them, when a soldier came up
Lichtenstein, le Prince, de Hohenlohe, and finally Prishprish, and so on
life, and that of the seven virtues he lacked two—morality and the
“Life as it is leaves one no peace. I should be thankful to do
life from yours. I don’t wish to marry,” she answered positively,
life: remorse and illness. The only good is the absence of those evils.
life together were stripped, so that the screw could not get in or out,
life, which seemed to him so beautiful now that he had today learned to
lifted in childlike happiness.
lift his stick again but hurried into the house.
lights and shouts in the enemy’s camp. Rostóv rode up to Bagratión,
like a horse running downhill harnessed to a heavy cart. Whether he was
like all those Polish names.”
liked to help young men, was flattered by being asked for his assistance
liked to repeat to herself. It was the story of a girl who had been
like his own, at the firing, and went back at a footpace. “Well, some
likely the doctor.”
like method of enlightenment. Our Order imitates the ancient societies
like strangers.”
Like the others, Anna Pávlovna Schérer showed Pierre the change of
Like wind over leaves ran an excited whisper: “They’re coming!
line; and the Austrian troops. But they all stood in the same lines,
line, for from where they had been before it had been evident that it
line of the advancing Russian columns. Evidently the person they were
lines of artillery with green caissons.
line (the Guards) was already in action.
line to reconnoiter personally, and twice to the Emperors, Russian and
link which other people recognized had grown up between himself and
lips and met them with her own. Her face struck Pierre, by its altered,
Lise. I will follow.”
listened to his regular breathing. The dark shadow was Princess Mary,
listened to the Rhetor in silence, feeling from all he said that his
listening to an old Russian general with decorations, who stood very
listening to the gypsies and other singers.
Little as Nicholas had occupied himself with Sónya of late, something
little bent, looked with beaming face at the princess without
little companion! I hope she will bring her along with her when we’re
little creature, but dared not do so. He stood over him, gazing at his
little effort.”
little gold icon Princess Mary had hung round her brother’s neck, but
little icon with its thin gold chain suddenly appeared upon his chest
little, I mean a good deal, a great deal—forty three thousand.”
little matters which could not interest anyone but themselves. Natásha
little Napoleon had suddenly appeared with his unsympathizing look of
little Natásha as grown up.
little princess walked twice round her, now adjusting a fold of the
Little Túshin, moving feebly and awkwardly, kept telling his orderly to
lit wisps of straw and ran after him, shouting, “Vive l’Empereur!”
lived for glory.—And after all what is glory? The same love of others,
lived for others, and not almost, but quite, ruined my life. And I have
living with his mother, who, if she saw him dying, would not survive it.
living without having solved the problems that so absorbed him. He had
living with the Rostóvs.
locality was known and shown in every detail on the maps, and Bonaparte,
locks of gray hair.
Lodge—were so strong that he could not resist them. Again whole days,
Lodge. Willarski coughed, he was answered by the Masonic knock with
lofty, beautiful feeling, such a...”
lofty sky before? And how happy I am to have found it at last! Yes! All
loneliness of his daughter amid the general conversation. “Got herself
long.
long and warmly to the Emperor and how the Emperor, evidently weeping,
longed. Sónya now was sixteen and she was very pretty, especially at
longed to kiss his father’s hands and kneel to beg his forgiveness,
longed to snatch up, to squeeze, to hold to his heart, this helpless
longest sentences, he stopped the rotary motion of the snuffbox, raised
long. Say ‘perhaps.’”
“Look at them scurrying! It’s burning! Just see the smoke! Fine!
looked as if by that slight motion the army itself was expressing its
looked at that aged, stern, motionless, almost lifeless face and moved
looked eagerly toward his eyes, waiting for the look for which she
looking about him uneasily, and an awkward pause followed.
looking and held out his hand to her. She pressed it.
looking at her and waiting. Nicholas saw that Denísov was refusing
looking at Natásha.
looking at Rostóv, “you’ll win it back all the sooner. I lose to
looking at the midwife with wide-open eyes of alarm.
looking at them, turned to an adjutant to ask him for a field glass.
looking back saw that their foremost ranks were mixed up with some
looking inquiringly at him and watching to see how he would behave
looking not at Pierre but straight before him, and turning the leaves
looking pretty and conscious of it, were standing by the clavichord,
looking with a scared face at his comrade for help. The door, having let
looking with tender affection and pity at Mademoiselle Bourienne’s
“Look, look!” said this adjutant, looking not at the troops in the
look. Nicholas went up to her and kissed her hand. This was the first
look or bad opinion from him,” Rostóv decided; and sorrowfully and
looks and manner gave that impression. The princess felt this, and as if
looks) and she had put on a maroon dress with a pale-blue scarf, the
“Look then at thy inner self with the eyes of the spirit, and ask
look which was fixed on him, but him she could not see, she only saw
losses. The general whose regiment had been inspected at Braunau was
lost. Dólokhov “killed,” that is, beat, ten cards of Rostóv’s
lost more than he could pay.
lot? And who would marry Marie for love? Plain and awkward! They’ll
“Louis XVI was executed because they said he was dishonorable and a
love again, though for no one have I such a feeling of friendship,
love and befriend him.”
loved more than himself. He kept telling himself that he would consider
love for Natásha was unpleasant to him and he had not once been to see
love her.
love her, for that would be impossible.
love him all the more, but Nicholas now considered himself unworthy of
lovely eyes there was a look of fearful joy and hope that was also new
love of death. He consoled himself with the thought that he fulfilled
lovers!” he added.
love, such rapture, and such self-sacrifice, what do any of our quarrels
love, though less ecstatically, with their Tsar and the glory of the
love you.”
love you, and I think I love you more than anyone else....”
loving her; in deceiving yourself and her.” And he vividly recalled
lucky man and, with his plain face, to be looked on as a sort of Paris
luminous eyes fixed on her nurse’s wrinkled face (every line of which
luminous eyes shone more brightly than usual from the tears of joy that
machine, an impulse once given leads to the final result; and just as
Madame de Souza. He began reading about the sufferings and virtuous
made and highly valued. The old count came up to them and pressed
made a tour of the regiments and was annoyed at the irregularity of
“Made, made me an offer, Mamma! Mamma!” she exclaimed.
Mademoiselle Bourienne.
Mademoiselle Bourienne, also roused to great excitement by Anatole’s
Mademoiselle Bourienne and the little princess had to own to themselves
Mademoiselle Bourienne, how I shall arrange it,” she added, smiling
Mademoiselle Bourienne in her arms and gently stroking her hair. The
Mademoiselle Bourienne, “Mary’s is a face which such a coiffure does
Mademoiselle Bourienne walked up and down the conservatory for a long
Mademoiselle Bourienne was also looking at Princess Mary, and in her
made. Prince Andrew several times prompted Pierre’s story of what he
made use of it.... “What have I done?” thought he. And he turned
“Made what?”
“Ma foi!” said he, “tomorrow we shall see all that on the
“Ma foi, sire, nous ferons ce qui sera dans notre possibilité,
magnanimous. She felt convinced of that. Thousands of dreams of a future
maid.
maid’s voice at the door.
mainly because Denísov so delighted in her singing. She no longer sang
“Mais, mon cher, I did this for my own sake, to satisfy my conscience,
Majesty.”
Majesty,” said an adjutant who had come from the batteries that were
make a career and must not miss opportunities, but must avail myself of
make as successful a career of it as possible.”
make him go on.
malevolent and caustic expression softened, as if admitting that what
mallets and swords. As he was being led up to some object he noticed a
mallets, the doors opened before them. A bass voice (Pierre was still
malodorous mouth. Tears actually moistened his cheeks.
mamma.”
“Mamma, are you cross? Don’t be cross, dear! Is it my fault?”
“Mamma!... Mamma!... He has made me...”
man.” Again he pressed the hand of the latter with an expression of
man and help him to worldly success. Under cover of obtaining help
man, and that in the duel with Bezúkhov, Pierre was right and Dólokhov
man, be for her? In her thoughts of marriage Princess Mary dreamed of
man be fully imbued with the thought that we must defeat these hirelings
man beside you?”
man; by his acquaintances as a handsome lieutenant of hussars, a good
man, had not the five rubles that would make him happy.
man is as surly as a dog.”
manly-looking, but what amazed and estranged Pierre till he got used
manner: they were all evidently firmly convinced of Pierre’s noble
man, our dear Vyazmítinov....”
manure on well-kept plowland, lay from ten to fifteen dead and wounded
man, with gray bushy eyebrows overhanging bright eyes of an indefinite
man with the white forehead, black eyebrows, and red lips.
many of them), and at last he saw how a whole detachment of French
many young men to his parents’ house. Véra was a handsome girl
marched gaily, as they always do when going into action, especially to
marching along both.
mare he rode, his hand in a white glove gathered up the reins, and he
“Marie” produced on the visitors. And she saw Mademoiselle
marked the change? I sat all the time in this same place at this table,
market place, where there had been some rather heavy firing before the
Markóv immediately dropped his own beside it and picked it up without
“Marriages are made in heaven,” replied the elderly lady.
marriage—when the marriageable daughters and their mothers had nothing
married,” answered the countess sharply and sarcastically.
married, la petite est gentille.” *
marry anyone, but will be a dancer. Only don’t tell anyone.”
marshal of the court, Count Tolstóy.
martyr’s death for his sake. Then Robespierre was beheaded for being
Mary.
Mary.
“Mary Bogdánovna, I think it’s beginning!” said Princess Mary
Mary, but did not at once take his arm from the waist of Mademoiselle
Mary did not frighten them (she never inspired fear in anyone), but they
Mary. How good it would be to know where to seek for help in this life,
Mary, I am going to love him very much,” said Lise, looking with
Mary, really this dress does not suit you. I prefer you in your little
Mary! Say...” And the little princess began to cry capriciously like
“Mary,” she said, moving away from the embroidery frame and lying
Mary spent most of the day in the nursery, taking a mother’s place to
Mary’s room.
Mason.
Masonic statutes, “be kindly and courteous,” recurred to him. He
masses.
Master, “but those between virtue and vice. Beware of making any
master’s thoughts. He guessed that the question referred to Prince
master, would touch and delude him.
match in Russia, had sunk greatly in the esteem of society after his
mathematics from her father, and when the old prince was at home went
matter of indifference whether he remained there for a few hours or for
matters very satisfactorily. Borís, during the campaign, had made the
matters yourself!’ Yes... That was the answer I got!”
“Matvévna’s” carriage. At the foot of the hill, a pale hussar
“Matvévna,” the gun from which they had removed the dead officer.
may not have seen, but I have seen, how good men brought up in those
may perhaps have a stronger effect on the sincere seeker after wisdom
“May the devil take them—the traitors!”
mazuwka is this? But she does dance splendidly.”
me.”
meaning for anyone else, but gave him some of the best joys of his life;
meaning for him, that he paid no attention to it. The aunt was just
means. Then you say, ‘lighten his toil.’ But as I see it, physical
me,” answered a voice struggling with tears.
meant for him not only the loss of sixteen hundred rubles, but the
meant to double the three thousand just put down to his score, when
Meanwhile, Pétya, having found and seized the sabers in the outer room,
measures—the removal of injunctions, petitions, permits, and so
meeting arrives. Not daring to look round and without looking round, he
meeting, they had kissed each other, but today they felt it could not
me. ‘Everyone fears a bear,’ he says, ‘but when you see one your
me in choosing me for your second, if at this grave, this very
me in the eyes of society, and even of the court,” he added, lowering
me in war the energy of young men often shows the way better than all
me, just because I have exerted myself on his behalf, befriended him,
melancholy was just like the august melancholy she showed at the mention
members and guests jostling one another and trying to get a good look
members of the council of war. They were drinking tea, and only awaited
memory, and he told everybody that his son had been killed. He tried not
me... myself most of all. Then I don’t eat, don’t wash... and how is
men and provisions have not arrived. Gallop off to him at once and
men disfigured by fear of death now crowded together, crushing one
men, seemed so immeasurably above him, an insignificant officer of the
men’s will.
men take their first steps on life’s road, each saw immense changes in
mental activity is to you or me. You can’t help thinking. I go to bed
mental image of his future activity in this direction rose in his mind.
men—the Minister of Foreign Affairs, Prince Adam Czartorýski.... It
mention, and which you think is the result of your own mental efforts,
mentioned during the journey.
mentioned their age. “If you marry it will be a different thing,”
mention her!” he exclaimed fiercely.
men was training a trotter of his own for a race. He knew a lady on one
men with broad, self-confident faces, fat fingers, and resolute gestures
merry reminiscences.
message to Kutúzov, perhaps even to the sovereign himself. The morning
me! That’s the sort of man he is, and nothing more,” replied
met him at the first door and, expressing their delight at seeing such a
met, she fell on his breast, sobbing. She could not lift her face, but
me—yet dreadful and unnatural as it seems, I would give them all at
middle of the muddy road.
midnight. Prince Andrew went out.
midwife.
might, and a passionate attraction to him who was the cause of this
might deprive him of all this happiness, newly appreciated and newly
might, feeling that he would like to injure himself by that shout, if
might have been more decisive had the commander in chief not been so
might retreat and leave the pickets.”
might toward the bushes. He did not now run with the feeling of doubt
Mikháylovna entered the hall. Though she came upon the count in his
Mikháylovna’s voice alone in a long speech, then a cry, then silence,
mile and a half away, but had suddenly and unexpectedly appeared just in
miles, and reining in his horse he sighed restfully and looked round
military code, which he and the others knew in the regiment, there was
military men, bore that expression of condescending respect for their
milk-white sea. Nothing was visible in the valley to the left into which
millions in hand might smile at a poor fellow who told him that he, poor
millions of human beings who grew up in the same way. As twenty
Milorádovich wheeled his horse sharply and stationed himself a little
mind to ask him a question about the roads, the traveler had closed his
miniature portrait of her son on the lid of a snuffbox, while the tears
minister’s son was, with his rosy cheeks and dark eyebrows, and with
minute later with another committeeman, carrying a large silver salver
minutes before the troops had passed the Emperors. Not only would it
minutest details himself. Princess Mary had ceased taking lessons in
mirror her eyes full of tears and her mouth quivering, ready to burst
mischief-makers don’t meddle even a German beats Buonaparte. He is
misery. A man offended you and you shot him, and you say you do not
misery. That could not be, yet he awaited with a sinking heart the
misfortune? And when did it begin? Such a little while ago I came to
misleading you.”
missed him. His one desire was to know what was happening and at any
“Missed!” shouted Dólokhov, and he lay helplessly, face downwards
mist!”
mistake and that Anatole meant to flirt with Mademoiselle Bourienne,
mistaken,” said the stranger in a deliberate and loud voice.
mist and taking it for a tree can again take it for a tree after he has
misunderstanding. I expect you feel it so yourself. Let us write her
misunderstandings and did not now feel she had a right to ask him for
mixture onto the floor and asked for some more water. The maid brought
modeling and modeling you must get smeared with clay,” suggesting
moment consider what she should do), but all this had long been familiar
moment of meeting had been so beatific that his present joy seemed
moment, sat beside him: the rest, crowding round him, watched every
moments: but his words sounded so weak that he felt ashamed of himself.
moment the French who were attacking, suddenly and without any apparent
moment those hands with their short reddish fingers and hairy wrists,
“Mon Dieu! Mon Dieu! Oh!” she heard as she left the room.
monument from Moscow which he intended to erect in his own garden to his
more.
more and more animated and evidently wishing to express his new outlook
more animated. Only when a man was killed or wounded did he frown and
more confirmed the farther he rode into the region behind the village of
more confused, blushed like a child till tears came to his eyes, began
more cunning or subtle diplomatist—you know, a combination of French
more, for immediately afterwards cannon began firing from somewhere and
more honorable to admit one’s mistake than to let matters become
more important guests—an old general and his wife, and Anna Pávlovna
more important nearer to the honored guest, as naturally as water flows
more noticeable how much plainer she had become. Some unobtrusive touch
more outcries, and tears of joy. He could not distinguish which was
more! Some more!” a merry voice was saying in his soul. But no more
More than anyone else, Prince Vasíli took possession of Pierre’s
mortification, our opinion of Bonaparte cannot alter. We shall not cease
Moscovites who took their opinions from others—Ilyá Rostóv among
Moscow!”
Moscow after the death of Count Bezúkhov, he would call Pierre, or
Moscow. As a result he could not go to the country with the rest of the
Moscow’s hero was the fact that he had no connections in the city
Moscow their house was always full of visitors. The night after the
Moscow. The remembrance of the Rostóvs’ house and of his childish
Moscow who was expected every moment, and men on horseback with lanterns
most of her observations, it made everyone feel uncomfortable, not
most part to be spoken at a moment of victory and triumph, generally
most strongly expressed his insincere love for her, and he felt the
mother by the news of this loss, he knew what a relief it would be to
moved and halted at the officers’ command, turned with banners flying,
moved off accompanied by an irregularly swaying sea of aides-de-camp.
movement of Dólokhov’s hands. Those broad, reddish hands, with hairy
movement of the Tsar’s seemed to him enchanting.
movements of the mass of which in his regiment he felt himself a tiny,
movement, word, or look of his, never taking their blissfully adoring
move on a few steps and be killed themselves in the same way.
“Move on a hundred yards and we are certainly saved, remain here
move on. The horses moved off the bank. The ice, that had held under
Moving the money forward he prepared to deal. Rostóv sat down by his
moving toward our left flank, the higher command found that our center
much as a sailor is by his ship. However far he has walked, whatever
“Much as Mamma pressed her, she refused, and I know she won’t change
much at the captain as at those who were laughing, among whom Zherkóv
much because he heard their sound as because he saw uneasiness on
much interest him because at that moment he felt with delight that he
much, my dear sir.”
much of it left.”
much to say to one another in private and so they had been seeking an
mud-bespattered breeches. The German landlady, hearing Rostóv’s loud
music. Amid these sounds, only the youthful kindly voice of the Emperor
muskets of the nearest soldiers. The soldiers started firing without
mustache. “I want to know what you men are like. Are you the same as
must gain his confidence and friendship and through him obtain a special
“Must one die like a dog?” said he.
must remain hidden from thee, but live so that thou mayest be ready for
muttered something and colored.
“My cousin has nothing to do with this and it’s not necessary to
“My darling!” he said—a word he had never used to her before.
my dear boy, are you serving in the Horse Guards?” asked the old man,
“My dear count, you were one of my best pupils—you must dance,”
“My dear fellow,” Nesvítski whispered to Prince Andrew, “the old
“My dear fellow, what have you been up to in Moscow? Why have you
“My dear friend?” said she, in a tone of pathetic inquiry, prepared
“My dear,” he heard what seemed to him her despairing whisper behind
“My dear, I must tell you that this is a moment I shall never, never
“My dear, really... it’s better not to wake him... he’s asleep,”
“My dear,” said Princess Mary, addressing her brother from beside
my dear sir,” he added, seeing that his servant had entered... “and
“My desire is never to leave you, Father, never to separate my
my empty portmanteau and my dressing gown. The Emperor proposes to give
“My God, how happy I should be if he ordered me to leap into the fire
“My God, I’m a ruined and dishonored man! A bullet through my brain
“My God! What does it all mean?” thought he. “And here, where at
my men in the wood. I beg of you, I beg of you,” he repeated, “to
“My mother! My mother, my angel, my adored angel mother,” and
“My passion! I have had so many,” replied Pierre.
my riding and commanding so vast an army, so I have passed on the
myself and ruined my life. And only now when I am living, or at least
myself and you with the hope that your son is alive, for otherwise
myself not long ago, in Moscow and when traveling, but at such times I
mysteriously. “Yes, tomorrow, tomorrow!” he thought. “Tomorrow
mystery is of such a nature that nobody can know or use it unless he be
mystery on which perhaps the fate of mankind depends. But since this
my stupidity.”
“My vocation is a different one,” thought Princess Mary. “My
naked shoulders. She did not give him the money, but let herself be
namesake, the new Count Bezúkhov) “and now she’s in love with that
name to rectify this omission, Prince Andrew galloped back. Kutúzov
NAPOLEON
Napoleon. “If he weren’t afraid of a battle why did he ask for that
Napoleon’s eyes Prince Andrew thought of the insignificance of
Napoleon’s proclamation was as follows:
Napoleon who said it. He heard the speaker addressed as Sire. But he
Napoleon with even greater warmth than the year before. Orders were
Narýshkin, Uvárov, Dolgorúkov, Apráksin, Valúev, to the committee,
“Nataly,” he said, moving with rapid steps toward her, “decide my
Natásha, after she had pulled him down toward her and covered his face
Natásha, and Sónya, and will certainly never touch a card again.” At
Natásha. But he was not as much at ease with Sónya and Dólokhov as
Natásha could not remain calm, seeing him in such a plight. She began
Natásha fell in love the very moment she entered the ballroom. She
Natásha flared up. “I don’t want to marry anyone. And I’ll tell
Natásha looked at Sónya with wondering and inquisitive eyes, and said
Natásha. Nicholas understood that something must have happened between
Natásha no less proud of her first long dress and of being at a real
Natásha, seeing the impression the news of her brother’s wound
Natásha’s intermediacy, to remind him of his promise, and then
Natásha smiled through her tears.
Natásha’s prediction proved true. Dólokhov, who did not usually care
Natásha’s previous remark. “It’s because she was in love with
Natásha suddenly flushed.
Natásha, that winter, had for the first time begun to sing seriously,
Natásha took the first note, her throat swelled, her chest rose,
Natásha to sing.
Natásha, who was exceptionally graceful, was first, even danced the pas
natural to him was very gentle and wary with them both at dinner. On
near by the news spread that the Emperor was unwell. He ate nothing and
near everything grew brighter, more joyful, more significant, and more
near him and only wished that they would help him and bring him back to
near him pricked their ears at these shouts. Over there, where the
nearly cut our left flank in half were for the moment repulsed. Our
Near the altar of the church at Bald Hills there was a chapel over the
near the gun waved their arms and beat the horses to make them turn and
necessary for the position. Then there’s this house, which must be
necessity of going back on his word. With a sinking heart he watched
neck. On his right sat the Italian abbé whom Pierre had met at
needed.
needed for success in the service was not effort or work, or courage, or
need, even the inevitability, of entering into conversation with this
need some money.”
neighbor, and may envy never dim the purity of that bliss. Forgive thy
neighboring town, who had been at Bald Hills for the last fortnight.)
neighboring wheel is as quiet and motionless as though it were prepared
neighbor? No! You have spent your life in idleness. Then you married, my
neighbor on his right quickly turned in alarm to Bezúkhov.
neither moving forward to protect the battery nor backward with the
neither of her gown and coiffure nor of how she would go in nor of what
neither of them could think of her as a rival, so they began dressing
Nesvítski closed their eyes. At the same instant they heard a report
Nesvítski. Count Ilyá Rostóv with the other members of the committee
Nesvítski’s and Dólokhov’s sabers, which were stuck into the
Nesvítski stopped him and took him home.
Nesvítski was there as an old member of the club. Pierre, who at his
never bear malice or enmity toward thy brother. Be kindly and courteous.
Never had love been so much in the air, and never had the amorous
never says anything stupid. She says little, but what she does say is
never to dare to change your way of dress without my consent.”
new church, previously begun, had cost about 10,000 in each of the last
new friend’s influence.
newly erected buildings were standing empty and that the serfs continued
new mustache. “Now then, get on,” he shouted to the driver. “Do
new pack of cards said: “Bank, gentlemen!”
new path so attractively shown him by the Masons, on which he firmly
news.
news and common acquaintances like people who do not know each other
news—if it’s not false. Bennigsen seems to have obtained a complete
Next came four soldiers, carrying something heavy on a cloak, and passed
Next day, at eight in the morning, Pierre and Nesvítski drove to the
Next day Rostóv saw Denísov off. He did not wish to stay another
Next day, the army began its campaign, and up to the very battle of
Next day the French army did not renew their attack, and the remnant of
Next day, the third of March, soon after one o’clock, two hundred and
Next morning, after the fatigues of their journey, the travelers slept
Next morning when the valet came into the room with his coffee, Pierre
next note, the next phrase, and everything in the world was divided into
“Nice! And so you no longer wish to marry Borís?”
nice... but it won’t do...not that... but as a friend, I shall always
    * Nicholas.
Nicholas and Denísov were walking up and down, looking with kindly
Nicholas began pacing up and down the room.
“Nicholas! Come out in your dressing gown!” said Natásha’s voice.
“Nicholas, don’t tell me that!” she said.
“Nicholas! Get up!” Natásha’s voice was again heard at the door.
“Nicholas, have you come? Come here, dear!” called the old countess
Nicholas, having as usual exhausted two pairs of horses, without
Nicholas’ letter was read over hundreds of times, and those who were
Nicholas Rostóv, with Denísov and his new acquaintance, Dólokhov, sat
Nicholas straight in the eyes, “you know the saying, ‘Lucky in love,
Nicholas tried to say “Yes,” but could not: and he nearly burst into
Nicholas turned away from her. Natásha too, with her quick instinct,
“Nicholas!” was all Sónya said, instantly turning white.
Nicholas went to her, kissed her hand, and sitting down silently at her
“Nicholas, will you come to Iogel’s? Please do!” said Natásha.
night. But now, in the solitude of the journey, they seized him with
night he had not the slightest doubt, and the guiltlessness of
night I looked at the campfires and there was no end of them. A regular
night when he had decided that to marry Hélène would be a calamity and
“Nikólenka... a letter... wa... a... s... wounded... my darling
Nikólenka; by his relations as a charming, attractive, and polite young
“Nikólenka, what is the matter?” Sónya’s eyes fixed on him
“Nikólenka... wounded... a letter,” she announced in gleeful
nineteenth, a great, excitedly bustling activity began which lasted till
no?”
“No.”
“No.”
no account have told a deliberate lie. He began his story meaning to
“No apologies, none whatever,” said Dólokhov to Denísov (who on
“Nobody wants me!” thought Rostóv. “There is no one to help me or
“No, but don’t you think it’s nice?” she kept repeating.
“No, but I have been in love a thousand times and shall fall in
“No, but I must. It may be arrogant of me, but still it is best to say
“No, but listen,” she said, “now you are quite a man, aren’t
“No, but she said that it was all over and that he’s now an
“No, but what is it, my dear? Do you want me to go and tell him?”
“No, call her you, please! I’ll tell you all about it some other
No, certainly I must not approach him, I must not intrude on his
“No, dearest, sweet one, honey, I won’t give up—I know you know
“No. Give me the book,” said the stranger.
“No good... no good...” said the prince rapidly, and thrusting his
“No, he’s not a fool!” replied Natásha indignantly and seriously.
“No, I can’t agree with you! To live only so as not to do evil and
“No, I considered it erroneous and did not follow it,” said Pierre,
“No, I hate my life,” Pierre muttered, wincing.
“No, I have been transferred to the line,” said Anatole, hardly able
“No, I meant to ask...” Pierre began, but Prince Andrew interrupted
“No, I mustn’t. I am so sorry for him! He’s so nice.”
“No, it’s a sprain.”
“No, it’s only indigestion?... Say it’s only indigestion, say so,
“No, it will not do,” she said decidedly, clasping her hands. “No,
“No, I will do it myself, only tell me what to say. It’s all very
“No, leave me alone,” said Princess Mary.
no longer, as it should be, to avoid or attack the enemy, but solely to
“No, Mamma, but I’m so sorry for him. I don’t know how I’m to
“No, Mamma, I’m not in love with him, I suppose I’m not in love
“No matter at all, my dear count,” she said, meekly closing her
“No matter, Princess, don’t be alarmed,” said Mary Bogdánovna.
“No, merci, mon père.”
“No, mon père.”
“No, my dear fellow, I’ll be a wallflower,” said Denísov.
“No, no! A thousand times no! I shall never agree with you,” said
“No, no!” cried Natásha, “she and I have already talked it over.
“No! No! No! When your father writes to tell me that you are behaving
“No, not on any account! I will tell him myself, and you’ll listen
‘nonsense!’”
nonsense... but this is real.... Now then, Natásha, now then, dearest!
nonsense, but we are friends forever. She, if she loves anyone, does it
nonsense,” he thought. “The slur on my name and honor—that’s all
“Nonsense, indeed! I am telling you the fact,” said Natásha
nonsense, the chief thing is not to forget the important thing I
“No one can attain to truth by himself. Only by laying stone on stone
“No, one can’t hear them. They’d be firing if we had.”
No one slept.
“No, on my true word of honor,” said Natásha, crossing herself,
“No-o-o!” muttered Dólokhov through his teeth, “no, it’s not
“No, Papa is not back yet,” said Sónya.
“No, pardon me, I won’t go now till the child is better,” thought
“No, Prince, our regiment has gone to the front, but I am attached...
“No, Princess, I have lost your affection forever!” said
“No really, my dear, this dress is not pretty,” said Lise, looking
nose. His face was depressed and gloomy. He seemed to see and hear
“No, Sónya, but do you remember so that you remember him perfectly,
no such reminiscences really exist—just as none existed in this case.
not a distinction,” said the diplomatist—“a gift, rather.”
not a logical answer and not at all a reply to them. The answer was:
“Not at all bad!” he thought, examining her, “not at all bad, that
not at once raise, and he spent most of his time in the girls’ room.
not been found nor was he on the list of prisoners. What was worst of
not breathe. He knew that he must do something to put an end to this
not but believe in the sincerity of those around him. Besides, he had
not but tremble and his heart stand still at the imminence of that word.
not come and brought his pupil with him” (for some reason Prince
noted them down.
“No, tell them to harness.”
Not expecting to come on the enemy down by the stream, and having
not expect you today,” he added. “I only sent you the note yesterday
Not far from the artillery campfire, in a hut that had been prepared
Not finding the young prince in his study the valet went with the
“Nothing,” answered Princess Mary, looking firmly with her radiant
nothing, but here on the one hand the local nobility have done me the
nothing, but that. But even it does not exist, there is nothing but
Nothing could be seen. Pitch-dark, brother! Isn’t there something to
nothing more important...” he paused, “than to have a good sleep.”
“Nothing, my dear.”
nothing of her and looks only at Bourienne. No, she has no pride... but
nothing of what was going on around him and to be absorbed by some
“Nothing... only a shell...” he answered.
“Nothing... only I feel sad... sad about Andrew,” she said, wiping
nothing. She felt that Sónya was speaking the truth, that there was
nothing to be happy about!” thought he.
nothing to him.... “I should perhaps have done the same thing in his
“Not hurt, Petróv?” asked one.
noticeable one at the dinner. Rostóv looked inimically at Pierre,
noticed, left the room with a pleasant smile.
noticed the French appearing below them, and then they fired grapeshot
no time for reflection, as in Petersburg. Instead of the new life he had
no time to ask himself whether these people were sincere or not. He
not intend to devote her life to serving Prince Bolkónski, to reading
“Not killed—wounded!” another officer corrected him.
not know: he therefore wished to speak to Dolgorúkov.
not know Him, but He is here, He is in me, He is in my words, He is in
“Not Kutúzov, but what’s his name—well, never mind... there are
not leave the battery. He decided to have the guns removed from their
not like us sinners of the line,” cried Rostóv, with martial swagger
not many left alive. Go that way, to that village, all the commanders
“Not more stupid than you, madam,” said the nine-year-old Pétya,
not moving a muscle.
“No, to kill a man is bad—wrong.”
not only without interest but even as if ashamed of what Pierre was
not realize that he had come. His coming had nothing to do with
not replying to the Austrian.
not resume your former way of life. And now I wish you a good journey,
not rise. Rostóv also tried to rise but fell back, his sabretache
“Not seen Duport—the famous dancer? Well then, you won’t
not see or understand Him and may not see or understand his own vileness
not see ten paces ahead. Bushes looked like gigantic trees and level
not suit in the least. Not in the least! Please change it.”
not ten times wounded, killed, or betrayed, well... what then?...”
not to challenge Bolkónski. “Of course not!” he now thought. “Is
not to have to repent is not enough. I lived like that, I lived for
not to notice one another. When having limbered up the only two cannon
not understand what he ought to do then it will be my affair—yes, my
not venture to ask any questions, and shut the door again, now sitting
not what he had read that vexed him, but the fact that the life out
not wish it. In a word, I make no promise. And I beg you to consider
Notwithstanding the tone of wearied assurance with which these words
notwithstanding this, Borís embraced him in a quiet, friendly way and
novelty she offered her guests this time was not Mortemart, but a
Novosíltsev, Prince Volkónsky, Strógonov, and the others, all richly
now.”
now aiming, now counting the charges, now giving orders about replacing
now before I am off duty. I’ll take another turn and when I get back
now centered round the Emperor. So we will go to Dolgorúkov; I have to
“Now, dear boy,” said Prince Vasíli playfully, “say ‘yes,’
now gradually opening before me.” But five of the other virtues which
“No! What is there to talk about?” said Pierre. “It’s all the
nowhere encountering the enemy. On the contrary, the soldiers became
Now he was a lieutenant of hussars, in a jacket laced with silver, and
“Now I must disclose to you the chief aim of our Order,” he said,
“Now look out for the ball... we’ll throw it back.”
“Now?” repeated Natásha, and a happy smile lit up her face. “Have
now,” said another.
“Now, Sónya!” she said, going to the very middle of the room, where
“Now the fun begins,” thought Anatole, sitting down with a smile
Now then, darling! How will she take that si? She’s taken it! Thank
“Now then, Matvévna, dear old lady, don’t let me down!” he was
“Now then, now then, I’m only joking!” he said. “Remember this,
“Now then, Váska,” said Nicholas.
now there’s this recruiting.”
now the smile of the little princess—influenced by the general mood
now,” thought Rostóv driving his spurs into Rook and letting him go
“Now thou hast seen the lesser light,” uttered a voice. Then the
now told about that affair!”
now to look at Dólokhov, who was sitting opposite him. Every time
now was evidently ready with a joke. “Whether tomorrow brings
now we shall get anything we want from his hothouses. I have to see him
now, when my heart fails me and my mouth feels dry at the mere sight
“Now you don’t know that at all!” said Nicholas. “But I must
“Now you, young prince, what’s your name?” said Prince Bolkónski,
“No, you don’t understand!”
“No, you know it’s too soon for news. But my father is anxious and I
number of men had perished in fleeing from Pratzen. The French had not
nurse and nurse Sávishna in the late princess’ rooms and Princess
nurse, Praskóvya Sávishna, who hardly ever came to that room as the
Nurse Sávishna, knitting in hand, was telling in low tones, scarcely
nurse’s French, at which he and Borís used to laugh long ago.
obedience—which did not even seem to him a virtue, but a joy. (He now
obedient, and insignificant atom. They followed Prince Dolgorúkov out
obeying, and suddenly doubts arose in his mind. “Where am I? What am
object it is necessary that... The first column marches... The second
objects mentioned by the Rhetor, this last, that of improving mankind,
obligingly took the dish from Bagratión (or he would, it seemed, have
obtain a post on the commander in chief’s staff. Berg and Borís,
obtained his captaincy during the campaign, had gained the confidence of
obtained through an acquaintance and sent to her son, asking him to take
occasioned by the sausage eaters.
occupation, came up to her for a moment and made haste to go away,
occupation of the town of Wischau and the capture of a whole French
occupied by the Emperors and their retinues.
occupied with evening parties, dinners, lunches, and balls, giving him
occupy is a strong one, and while they are marching to go round me on
occupy the position and prepare for an attack.”
occurred to him. On the contrary, he became more and more elated. It
o’clock all had been brought into due order. The ranks were drawn
o’clock left the third column with which he had been and galloped
of all that mass of huge and handsome men, of all those brilliant,
of all these brilliant young men.
of all. This gift will be a pledge of your purity of heart to her whom
of Alms” went round to all the brothers. Pierre would have liked
of amusement which someone for some reason had to provide for him.
of an attack spread through the squadron. The command to form up rang
of, and am going to rejoin my regiment, I am giving a farewell supper
of a sin he could neither remedy nor forget. He could not weep. The
of a subject, she did not stop talking, but chattered about the
of a surgeon who has just performed a difficult operation and admits the
of Austerlitz, but wore a tight new uniform with Russian and foreign
of Austerlitz: nine tenths of the men in the Russian army were then in
of Bagratión’s detachment. His hussars were placed along the line
of battles was evidently culminating in a panic.
of beginning anew pictured to himself the blissful, irreproachable,
of being afraid roused him again. “I cannot be afraid,” thought he,
of believing in the possibility of attaining perfection, and in the
of birds.
of blessedness which now flooded his heart with glad emotion.
of cavalry came up and disappeared in the sea of mist. In front and
of contempt. “And believe me, if I still value my life it is
“Of course, it is a very brilliant match, but happiness, my dear...”
“Of course, we only just missed one another,” said the staff
of cowardice in the other. Both passed the examination successfully. As
of cruelty, as when tying the policeman to the bear and dropping them
of delighted amazement.
of disease without help while material assistance could so easily be
of dread was in the air. It was evident that the affair so lightly begun
of each.
of England, inspired by such hatred of our nation! This victory will
of eternal peace and blessedness?” she thought.
of exasperation. “Don’t you hear it’s His Majesty the Emperor’s
off; and here at last was a Russian prince. Mademoiselle Bourienne knew
off, and the firing had begun to subside. Suddenly, near by on the
off—and this is what comes of it!” said Prince Andrew in an
of fate and the designs of rogues. During the few days he spent in
off at every moment. They waited and listened.
of fear for his young and happy life, possessed his whole being. Rapidly
off his eyes and glanced around him. The room was in black darkness,
officer.”
officer and a wounded hero, would it be right to remind him of herself
officer in the white uniform of the Horse Guards.
officer passing by addressed him:
officers.
Officer!” said Bagratión to Rostóv, “are the enemy’s skirmishers
officers became animated. The Guardsmen told Rostóv of their march and
officers, but every soldier with his freshly washed and shaven face and
officers buttoned up their coats, buckled on their swords and pouches,
officers, generals, and adjutants, as they passed Rostóv going or
officers who had gathered at his quarters. The little old man with
officer, with a smile to Bolkónski.
of fire and had descended into the dip, he was met by some of the staff,
of fugitives, Prince Andrew, trying to keep near Kutúzov, saw on the
of hearts. On the previous Sunday the old count had given his son
of hearts with a torn corner, which he had picked up from the floor. He
of Hélène. Some, as if unwilling to distract her from an important
of her most august Majesty the Empress Márya Fëdorovna. Pierre felt
of her worthlessness he was also dreaming of how she would be his
of him—at the battery. He now saw clearly the figure of a red-haired
of him?” Not one of the innumerable speeches addressed to the Emperor
of his appearance before her now. Prince Andrew went round the sofa and
of his book with his old hands which from excitement he could not keep
of his commissions and ordered the small closed carriage for her.
Of his former bachelor acquaintances many were no longer in Petersburg.
of his return.
of his words for the solemnity of the moment, as he spoke. “I
of horses had been sent up the highroad to meet the German doctor from
of horse’s hoofs approaching at a trot along the line of hussars was
of how beside himself and all aflame with excitement, he had flown like
of inviting the other to take a seat beside him. Pierre felt reluctant
of joy in his eyes, looked round him, not knowing how to answer the
of Lannes’ sharpshooters were already seen crossing the milldam and
of love and self-sacrifice. And cost what it may, I will arrange
of love which pervaded the Rostóv household that winter and, now after
of men and horses, from the little puffs of smoke on the enemy’s side
of mind, Pierre carried out an intention he had long had of visiting his
of now as the “Seeker,” now as the “Sufferer,” and now as the
of officers and courtiers, was riding a bobtailed chestnut mare, a
of Olmütz where Bolkónski had seen him for the first time abroad, but
of permission previously given him by Kutúzov to be present at the
of Peter and Paul, his patron saints. In another place the women with
of pride, indolence, and ignorance. Forgive me, my dear sir, but if I
of Prussia, in order to draw Borís into the conversation.
of Sergéy Kuzmích and at the same time his eyes glanced toward his
of several thousand men could produce. The lights spread farther and
of shots retreated. In the highest army circles from midday on the
of sixteen, evidently passionately in love with him (he did not doubt
of slaves? Have you helped them physically and morally? No! You have
of some dislocation and blunder spread through the ranks. How such
of sons and brothers.
often heard from his fellow hussars.
often than at anyone else and took delight in his every movement.
of the advance. As soon as an Austrian officer showed himself near
of the Azóv and Podólsk infantry and the Pávlograd hussars—was
of the boulevards whom he visited of an evening. He led the mazurka
of the campfire, waving his uplifted arm.
of the candles was focused on those two happy faces alone.
of the cannon. He heard the whistle of bullets above him unceasingly and
of the club, beset the new arrivals. Count Ilyá, again thrusting his
of the club from the day it was founded. To him the club entrusted the
of the dam, throwing two soldiers off their feet, and ran onto the
of the dip in the ground at the rear was hurried and noisy, but the
of the Emperor like a cloud of haze across a clear sky and vanished.
of the enemy’s lines, which all day long had yielded ground to us
of the feebleness of age, “Bolkónski!” he whispered, pointing to
of the field he stood on was well-known and familiar ground. Though he
of the Frenchmen with the gunners ended, whether the red-haired gunner
of the general sorrow.
of the Gospel: “In the beginning was the Word and the Word was with
of the hand on the dial of human history.
of the intellectual essence of Petersburg,” as she herself put it.
of the lovers. “That’s happiness!”
of the maids who was present. (Mary Bogdánovna was a midwife from the
of the majestic Emperor. Casually, while surveying the squadron, the
of the meal and was certain that there was some secret between her
of them will have any meaning for me. Tomorrow perhaps, even certainly,
of the nearness of the Emperor Francis’ black cob, nor of all that was
of the newly commissioned officer were collected. Anna Mikháylovna,
of the night. The gloom that enveloped the army was filled with their
of the nineteenth March, and her downy little lip rose from old habit,
of the orderlies and servants.
of the President, who held a mallet in his hand. Let into the wall was
of the room. Prince Andrew turned to him, but the doctor gave him a
of the sayings and doings of their commander, the Grand Duke, and told
of the second gun’s crew was “uncle”; Túshin looked at him more
of these maneuvers that enabled us to escape him. Buxhöwden pursues
of the sleigh.
of the statutes and these remained in his mind.
of the streams and hollows of Sokolnitz and Schlappanitz beyond which we
of the sun. In front, far off on the farther shore of that sea of mist,
Of the three precepts of Freemasonry Pierre realized that he did not
of the unwritten code of subordination—looked so fixedly at the
of the victory that had been gained. Prince Andrew introduced his
of the war and without leaders. The Moscovites felt that something was
of the wood ran out of it, the different companies getting mixed, and
of things to him in the very worst light, pointing out the necessity of
of this kind for another, which from pride he would never accept for
of those Frenchmen,” he said. “What nasty brutes they are! I’d
of truth, my dear sir, but have thrust her into an abyss of deceit and
of twenty; Sónya a girl of sixteen with all the charm of an opening
of voices, the tramping feet, the horses’ hoofs moving in mud, the
of Weyrother’s voice, he opened his one eye with an effort.
of which Kutúzov was standing began to shout, he rode a little to one
“Of whom you imagine me to be one?” said Prince Andrew, with a quiet
of wind blowing over the army slightly stirred the streamers on the
of your misfortune.” He seemed to emphasize the last word, as if to
of yours, is not at all to blame that my face has the misfortune to
“Oh, but you were there?” said Prince Bagratión, addressing Prince
“Oh dear, what a beast I am!” muttered Rostóv, as he read the
“Oh, Denísov is quite different,” replied Nicholas, implying that
“Oh, don’t mention it, Count! I quite understand,” said Berg,
“Oh God, what would happen to me if the Emperor spoke to me?”
“Oh, go to the devil!” called out a voice, drowned by the laughter
“Oh, how delightful it is!” she kept saying, running up to Sónya.
Oh, how I would guard him, how I would tell him the truth, how I would
“Oh, how nice, how splendid!” she said to everything.
Oh, how that chord vibrated, and how moved was something that was finest
“Oh, hush, please!” said another.
“Oh, it’s nothing. I only wished to say...” (he wanted to repeat
“Oh, it’s terrible to feel oneself so in this man’s power,”
“Oh, leave off, you always talk nonsense and keep putting things
“Oh, my God! thank God!” said Princess Mary. “I must go and meet
“Oh, Natásha!” said Sónya, looking ecstatically and earnestly at
“Oh no, let me off, Countess,” Denísov replied.
“Oh, no, no!” And besides the pallor and the physical suffering
“Oh no, not at all! On the contrary, I am very glad to make your
“Oh no!” said Iogel, hastening to reassure him. “You were only
“Oh, nothing,” said he, as if weary of being continually asked the
“Oh, nurse, I’m so glad!”
“Oh! Oh! Oh!” groaned Kutúzov despairingly and looked around....
“Oh, take those off... those...” she said, pointing to his
“Oh, that is all the same,” Dolgorúkov said quickly, and getting up
“Oh, that is dreadful, dreadful!” said Pierre. “I don’t
“Oh, that’s it!” said Rostóv, evidently thinking of something
Oh, that wicked Prince Hippolyte!” she said.
“Oh, the faiwy! She can do anything with me!” said Denísov, and
“Oh, those Moscow gossips!” said Dólokhov, and he took up the cards
“Oh, to die, to die for him,” thought Rostóv.
“Oh, very well, you may stay in attendance on me.”
“Oh, well then, good-by: go and dress. Is he very terrible,
“Oh, what a nuisance,” said Dolgorúkov, getting up hurriedly and
“Oh, what a pig I am, not to have written and to have given them
“Oh, what are you talking about?” said another. “Where is he to
“Oh, what nonsense!” cried Natásha, laughing. “I don’t think
“Oh, yes!”
“Oh yes,” assented Princess Mary, “perhaps that’s it. I’ll go.
“Oh, yes, I quite understand,” answered Rostóv, who was under his
“Oh yes, it is horribly stupid,” said Pierre.
“Oh yes, like that, I know, I only forgot,” said he.
“Oh, yes!” said Pierre, with a forced smile. “I am very grateful
“Oh yes, very much! My brother knows him, he’s dined with him—the
“Oh, you damned dandies! Clean and fresh as if you’d been to a fete,
“Oh, you fool!” said the old man, spitting angrily. Some time passed
“Oh, you Guards!” said Rostóv. “I say, send for some wine.”
Old Bolkónski had always had a poor opinion of Prince Vasíli’s
old chamberlain was heard assuring an old baroness that he loved her
old fellow? Out of sorts?”
old fool,” he thought. “That Princess Hélène will be beautiful
Old Gabriel brought in the wine.
old lady next to her and glanced angrily at her daughter, and her sigh
old man too came up and kissed the waxen little hands that lay quietly
Old Michael was asleep on the chest. Prokófy, the footman, who was
old miller had been accustomed to sit in his tasseled cap peacefully
old prince had forbidden it, appeared on the threshold with a shawl
Old Prince Nicholas Bolkónski received a letter from Prince Vasíli
old princess, kissing her soundly. “If I hadn’t this headache I’d
old prince understood from this official report that our army had been
Olmütz and that he wanted to see him as he had a letter and money for
Olmütz, was preparing to be reviewed next day by the two Emperors—the
on a few steps he stopped before Prince Andrew, who lay on his back with
on all sides, had stopped because a horse in front had fallen under a
on around him. Not only was he indifferent as to whether he got to
on a sofa in a far corner of the room. He closed his eyes and seemed to
On being relieved from picket duty Rostóv had managed to get a few
once.”
“Once again, Colonel,” said the general, “I can’t leave half
once for a moment of glory, of triumph over men, of love from men I
once he raised his eyebrows, abruptly touched his horse with his left
once recognized it to be a tuft of grass. She was terribly close to him.
once she has said...”
once the stranger closed the book, putting in a marker, and again,
once was—did not struggle, and perhaps she was right. Nothing has been
on condition that she should tell no one.
one another, beginning to see one another through the mist. They had the
one another time to ask questions and give replies concerning a thousand
one day’s ration of bread remains, and in some regiments none at all,
one foot, bounded from the floor like a ball, and flew round the room
one I’d give my life for her! But those!...” and he made a gesture
one is to interfere with his arrangements—leads his division to
one moment prayed to God as he had done on the battlefield at the bridge
“One more question, Count,” he said, “which I beg you to answer
one of the Ápsheron regiment went forward past the Emperor.
One of the hindmost guns that was going onto the dam turned off onto the
one of the lodges over the road purposely laden with snow.
One of them was leading by the bridle a fine large French horse he had
One of the players said he hoped he might be trusted.
One. “Oh, this senseless life of ours!” thought Nicholas. “All
(one shattered gun and one unicorn were left behind), Prince Andrew rode
“One should make up to the husbands of pretty women,” said Denísov.
one side of which symbolized God, another moral things, a third
one spot. His predictions were being justified. Part of the Russian
“One thing I thank God for is that I did not kill that man,” said
“O-ne! T-wo! Thwee!” he shouted angrily and stepped aside.
“One was damaged,” answered the staff officer, “and the other I
One was on a white horse. Prince Bagratión and Prince Dolgorúkov with
one would have expected of him.
On February 26, 1807, the old prince set off on one of his circuits.
on! Go on!” And cries of horror were heard in the crowd. The soldiers
on hearing of the arrival of the letter went softly into the room and
on hearing the news was one of anger with Sónya.... He tried to say,
On Hélène’s name day, a small party of just their own people—as
on her face.
on her priority) “that that senseless young man was spoiled by the
on her toes any longer. “So that’s what I’m up to! I’ll never
on him without changing their expression. “I love you all and have
on his pupil’s behalf. That’s how it’s to be understood! ‘How
On his return to Moscow from the army, Nicholas Rostóv was welcomed
on his thin bony legs, and keeping on a worn, nankeen-covered, sheepskin
on horseback facing the ditch. One with a white plume in his hat seemed
on!” innumerable voices suddenly shouted after the ball had struck
only a small lamp was burning inside something white. Pierre went nearer
only because I still hope to meet such a divine creature, who will
only betrayed us three times in three years. We take up their cause, but
only bivouacking here and have just come to look round. I am going back
only covered by her garments. And having once seen this he could not
only heard Dólokhov’s hurried steps, and his figure came in view
only help a bit! I must have singers too. I shall have my own orchestra,
“Only let me report this gentleman’s business, and I shall be at
only lit fires to deceive us.
Only now, when he was confronted by the stern authorities, did his guilt
only pressed it to the cold braiding of his hussar’s jacket. Denísov,
only Sónya, Nicholas, and Natásha, but even the old countess,
only sure happiness in life.”
“Only that?” said Bolkónski.
only to express his rapture fully.
Only when approaching Bagratión did Rostóv let his horse gallop again,
Only when Prince Andrew was gone did Rostóv think of what he ought to
On our right flank commanded by Bagratión, at nine o’clock the battle
On reaching Petersburg Pierre did not let anyone know of his arrival,
On retiring to her own room, she sat in an armchair, her eyes fixed on a
on seeing Rostóv before him, with whom he would inevitably collide.
on—that Pierre became quite bewildered and only replied:
On that third of March, all the rooms in the English Club were filled
“On the 4th, the first courier arrives from Petersburg. The mails
“On the contrary, that coiffure suits the princess very well,” said
on the contrary, they stimulated his energy and determination.
on the cot.
On the eighteenth and nineteenth of November, the army advanced two
on the field.
on the field before the fortress. Now thousands of feet and bayonets
On the first arrival of the news of the battle of Austerlitz, Moscow had
on the ground.
on the little princess’ face, an expression of childish fear of
On the Pratzen Heights, where he had fallen with the flagstaff in his
on. The preoccupation and despondency which Pierre had noticed in his
on the snow.
on the table, again bound his eyes.
On the third day after Christmas Nicholas dined at home, a thing he had
on the top of her head (a style that quite altered and spoiled her
On the twelfth of November, Kutúzov’s active army, in camp before
on the unattractive martyrlike expression it so often wore, as she
On the way home, Prince Andrew could not refrain from asking Kutúzov,
“On Tuesday between eight and nine. It will give me great pleasure.”
on what he thought right. The steward promised to do all in his power to
on which Rostóv sat.
on which with a broken bit of chalk he had written “800 rubles” in
opened eyes. “What has happened to her? How she is singing today!”
opened the bedroom door.
open it. Someone was holding it shut.
operations according to him were connected with such complicated
opportunity of joining in the general current of recollections.
opportunity since morning to meet one another alone. When Princess Mary
opposite Pierre and seemed very gay. Rostóv was talking merrily to his
or anybody; but you are free to choose.... Go to your room, think it
or appreciative according to the way the joke was received. Everybody
“Or are you afraid to play with me?” Dólokhov now asked as if
or cap, his head was bandaged, and over his shoulder a French munition
ordained that the Austrian army should maneuver the previous year on the
ordeal was about to begin.
order.
ordered his horse at once and, coldly taking leave of Borís, rode
ordered to turn back to the right. Several thousand cavalry crossed in
orderly to the bravest general, and still more, he was going with a
orders.
Orders, and the Star of St. George on his left breast. Evidently just
Orders by heart and know the Regulations as well as I do the Lord’s
orders to the club steward and to the famous Feoktíst, the club’s
ordinary staid and respectful good manners habitual in the prince’s
or even to wish to be thought to listen. Exactly opposite Weyrother,
or gray horses; then again, spreading out with the brazen clatter of the
Or he would suddenly feel ashamed of he knew not what. He felt it
or Kutúzov was. Some said the report that the Emperor was wounded was
or make out anything of what was happening: there in the smoke men of
or of the necessity of rebuilding factories and workshops. So the first
or two in his head but dozens, some only beginning to form themselves,
or you as having been at all insulted, and as a man older than you, my
Ostralitz. In the large drawing room which had become the commander
other fare, was splendid, yet he could not feel quite at ease till the
other officer; he’ll say: ‘Go and find out what’s there.’ There
others and even from herself, the stronger it grew. “O God,” she
others and, in shirt sleeves and breeches, went glass in hand to the
others, only now have I understood all the happiness of life. No, I
other virtues—love of his neighbor, and especially generosity.
otherwise. To tell them that she felt ashamed for herself and for them
ought to be, now he fancied it was only something in his own eyes. His
ought to go straight to him and give the message Dolgorúkov had ordered
our enemies! Hurrah!” he exclaimed in his dashing, old, hussar’s
our fine speeches and in his rude and savage way throws himself on the
our hands! No, we mustn’t forget Suvórov and his rule—not to put
our members as much as possible to reform their hearts, to purify and
our officers.”
our officers and men at Austerlitz. One had saved a standard, another
our Order can bestow it will render you, my dear sir. You are going to
our present, depraved world. No one now loves virtue; it seems like
ourselves.”
ourselves, dear prince,” said the little princess (of course, in
ourselves, were growing up and dying with no idea of God and truth
‘our Sovereign, the Emperor,’ as they say at official dinners,”
our thoughts to the second, Bonaparte. But as it turns out, just at
our troops had descended and from whence came the sounds of firing.
our troops were known to him as far as they could be known to anyone
out.
out accidently.”
out and the sabers whizzed as they were drawn from their scabbards.
outlines. Dressed as she used to be in Petersburg society, it was still
out of hearing. Another musket missed fire but flashed in the pan.
out of it. They could not understand that I have not the necessary
out over the fire, and not waiting for an answer he gave a grunt and
outposts today and it is impossible to say where his chief forces are
outright.
outside his uniform.
out skirmishers. He had felt perfectly sure that there were other troops
out. The fences and gates were new and solid; two fire pumps and a
out there... both playing the hero... Ah, Vasíli Ignátovich...
over.” And after stumbling a few staggering steps right up to the
over, and come back in an hour and tell me in his presence: yes or no.
overflow with sick, and famine is everywhere. Twice the marauders even
over his shoulder, as when Rostóv had seen him on the eve of the battle
over. It will be a tremendous banquet.”
Overtaking the battalions that continued to advance, he stopped
over the battlefield had given final orders to strengthen the batteries
over the Enns, and then guessed that the card that came first to hand
over the squadron. Rostóv raised his saber, ready to strike, but at
owed him money! What baseness! What meanness! I know you understand
Owing to the terrible uproar and the necessity for concentration and
own about the facts he was recounting. For some time he engrossed the
own breast, the husband standing by and gazing tenderly at her and the
own eyes she comforted the count, and decided that at dinner and till
pace.
paces, and Nicholas could clearly distinguish every detail of his
pacing angrily about and snorting. The old prince felt as though he
painful to him at this moment of sorrow; besides, what can I say to him
painstaking effect that had been in it before; but she did not yet sing
palace in a manner agreeable to yourself, and in so far as circumstances
pale and his jaw trembled, shivering feverishly. He was placed on
pale and then blushing.
pale on seeing her father-in-law.
pale, with compressed lips and feverishly glittering eyes.
Pale, with quivering lips, Pierre snatched the copy.
pallid and quivered.
“Papa, I have come on a matter of business. I was nearly forgetting. I
“Papa! Pa-pa!” he called after him, sobbing, “forgive me!” And
Papa, which Natásha, and which Pétya. Everyone shouted, talked, and
paralyzed his will.
“Pardon me! A snuffbox with the Emperor’s portrait is a reward but
parents who have petted their children from babyhood, but which Prince
Paris. It was not calculation that guided her (she did not even for a
particularly calm and absent-minded way, which inspired the respect of
particularly discontented and out of temper. Whether he was in a bad
Particularly vivid, humiliating, and shameful was the recollection of
parties, wearing a dress such as was then fashionable, cut very low at
part in it, but also by the joyful expression on the faces of soldiers,
Partly because of the depressing memories associated with Bald Hills,
partly because Prince Andrew did not always feel equal to bearing with
partner’s hand firmly, threw back his head, and advanced his foot,
part of his legs; he had on a kind of necklace above which rose a high
part of his mind her image rose in all its womanly beauty.
party at which Pierre had to be present unless he wished to spoil
passed his time very gaily. After a short period of adapting himself
passed in step before the Emperors and their suites at a bold, brisk
passed, the Pávlograd division was ordered to advance. In Wischau
passing Bagratión and racing one another they rushed in an irregular
Passing behind one of the lines of a regiment of Foot Guards he heard a
passing, but before he had finished his greeting there was a general
passing it across Hélène’s back. Hélène stooped forward to make
passionately and tenderly, and old Mary Ivánovna, who had grown fond of
passionately, at which she laughed; at the other could be heard the
passionately fond of the boy, and Princess Mary often deprived herself
passionately repents. I will do all I can to arrange the match between
passion but in your own heart. The source of blessedness is not without
passion,” said the latter.
past the ladies into the little drawing room. With quick steps he went
path of virtue,” said the Mason.
patronage at the dancers.
patted his favorite, Rostóv, on the shoulder.
Paul was a market village where a fair was held on St. Peter’s day,
pause, “she told him she loved another.”
Pávlograd commander. The commanders met with polite bows but with
Pávlovna again touched Pierre’s sleeve, saying: “I hope you won’t
Pávlovna’s, an unacknowledged sense of the guilt of that desire
Pávlovna’s drawing room he considered an important step up in the
Pávlovna, shaking her little shriveled finger at him.
Pávlovna’s usual pink notes with an invitation to which was added:
Pávlovna’s voice, “I see you are all right there.”
Pávlovna’s words and looks when she spoke to him about his house,
Pávlovna threatened him on behalf of “our dear Vyazmítinov,” and
pay. I can tell you for myself...”
paying off the debts and undertaking new activities with serf labor,
payments had been diminished by a third, their obligatory manorial work
peace.”
peasant, or a woman with a baby, has no rest day or night and I give
peculiarities of his reserved nature, Borís had managed during his
peculiar to pregnant women. It was evident that her eyes did not see
pensions and the same amount for asylums; 150,000 alimony was sent to
people—businessmen, relations, and acquaintances alike—were all
people dancing, Iogel with Natásha, his pride and his best pupil, were
people do understand him. He is such a lofty, heavenly soul!”
perfection of manner. If he ever thought of Hélène, it was just of
perfect one’s self. And to attain this end, we have the light called
perhaps because it was hard for him, hungry as he was, to look on at
“Perhaps,” coldly and angrily replied Dólokhov, glancing at Sónya,
perhaps dying, while meeting my remorse with some forced bravado!”
perhaps I may...”
“Perhaps we’d really better not wake him,” he said hesitating.
permission here in hospital, that I may not have to play the part of a
perseverance, but only the knowledge of how to get on with those who can
personage, a position in the army which seemed to him most attractive.
personal interview was refused, and instead of the Sovereign, Prince
person she happened to look at she was in love with for that moment.
Petersburg.
Petersburg and staying at his house. With apparent absent-mindedness,
Petersburg earlier or later, or whether he secured accommodation at this
Petersburg. Hand this to Count Willarski” (he took out his notebook
Petersburg. He could not imagine how he could speak to her now. He
Petersburg. It is high time for you to get away from these terrible
Petersburg to ascertain what Moscow was thinking about Austerlitz.
petisenfans, allay cushay dormir!” he exclaimed, imitating his Russian
“Pétrusha has come with papers from your father,” whispered the
Pétya.
Pétya. Besides that, he sent greetings to Monsieur Schelling, Madame
Pétya, clinging to his legs, kept shouting, “And me too!”
Pétya in, closed again. A sound of laughter came from behind it.
Pétya paced the room in silence for a time.
Pétya, pacing the room with large, resolute strides. “Now I’m very
“Pétya, you’re a stupid!” said Natásha.
physically at that moment, there was a weight on his chest and he could
physical things, and the fourth a combination of these. Now and then
Pierre.
Pierre.
Pierre.
Pierre.
Pierre and there were lines of pain on his face and a shamefaced smile.
Pierre, as in a dream, saw several men standing before him, wearing
Pierre began describing what he had done on his estates, trying as far
Pierre blushed, as he always did when it was mentioned, and said
Pierre clutched his temples, and turning round went into the forest,
Pierre considered.
Pierre could not and did not wish to break this silence.
Pierre could not go on. He gulped and turned away.
Pierre did not catch what they were saying, but knew they were talking
Pierre dropped his eyes, lifted them again, and wished once more to see
Pierre felt confused and wished to avoid that look, but the bright old
Pierre felt himself far poorer than when his father had made him
Pierre felt that he was the center of it all, and this both pleased and
Pierre felt uncomfortable and even depressed in his friend’s company
Pierre flushed and, hurriedly putting his legs down from the bed, bent
Pierre, from joy, agitation, and embarrassment, was not in a state to
Pierre gave no answer, for he neither heard nor saw anything. He had
Pierre gradually began to recover himself and looked about at the room
Pierre had already long been feeling in himself that refreshing source
Pierre had met in Petersburg society. In the President’s chair sat a
Pierre had none of the practical persistence that would have enabled him
Pierre had of late rarely seen his wife alone. Both in Petersburg and in
Pierre, hardly restraining his sobs, began running toward Dólokhov and
Pierre in his preoccupation and absent-mindedness had not recognized
Pierre in his secret soul agreed with the steward that it would be
Pierre, in reply, sincerely agreed with her as to Hélène’s
Pierre, “I said at the time and before anyone else” (she insisted
Pierre knew very well what a hieroglyph was, but dared not speak. He
Pierre leaped up from the sofa and rushed staggering toward her.
Pierre listened with swelling heart, gazing into the Mason’s face with
Pierre looked silently and inquiringly at him over his spectacles.
Pierre looked silently and searchingly into Prince Andrew’s face,
Pierre, on unexpectedly becoming Count Bezúkhov and a rich man, felt
Pierre paused, seeking a reply.
Pierre, perplexed, looked round with his shortsighted eyes without
Pierre quickly took out his purse and watch, but could not manage for
Pierre recalled, counting them on his fingers, he felt already in his
Pierre remained gloomily silent, answering in monosyllables and
Pierre said nothing; he looked fixedly at his friend with surprise. He
Pierre sat opposite Dólokhov and Nicholas Rostóv. As usual, he ate and
Pierre’s direction at a slight rustle made by the latter. “Why have
Pierre’s eyes with it and tied it in a knot behind, catching some
Pierre sighed, rose submissively, emptied his glass, and, waiting till
Pierre smiled, but his smile showed that he knew it was not the story
Pierre stood with his arms hanging down and legs apart, before his
Pierre. The estates he had not before visited were each more picturesque
Pierre took his feet off the table, stood up, and lay down on a bed that
Pierre took off his coat, waistcoat, and left boot according to the
Pierre took them off, and his eyes, besides the strange look eyes have
Pierre tried several times to speak, but, on one hand, Prince Vasíli
Pierre turned over heavily on the ottoman and opened his mouth, but
Pierre was about to reply, but Prince Vasíli interrupted him.
Pierre was one of those people who, in spite of an appearance of what
Pierre was struck by the modesty of the small though clean house after
Pierre went with rapid steps to the door and suddenly came face to
Pierre. “What of it? It’s the truth!” and he himself smiled his
Pierre who had been regarded with patronizing condescension when he was
Pierre, whose preoccupied, absent-minded, and massive figure was a very
Pierre who was under such obligations to him (“But never mind that”)
Pierre wished to say something, looked at her with eyes whose strange
Pierre wished to say this to the Mason, but did not dare to. The
Pierre, with a gentle smile of pity and remorse, his arms and legs
Pierre, with downcast eyes, drank out of his glass without looking at
Pierre, without knowing why, was having his enormous Petersburg house
pilgrimage, of holy friendship, of the Eternal Architect of the
pinch of snuff.
pistols, and at the word thwee begin to advance.
pity, and for their sake I should like to liberate the serfs. You
pity me. Yet I was once at home, strong, happy, and loved.” He sighed
pity’s sake, leave this helpless youth who, after all, was the son of
place and that he might now be lying, recovering or dying, alone among
place and without answering drew out a handkerchief. Blood was flowing
place him on a stretcher that had been brought. The soldier groaned.
places and met in certain habitual groups. A minority of those present
place,” thought Pierre. “It’s even certain that I should have done
plain enough as it is.”
plainly that there are not many wives with husbands such as you who
plainness of speech, uttering the word amant as casually as any other
plaiting slippers out of cloth selvedges. He looked up at the opening
plan of a flanking movement.
plan perfectly worthless. Weyrother met all objections with a firm and
“Plans!” repeated Prince Andrew ironically. “My plans?” he said,
plans to Kutúzov’s quarters where the council of war was to be
players, or peered at the now cold face of Dólokhov and tried to read
playing a Viennese waltz on the clavichord, while a fourth, lying on
playing chess. Berg held a smoking pipe between his knees. Borís, in
“Plea...” began Dólokhov, but could not at first pronounce the
pleasant face and resonant though not loud voice, attracted everyone’s
“Please come and visit us... you know my brave boy... been together
“Please come to tea. The prince will be out in a moment,” came the
pleased faces, for they knew that under no other management could they
“Please,” he uttered with an effort.
“Please place your money on the cards or I may get muddled in the
“Please, Vasíli Dmítrich,” Natásha was saying, “do come!”
pleasure of deceiving me, if it really were true. Yes, if it were true,
pleasures than allow himself to be seen in a shabby equipage or appear
pleasure that for the first time since his arrival Prince Andrew was
“Plenty of time, your excellency,” muttered Kutúzov in the midst of
point... Come, how are you?” asked Rostóv.
pointed boot then fashionable, touched the groin of the bobtailed bay
Pointing to the fields, he spoke of the improvements he was making in
pointing to the flying soldiers; but at that instant, as if to punish
point where the French pickets had been standing that evening.
polished shining cannon that quivered on the gun carriages and with
political news. It became particularly animated toward the end of the
pomaded hair, perfumed, and in a new uniform, looking just as smart as
pondered. A husband, a man, a strong dominant and strangely attractive
pondered. Sometimes he staked a large sum, but Dólokhov refused to
ponderous steps up to her sister-in-law.
poor Amélie’s happiness, she loves him so passionately, and so
porter. He had no lambskin cap on his head, nor had he a loaded whip
position. He kept closing his eyes and then again looking at the fire,
position, it was now necessary to attack in order to cut a way through
positions and withdrawn in his presence. Together with Túshin, stepping
position with his eyes shut. Pierre looked at him and had not time
possessed of a Helen. “But no doubt it always is and must be so!”
possessed. Pierre was one of those who are only strong when they feel
possibility of active brotherly love among men, which Joseph Alexéevich
possibility of anyone seeing her without being enchanted. The aunt
possible. And I,” continued Pierre, “shot Dólokhov because I
postmaster’s book. Bazdéev had been one of the best-known Freemasons
post of commander in chief as a reward for his victory, does not give up
“Postulant,” to the accompaniment of various knockings with
pouch was slung. He had an officer’s sword in his hand. The soldier
poured drops from a medicine bottle into a wineglass half full of water.
pour le Roi de Prusse!”
Powdered footmen, in livery with buckled shoes and smart stockings,
powder smoke and stopped in despair. Everything seemed lost. But at that
power.”
practical woman that she was, had even managed by favor with army
pranced up and down in one place like a goat and shrieked piercingly.
Pratzen Heights.
Pratzen, interrupted by such frequent reports of cannon that sometimes
Pratzen, which was full of troops of all kinds.
Prayer. So, Count, there never is any negligence in my company, and
precedes a battle and had spent that happy day in inactivity, was all
premeditation Prince Vasíli took the first opportunity to gain his
preoccupied manner. He beckoned to one of his white adjutants and asked
preoccupied that only in bed was he able to be by himself. He had to
preoccupied, yet meekly Christian look which never left her face, Anna
preparations for war lay in the fact that Nicholas would not hear of
preparation swept over all the troops.
prepared by long and diligent self-purification, not everyone can hope
prepare her sister-in-law, and every time began to cry. Unobservant as
preparing tea. He brought in a boiling samovar. When everything was
presence and particularly distinguished himself.”
present bivouac another fortnight there will not be a healthy man left
present Emperor—more than once in Paris, and tells me he never met a
president of the council of war. Weyrother evidently felt himself to be
pressed him still harder with proofs of the impossibility and above all
pressing the hands of Prince Andrew and Borís. “You know I should
presumptuous lieutenant who had prevented his finishing what he had to
pretending to sleep, the sounds his nose emitted during the reading that
pretext that her aunt wished to hear him.
pretty face.
pretty young Princesses Gorchakóv met suitors there and were married
Preussisch-Eylau.
pricking its ears at the noise and looking at the lights. The shouting
pricking its ears at the sound of shots just as it had done on the
pride enough to see it? If she has no pride for herself she might at
prince.
Prince Andrew always became specially keen when he had to guide a young
Prince Andrew began to reply and to state his own plan, which might
Prince Andrew considered possible contingencies and formed new projects
Prince Andrew did not see how and by whom it was replaced, but the
Prince Andrew expressed his ideas so clearly and distinctly that it was
Prince Andrew galloped off to execute the order.
Prince Andrew gave him a look, but said nothing and went away. He felt
Prince Andrew got up and went on tiptoe up to the little bed, wineglass
Prince Andrew grew more and more animated. His eyes glittered feverishly
Prince Andrew. “I build a house and lay out a garden, and you build
Prince Andrew looked at his sister. In the dim shadow of the curtain her
Prince Andrew made use of Boguchárovo, began building and spent most of
Prince Andrew, recalling his father’s letter. “Yes, we have gained
Prince Andrew remained at Bald Hills as usual during his father’s
Prince Andrew remembered nothing more: he lost consciousness from the
Prince Andrew said nothing to Túshin. They were both so busy as to seem
Prince Andrew shouted, “Brothers! All’s lost!” And at this as if
Prince Andrew sighed and broke the seal of another envelope. It was
Prince Andrew spoke so earnestly that Pierre could not help thinking
Prince Andrew understood that this was said of him and that it was
Prince Andrew was as glad to find the boy like that, as if he had
Prince Andrew was on duty that day and in constant attendance on the
Prince Andrew went again to his wife and sat waiting in the room next
Prince Andrew went out.
Prince Andrew went up to the child and felt him. He was burning hot.
Prince Andrew, who had also been brought forward before the Emperor’s
Prince Bagratión and Túshin looked with equal intentness at
Prince Bagratión, distinguished by his Schön Grabern affair and by
Prince Bagratión looked at Túshin, evidently reluctant to show
Prince Bagratión proposed to Dolgorúkov to send to inquire of the
Prince Bagratión to begin the council. At last Bagratión’s orderly
Prince Bolkónski sat down in his usual place in the corner of the sofa
Prince Bolkónski’s household felt that their life had not been real
Prince Bolkónski surveyed Anatole.
Prince Dolgorúkov ceased to listen to him and gazed absent-mindedly not
Prince Dolgorúkov to the advanced post of the French army.
“Prince Hippolyte Kurágin—charming young fellow; M.
“Prince, I did not ask you here. Go, please go!” And he jumped up
prince interrupted her.
Prince Kurágin about me. I only wanted to ask because I fear the Guards
prince never directly asked himself that question, knowing beforehand
Prince Nicholas frowned, but said nothing.
prince, one window frame was removed in each room as soon as the larks
Prince Repnín!” and he spurred his horse and galloped away.
Prince Repnín named Lieutenant Sukhtélen.
prince’s question as to how she felt.
princess anxious and inquiring, the nurse encouraging. Everyone in the
princess’ beautiful eyes with all their former calm radiance were
“Princess, come here!” he shouted.
princess felt this; they still thought that if a blue ribbon were placed
princess’ hair. It was evident that he could be silent in this way for
princess’ hand.
princess, his cousin, at Moscow, concerning Dólokhov’s intimacy with
Princess, I hold to the principle that a maiden has a full right to
princess. (In accordance with Lise’s and Prince Andrew’s wishes they
Princess Kurágina, a portly imposing woman who had once been handsome,
Princess Mary.
Princess Mary admitted to one another that the angel’s face reminded
Princess Mary but were looking within... into herself... at something
Princess Mary could not lift her head, she was weeping.
Princess Mary, evidently intimidated and confused that her opinion
Princess Mary grew quite unconscious of her face and coiffure. The
Princess Mary had greatly changed since 1805.
Princess Mary had long since put aside her book: she sat silent, her
Princess Mary knelt down before her and hid her face in the folds of her
Princess Mary, little as he seemed to value her, was unthinkable to
Princess Mary looked at them in silence. She could not understand it. At
Princess Mary sat alone in her room listening to the sounds in the
Princess Mary shrugged her shoulders but took the glass submissively
Princess Mary shuddered; her nurse, putting down the stocking she was
Princess Mary sighed, and having crossed herself went down, thinking
Princess Mary’s self-esteem would be wounded and his point (not to
Princess Mary, then sat thinking for a while with that expression of
Princess Mary threw a shawl over her head and ran to meet the newcomer.
Princess Mary was left alone. She did not comply with Lise’s request,
Princess Mary was sitting on the sofa in her room, holding the weeping
Princess Mary was still standing by the cot, gently rocking the baby.
Princess Mary went to the door of the study with special trepidation.
Princess Mary with a gay smile, as if inviting her to join in a laugh at
“Princess, my dear, there’s someone driving up the avenue!” she
princess on hearing the news.
princess was not unwell, but had such an overpowering fear of the prince
princess, with the long waist and hair plastered down like a doll’s,
prince, stepping on his heels, paced up and down his study and sent
prince told me to ask,’ and come and tell me her answer.”
Prince Vasíli.
Prince Vasíli and Anatole had separate rooms assigned to them.
Prince Vasíli and that son of his to me? Prince Vasíli is a shallow
Prince Vasíli and the generals, had the benefit of the diplomat.
Prince Vasíli arrived that evening. He was met in the avenue by
Prince Vasíli, as he entered. “I know all about it, and I can tell
Prince Vasíli a third time. “How absent-minded you are, my dear
Prince Vasíli did everything to get Pierre to marry his daughter. Had
Prince Vasíli frowned, twisting his mouth, his cheeks quivered and his
Prince Vasíli gave Pierre a significant look.
Prince Vasíli had come to the conclusion that it was necessary to throw
Prince Vasíli had to settle matters with Pierre, who, it is true, had
Prince Vasíli passed by, seeming not to hear the ladies, and sat down
Prince Vasíli readily adopted her tone and the little princess also
Prince Vasíli rose.
Prince Vasíli’s arm and led him to his study. As soon as they were
Prince Vasíli saw that Pierre knew this. He suddenly muttered
Prince Vasíli’s last words. Then rising, he suddenly went up to his
Prince Vasíli smiled, and Pierre noticed that everyone was smiling at
Prince Vasíli was not a man who deliberately thought out his plans.
Prince Vasíli, who pretended to want to know this in order to settle a
Prince Vasíli, with one leg thrown high over the other and a snuffbox
prince was at home, and showed him into a clean little anteroom.
“Prince, what I have said is all there is in my heart. I thank you for
principal guests. He was just going to take it when Dólokhov, leaning
principals nor their seconds suffered for it. But the story of the duel,
prisoners.”
prizes his freedom which he needs for so many other things. When he
probably he did not, for in general he thought very little—but his
proceeded to his study.
produce at the same intervals and hold for the same time, but which
produced on Sónya, felt for the first time the sorrowful side of the
profited by their toil to lead a profligate life. That is what you have
promener,” * she used to say. Often seeing the success she had with
promotion, Nicholas said that he kissed his father’s and mother’s
promotion to the rank of major, and Rostóv, who had already drunk
pronounced the Mason in a stern and tremulous voice.
proofs of Nikólenka’s virtues. How strange, how extraordinary, how
properly. Hélène answered with a smile that she too had missed it.
proper posts. Borís had been quartered, and had marched all the
propose is the only thing possible.”
proposition to you in his pupil’s—I mean, his son’s—name. Do you
prostrated himself before the Gates of the Temple. And really, the
protégé, but Prince Dolgorúkov politely and firmly pressing his hand
proudly at his son.
Prussia, and had just returned from there as a special messenger. He had
Prussian army, Hélène had suddenly found it necessary to see him.
Prussians without giving them time to finish the parade they had begun,
Przebyszéwski and his corps had laid down their arms. Other columns
Przebyszéwski’s and Langeron’s columns which had already gone down
Przebyszéwski, with respectful but dignified politeness, held his
public to appreciate his skill.
pulling it or being pushed by it he did not know, but rushed along at
Pultúsk to Petersburg returns bringing our appointment as commander in
punishments were to be admonitory and not corporal, and hospitals,
purified, thou wilt gain wisdom. Look at your life, my dear sir.
purity, and not the serfs’ backs and foreheads, which, beat and shave
purple-faced general wait respectfully while Captain Prince Andrew, for
purple face, reporting something.
purposely dropped a handkerchief in front of him and stood looking
purse that sank into the sofa. “As for us, Count, we get along on our
pushing back his chair, he rose from the table.
put questions and gave brief replies about things they knew ought to
putting the nightshirt over his dried-up old body and gray-haired chest.
qualifications for it—the kind of good-natured, fussy shallowness
qualities. He was always hearing such words as: “With your remarkable
quarreled with Hélène, mon cher? You are under a delusion,” said
quarreled with her brother about him. She insisted that he was a bad
quarters torches and candles were burning and no one slept. The old
question for her to refuse him. And therefore Nicholas’ first feeling
question for whose sake he came (though no one spoke of it) was soon
question he noticed that it should not have been put.
question him. The man announced that the Tsar had been driven in a
questioning him about political affairs and news. He seemed to listen
question—one so important that he took no notice of what went
questions put to him. He was bespattered with mud and had a pitiful,
quick-witted, nor ready or eloquent in conversation, but he had the
quiet and peace. Thank God!...”
quiet authority, “you wish to insult me, and I am ready to agree with
“Quite avare, your excellency,” suddenly shouted the colonel,
quite close at hand, and a voice of naïve terror barely two steps from
quite heard.
quite sincerely tried to make her look pretty. She was so plain that
quits... it can’t be!... And why is he doing this to me?” Rostóv
raised. He remained stubbornly silent, gazing at Weyrother’s face,
raising him.
ran ahead on tiptoe and knocked at a door.
ran forward shading his eyes with his small hand to look at the French.
rank (for he did nothing), that Prince Vasíli had procured for him,
ranks; Anatole was in the army somewhere in the provinces; Prince Andrew
ranks were returning from the attack. Rostóv got out of their way,
ran up, begging a little fire for the infantry.
rapidly.
rapidly adding up the total of Rostóv’s debt, breaking the chalk as
rapidly and indistinctly. “You thought!... Rascals! Blackguards!...
rapid, self-confident, familiar tone. “Here is my second son; please
rarely done of late. It was a grand farewell dinner, as he and Denísov
Rasgulyáy—the coachman Ipátka knows—and look up the gypsy
rather of death, as the saying is. ‘Albanians!’ and ‘devils!’
rather round shoulders and glanced at Novosíltsev who was near him, as
rather than of what the generals were disputing about.
reached the bushes. Behind these were some Russian sharpshooters.
reached. Wheels creak on their axles as the cogs engage one another and
read a congratulation on his future son-in-law and on his daughter’s
readily and rapidly like a man who has not talked for a long time. His
readiness to fall in love and an expectation of happiness.
reading confirmation in Anna Mikháylovna’s face.
reading the letter. He went on tiptoe to the nursery door and opened it.
reading them aloud. Bagratión bowed his head and listened:
reading. Then Milorádovich looked round significantly at the other
read this in Tíkhon’s face and in that of Prince Vasíli’s valet,
ready, the stranger opened his eyes, moved to the table, filled a
reality again presented itself. He got up without saying a word and went
realize because the fear was so much the stronger feeling. The prince
realized as he read that book: the joy, hitherto unknown to him,
realized that something dreadful had happened to his regiment, and the
really good society” consisted of the fascinating Hélène, forsaken
“Really, Papa, I believe Prince Bagratión worried himself less before
rearguard all the freshness of atmosphere of the French army, which was
reasoning contained in the Mason’s words, or believed as a child
reason, or shot a post-boy’s horse with a pistol. That expression
reason, ran back and disappeared from the outskirts, and Russian
reawakening. He was afraid of any want of clearness, any weakness, in
rebuking her for her fall.
recalcitrant cavalry colonel, his own dignity as a general, and above
recalled all this as childishness he had left immeasurably behind.
recalled thousands of such hints from Prince Vasíli and others, and was
receipt, he left at the end of November, without taking leave of any of
received all Petersburg, proud of her unapproachability and beauty. So
received and read the then famous rescript of the Emperor Alexander
received Pierre with a shade of melancholy, evidently relating to the
receive that science it is necessary to purify and renew one’s inner
receiving from all sides declarations of the people’s loyalty, that
receiving it. This gratitude reminded him of how much more he might do
reception room if he wished to see him. Borís thanked him and went to
reciprocated this antipathy, but it was overpowered by his contempt
reckoning.”
recognized his lamented and adored monarch.
recognized the Tsar and watched his approach. When he was within twenty
recollection of how he was put in the sleigh or of the first three
recollections.” Prince Vasíli sighed. “Yes, yes, my boy. And my
recounting his military exploits (Prince Andrew could not endure
recover.”
recovered, and Rostóv became very friendly with him during his
recross to the other. At last our enemy, Buxhöwden, catches us and
recruitment so as to avoid active service. The old prince and his son
recruits were being enrolled in the villages, and from the seat of
reduced to tears.
referred to in that drawing room as “a man of great merit” (un homme
“refill my pipe for that one!” and then, scattering sparks from it,
reflected on theirs.
reflections. Better die a thousand times than risk receiving an unkind
refusal with his head and hand and by that gesture Rostóv instantly
refuse Iogel and asked Sónya to dance. Denísov sat down by the old
refusing to let her see them off. The diplomatist preserved a mournful
regarded all these little adjutants on the staff of whom the newcomer
regard him—but you want to cure him from love of him. And he does not
regarding all arguments as nonsense in comparison with that smile.
regenerate, purify, and elevate me. But you don’t understand it.”
regeneration, and return to life.
regimental commander and Major Ekonómov had stopped beside a bridge,
regiments, both cavalry and infantry, were by no means ready for the
regiments form bands and scour the countryside and put everything
regiment. The faces of these young people, especially those who were
regiment, they listen intently, look about, and eagerly ask concerning
regiment was much surprised at the commander in chief’s order to throw
regrettable delusion.”
regular motion as a result of all that activity.
reins and started of his own accord.
relating to Nikólenka, did not venture to ask any questions at dinner,
religion?”
relying on reason only? What art thou? You are young, you are rich, you
remained alone with him for a long time.
remained in reserve and Nicholas Rostóv spent that day in a dull and
remaining in Moscow, and only awaited the termination of Denísov’s
remaining strength. He raised his pistol and aimed.
remains of sheds, chairs, tables, wheels, tubs, and everything that they
remarks. The old count rose once more, glanced at a note lying beside
remarks which seemed to him clever while they formed in his mind became
remark to him, pointing to the gallant Ápsherons.
remember everything?” said Natásha, with an expressive gesture,
“Remember, for you everything depends on this.”
remember Nikólenka too, I remember him well,” she said. “But I
remorse, humiliations, sufferings, outbursts of pride, fear, and
rendered, and I supplied them with a doctor, a hospital, and an asylum
renounced your former convictions—do you believe in God?”
repeated by others from various sides and all became silent.
repeated. “I should be glad enough to fall asleep, so it’s not my
repeat his question.
repeating in a low voice the same words several times over.
repellent. Yet in this very repugnance to all his circumstances Pierre
replace some chessmen that were falling. He was about to embrace his
replied that it would be more than enough for him and that he gave his
replied: “Yes, yes, I agree,” and with a beaming, childlike smile,
reply.
reply—which he would not have received, for the princess was unable to
reported to him, and then joined the adjutants listening to what the
report was heard, Bagratión looked round and shouted, “Hurrah!”
reprehensible, looked round with a blush. It seemed to him that everyone
represented all that was left of that whole regiment. Impelled by the
represented as a brilliant victory over the French, and so the
reprimanding and reproaching him. Túshin gave no orders, and,
reproached and disputed with each other.
reproached her for yielding to a man without being married. Mademoiselle
reproachfully at the count who had presented it to him. Someone
request.
request that he would take no part in the matter, Rostóv agreed to be
resembling his master in manners and looks, who was accompanying him
reserve gun carriage, the wounded were carried away, and the four guns
reserve tomorrow,” he thought. “I’ll ask leave to go to the front,
reserve units were able to join up, and the fight was at an end. The
resolutely took the salver with both hands and looked sternly and
resolute self-will, “he is wicked and heartless. There now, I like
resolution. Can it be that I have none?”
resolved to go away next day and leave a letter informing her of his
resounded. The column moved forward without knowing where and unable,
resounding voice, apparently to preclude the possibility of not being
respect and honor you, but all the same remember that the future belongs
respectfully.
respectfully bowed head, seemed also to be waiting. The silence lasted
restraining his tears of pity for the Emperor, he rode on in utter
rest, went in to dinner. He was seated in the place of honor between
result from it—no longer seemed to be in the future but in the past.
“Retire! All to retire!” he shouted from a distance.
retreat after a battle have lost it is what we say; and according to
retreated as a disorderly crowd. One soldier, in his fear, uttered the
retreating against their will. A few minutes after the Emperor had
retreating forces.
retreating to our frontier—which do today.’
returned), and, forcing open a loosely closed latch, set the damask
returned, and over the bottle of wine conversation between the three
returned from a long journey on which he had spent dozens of years, had
returned from the council, tired and exhausted but eager and proud
returned home just before dinner. As soon as he entered he noticed and
Returning from his journey through South Russia in the happiest state
return the holy image.
Rhetor, after a moment’s pause.
Rhetor said, “to bring yourself to regard it not as a dreaded foe, but
Rhetor’s instructions. The Mason drew the shirt back from Pierre’s
Rhetor, though it aroused his curiosity, did not seem to him essential,
Rhetor went away, leaving him to solitary meditation. “It must be so,
ribbons.
richest of the officers now that he had received his money, bought it.
rich old man. But before leaving home and undertaking these new affairs,
rich youths, officers and cadets, who had galloped past him on their
ride and especially by the sound of the bullets.
rider’s leg. Blood was flowing from his head; he struggled but could
rid himself of them he closed his eyes.
riding alone with three hussars into that mysterious and dangerous misty
riding, and sometimes, when he came within six paces of them, the
riding away, say to Czartorýski: “What a terrible thing war is: what
riding over it trained a gun on him and fired several shots. The
right.
right!” And his head once more sank to his horse’s neck. All at once
right and what’s good must be judged by one who knows all, but not by
right flank and drive it into the Bohemian mountains according to plan,
right—he did not know. “But was it really not possible for Kutúzov
right, it is advantageous to attack the enemy’s latter wing especially
right, shouting and firing were again heard. Flashes of shot gleamed in
right sounded oftener and nearer. As soon as Túshin with his guns,
right to fire when they liked as they approached the barrier. Dólokhov
right! Twenty-one rubles,” he said, pointing to the figure twenty-one
ring, and Zherkóv, uneasily glancing at them all, and Prince Andrew,
rising in his soul. Dólokhov, Denísov, and Rostóv were now sitting
river we burn the bridges to separate ourselves from our enemy, who at
road which gleamed white in the mist would have been safer because it
rode, not hoping to find anyone but merely to ease his conscience. When
rode side by side in front, at full gallop. One in a black uniform with
rode with our regiment all the time, so that we had every comfort and
room.
room, addressed Pierre.
room, almost all the company had assembled, and the conversation, guided
room, and looked round with a smile. She was, as always at evening
room and we shall have to go down, and you have not smartened yourself
room by which Dolgorúkov had entered—a short man in civilian clothes
room, exclaiming and oh-ing and ah-ing.
room.... Nicholas had been prepared for resistance, but had not at all
room, something flew out from a side door like a tornado and began
room. The old countess, waiting for the return of her husband and son,
room. The old man already knew everything. He was standing close to
room, they still heard the laughter and merry voices trying to persuade
room with rapid steps. Now he seemed to see her in the early days of
rose in alarm on seeing it.
“Rostóv!”
Rostóv.
Rostóv.
Rostóv.
Rostóv and Denísov drove away with the wounded Dólokhov.
Rostóv, and Dólokhov—who was now again an officer in the Semënov
Rostóv and had not responded to his greeting. When the Emperor’s
Rostóv and most of the officers after the review.
Rostóv anticipated his horse’s movements and became more and more
Rostóv as he continued to deal.
Rostóv became thoughtful.
Rostóv considered, and then went in the direction where they said he
Rostóv could already see their faces and heard the command:
Rostóv did not know or remember how he ran to his place and mounted.
Rostóv did not listen to the soldier. He looked at the snowflakes
Rostóv fancied he had seen before) rode up to the ditch, struck his
(Rostóv felt himself quite tiny and weak compared to these gigantic men
Rostóv felt ill at ease. He tried, but failed, to find some joke with
Rostóv felt that, under the influence of the warm rays of love, that
Rostóv, flushing, drew Dólokhov into the next room.
Rostóv followed them. In front of him walked Kutúzov’s groom leading
Rostóv for his friendship to her Fédya, often talked to him about her
Rostóv from a distance saw with envy and remorse how von Toll spoke
Rostóv had been ordered to look for Kutúzov and the Emperor near the
Rostóv had just prepared a card, by bending the corner of which he
Rostóv himself, his legs well back and his stomach drawn in and feeling
Rostóv hurriedly put something on his feet, drew on his dressing gown,
Rostóv laughed so loud and merrily that Denísov, in his bedroom, felt
Rostóv learned later that Russian and Austrian soldiers had been firing
Rostóv let go of the horse and was about to ride on, when a wounded
Rostóv looked at and listened listlessly to what passed before and
Rostóv met Sónya in the drawing room, he reddened. He did not know
Rostóv noticed something new in Dólokhov’s relations with Sónya,
Rostóv recalled at that moment a strange conversation he had once had
Rostóv rode on at a footpace not knowing why or to whom he was now
Rostóv, rubbing his eyes that seemed glued together, raised his
Rostóv saw overhead the old familiar cornice with a bit of plaster
Rostóv saw tears filling the Emperor’s eyes and heard him, as he was
Rostóv saw that it had been well considered by them. Sónya had already
Rostóv’s face. A gentle, mild light poured from them. Then all at
Rostóv’s feeling, there was a deathly stillness amid which was heard
Rostóv’s horse was also getting restive: it pawed the frozen ground,
Rostóv smiled.
Rostóv smilingly reassured the dragoon and gave him money.
Rostóv spurred his horse, called to Sergeant Fédchenko and two other
Rostóv’s share in Dólokhov’s duel with Bezúkhov was hushed up by
Rostóv’s soul (it seemed to Rostóv that he understood everything),
Rostóv staked five rubles on a card and lost, staked again, and again
Rostóv, standing in the front lines of Kutúzov’s army which the Tsar
Rostóv, still looking round toward the fires and the shouts, rode with
Rostóv stopped.
Rostóv stopped his horse for a moment on a hillock to see what was
Rostóv submitted. He let the eight hundred remain and laid down a seven
Rostóv too, bending over his saddle, shouted “Hurrah!” with all his
Rostóv took the letter and, throwing the money on the sofa, put both
Rostóv turned his horse and galloped back. Four more reports followed
Rostóv was not far from the trumpeters, and with his keen sight had
Rostóv was very happy in the love they showed him; but the first
Rostóv went on ahead to do what was asked, and to his great surprise
Rostóv, when their leave permits had been passed at the town gate and
Rostóv, who had completely forgotten Denísov, not wishing anyone to
Rostóv, who had just celebrated his promotion to a cornetcy and bought
Rostóv with Dólokhov and Denísov stayed on at the club till late,
rosy, with a dark little mustache, evidently rested and made sleeker by
round and galloped back to the place where he had seen the Emperor, but
round her head.
round his son’s neck, and without a word he began to sob like a child.
round once more. The French had fallen behind, and just as he looked
round. Prince Andrew and the battalion were already within twenty paces
round shoulders shuddered as if a cold shiver had run down them, how his
round Sónya and Natásha as the air does before a thunderstorm. Sónya
round the company. He noticed the change in the little princess’
round the first man changed his run to a walk and, turning, shouted
round the table, the clatter of plates, knives, and glasses mingled with
round with much animation and cheerfully nodded to his son as the latter
roused by activity, expected the best results from the new campaign,
roused, had begun to talk, and wanted to express what had brought him to
rubbed his forehead as if to rid himself of all interest in what he
rubles at a time, to talk about not wishing to cringe to anybody and not
rubles I don’t know what to do with, and she stands in her tattered
rug and began reading to him from a manuscript book an explanation of
ruin. Wasn’t he my friend? Wasn’t I fond of him? But it’s not his
rumored, the allowance of forage money to captains of companies would be
running.
running beside Timókhin, killed a Frenchman at close quarters and was
running? Can they be coming at me? And why? To kill me? Me whom everyone
Russian.
Russian and the Austrian. The Guards, just arrived from Russia, spent
Russian arms.
Russian army. And I won’t—not even if Bonaparte were here at
Russian army! Well, as I was saying,” he continued, recovering his
Russian general. The general shouted a demand that the cavalry should be
   Russians! O’er all barriers on!
Russian troops moving down the valley to their left.
Russian valor—what more could be wished for?”
Russia’s glory were led to destruction. Go, Princess Mary. Go and tell
saber had tasted flesh and he had fallen exhausted, and so on. And so he
saber, he sank on the snow beside it. His left hand was bloody; he wiped
saber them... Whom? The hussars... Ah, the hussars with mustaches. Along
sabretache...”—“Keep to the right, your honor, there are bushes
sad and depressed. It was all so strange, so unlike what he had hoped.
saddle and touched up his horse to ride once more round his hussars. It
saddle sore which, coming after all my previous journeys, quite prevents
said.
said a gunner, coming up to Túshin.
said another.
said he, bending down a finger.
said he, “but the health of our Sovereign, that good, enchanting, and
said he, carrying away into the darkness a glowing stick.
said her eyes. She was not surprised at his having come; she did
said, holding the casement and not closing it. “With lanterns. Most
said, “how am I to stifle in my heart these temptations of the devil?
said in a tone of indifferent politeness:
said inquiringly.
said little Iogel coming up to Nicholas. “Look how many charming young
said nothing to Borís and, evidently unable to suppress the thoughts
said, of a wife who was a celebrated beauty and of millions of money.
said one of the nursemaids to Prince Andrew who was sitting on a
said Prince Andrew when they had gone into the large room where the
said Repnín.
said she.
said the countess, indignant that they should have dared to treat this
said the countess smiling.
said the old man, “say so, my dear sir.” And he suddenly smiled, in
said the princess in a tone of entreaty.
said this some time after she had finished singing. While that untrained
said to be fleeing in great disorder. Mind you gallop off to Kórchevo
said, without noticing Nicholas.
said without sitting down. “A person of very high standing in our
saint, my angel,” she said with a sigh.
saluting, and this sound rapidly came nearer along the whole extended
salver, glanced around in dismay, as though seeking help. But all eyes
same as usual,” and Princess Mary pale, frightened, and with downcast
same commanders. The sailor rarely cares to know the latitude in which
same.... Is everything ready?” he added. “Only tell me where to go
same moment his kindly eyes grew moist with tears of joy and enthusiasm.
same question. “Will Papa be back soon?”
same sergeant major Iván Mítrich, the same company dog Jack, and the
same speed, but they kept increasing their pace, so that some of the
same time at the Emperor Francis.
same to me!” he screamed in the same piercing tone as when parting
same way. When did it happen and what has happened? I am well and strong
satchels, sabretaches, open portmanteaus, and dirty boots. Two freshly
sat down again, smiling at the noise they had made and exchanging
sat down languidly on the sofa: he felt it unpleasant to have dropped
sat facing Bagratión and, as the very personification of Moscow
sat in an armchair in her dressing jacket and nightcap and Katie, sleepy
satisfied with the party. She replied in her usual simple manner that
sat playing patience with the old gentlewoman who lived in their house.
saved. But he saw nothing. Above him there was now nothing but the
save myself?” he thought. He rode on to the region where the greatest
saw a rather short man. Having evidently come from the light into the
saw the beloved features that were so deeply engraved on his memory. The
saw them all and saw them in detail. She saw Prince Vasíli’s face,
saw with his own eyes brick buildings erected or in course of erection,
say (as he has done before) that I’m in the dumps.”
say I’ll have his head off if everything is not here in a week.
saying as he moved from the gun, when a strange, unfamiliar voice called
saying. “I have been an atheist,” answered Pierre.
saying it right, I have drunk a good deal—but that is how I feel, and
saying.” Prince Andrew looked silently at Pierre with an ironic smile.
saying that he must prostrate himself at the Gates of the Temple.
saying that, on the contrary, she remembered him quite well. Then
say it.”
say that it is dull in my house again,” and she glanced at Hélène.
say to the adjutant that Borís felt uncomfortable. He turned away and
say—“Yes, misfortune! Call it what you please, I know that what
Schérer. At the other end sat the younger and less important guests,
Schlappanitz and Bellowitz which cover the enemy’s front. For this
Schlappanitz and the Thuerassa forest, avoiding the defiles of
Schön Grabern affair, just as those who have taken part in a battle
Schön Grabern—and he would have found that easier. The committeemen
schools,” he went on, crooking a finger, “education and so forth;
Schoss, and his old nurse, and asked them to kiss for him “dear
science explaining the whole creation and man’s place in it. To
“Scoundrels! Blackguards!” shrieked the old man, turning his face
screwed up his eyes as if dazzled by the sun. He was entirely absorbed
scrutinizing Anatole closely and intently.
seated them on the center sofa. The bigwigs, the most respected members
seats in the dining room, according to their rank and importance: the
seconds he stood not moving from the spot or realizing the situation.
second time. But Pierre was so absorbed that he did not understand what
secretary rather than commander in the army. My removal from the army
secretly regretting this, saw only the dark side.
secret malevolence in their hearts.
seduced, and to whom her poor mother (sa pauvre mère) appeared, and
“See, I’m standing! See!” she said, but could not maintain herself
seeing Prince Andrew stopped, hesitating on the threshold. He went into
seeing some men running toward him. “They will help me!” In front
Seeing that smile, Rostóv involuntarily smiled himself and felt a still
seeing the favor the Emperor showed the prisoners, they now hastened to
seeing the fright of that small and frail but proud man when covered by
Seeing them he kept thinking, “That may be the very standard with
seek nothing, be not anxious or envious. Man’s future and thy own fate
seemed as though not the trumpeters were playing, but as if the army
seemed familiar to Princess Mary was saying something.
seemed impossible. “But perhaps they may do it!” For more than ten
seemed like a lifeless body, but as soon as he came up it became alive,
seemed to ask. She noticed at once that something had happened to him.
seemed to give way within him at this news. Dólokhov was a suitable and
seemed to have changed roles since the campaign of 1805. The old man,
seemed to her that someone was there standing behind the screen in the
seemed to him all the interests that engrossed Napoleon, so mean did his
seemed to him as though one of the soldiers near him hit him on the head
seemed to him like ants. In that world, the handsome drunkard Number One
seemed to him that he had expected all this and even more. Trying
seemed to him that it was a very long time ago, almost a day, since he
seemed to him that it was getting lighter. To the left he saw a sloping
seemed to say. She saw her husband, but did not realize the significance
seemed to say: “Yes, there’s nothing left for you and me but to sip
seemed to say. “You had not noticed that I am a woman? Yes, I am a
seem to him that everyone is afraid of him, and that must please him.
seen him in Petersburg. I saw him just as I see you.... There he sat in
seen the day before in the arms of her nurse’s daughter—at her
seen the light, come here? What do you seek from us? Wisdom, virtue,
seen through.
seen you. Very glad! Go back to your rooms, Princess. Go!” said
see the true light, and that he, Pierre, ought to aid, enlighten, and
see those who, judging by the sound of hoofs and voices, had ridden up
see whether he cannot attach you to himself or find a place for you
see whether they were getting up.
seized by an unreasoning panic—it occurred to him that the child was
seized by terror lest he had already, in some way, bound himself to do
seized him at the thought of that dreadful step. A thousand times during
seize some horsecloths, though he had told him the Russians were there.
seizing his father’s hand, he pressed it to his lips and burst into
seizing the most opportune moment for making use of people.
self, and so before one can know, it is necessary to believe and to
self-complacency than his did.) “Well, he stormed at me, as the saying
self-complacent happiness that one sees on the face of a boy happily
self-confident.
self-derision genuinely Russian. Bilíbin wrote that the obligation of
self-possession. If a man lacking in self-confidence remains dumb on
self-possession mingled at that moment in Rostóv’s soul.
self-respect, but admit that the time and place are very badly chosen.
“Sell us that horse!” Denísov called out to the Cossacks.
semi-private, long-established jokes and amusing reminiscences, though
send his orderly staff officer, and later Prince Andrew also, to order
sensation of those terrible whistling sounds and of the corpses around
senseless cry, “Cut off!” that is so terrible in battle, and that
sense of awe and veneration such as he had experienced in his boyhood at
sent an official to Austria to seek for traces of his son, he ordered a
sent Dólokhov the whole forty-three thousand rubles and received his
“Separate? Very well, but only if you give me a fortune,” said
separating the living from the dead—lay between them. All were
‘Sergéy’ he sobbed, ‘Kuz-mí-ch,’ tears, and ‘From all
“Sergéy Kuzmích—From all sides—” he said, unbuttoning the top
Sergéy Kuzmích...’ Poor Vyazmítinov could not get any farther!
serious duel, and besides, Drubetskóy, who says he is an old friend
serious expression. But the author himself took the verses and began
serious for an instant at the sight of her, but immediately smiling
servant.
served up was received with pleasure by all her visitors. The greatest
service.”
service, and he at once understood his role, letting his hostess make
service is to serve under him.”
service,” said the prince disdainfully. “Why his son is coming I
service to place himself very advantageously. He was aide-de-camp to a
serving as a private. But the command of the extreme left flank had been
set fire to the Schön Grabern village, delayed the French advance. The
setting fire to Schön Grabern.
settled. He came because of Sónya. And Sónya, though she would never
seven he needed was lying uppermost, the first card in the pack. He had
seventeen of the forty men of the guns’ crews had been disabled, but
seven virtues, corresponding to the seven steps of Solomon’s temple,
several dead men. One ball after another passed over as he approached
several of them were not separated from one another but merged into a
Several of those present smiled at Zherkóv’s words, expecting one of
several persons whom he did not know, giving him a whispered description
Several soldiers fell.
several soldiers fell, and a second lieutenant who was holding the
several thousand rubles.
several thousand rubles quitrent received from Pierre’s peasants,
Several times in the course of the morning Princess Mary began trying to
Several wounded men passed along the road, and words of abuse, screams,
severe gaze straight on Pierre’s face.
severity changed, and he drew Pierre’s hand downwards, made him sit
shall not agree with you, and you do not really believe what you are
shall think nothing of an extra seventy miles to come and see you at
“Shall we have three cold dishes then?” asked the cook.
“Shall you write to him?” she asked.
shame and anger choking him, had already leapt from his horse and run to
shameless, and he ignores her!”
sharpshooters in front of our columns. The colonel at the head of the
sharpshooters showed themselves in the copse. It was Timókhin’s
She already had power over him, and between them there was no longer any
She always addressed him with a radiantly confiding smile meant for him
She approached him, saw his face, and something gave way within her. Her
she began to tell of how at Potsdam the impious Bonaparte had stolen the
she considered the resonance was best.
she continued, uniting them both in one glance. Pierre did not look at
She could not lie either on her face or on her side. Every position was
She drew nearer to him. Her face flushed.
she felt any symptoms of pregnancy. She laughed contemptuously and said
She forgot all fear of her father, went up to him, took his hand, and
(She glanced at Hélène and smiled at her.) “My dear Hélène, be
She had determined not to tell her and persuaded her father to hide the
she had sacrificed so much. She could not refrain from weeping at these
she had seldom experienced, came upon her. She feared to look round, it
“She is not very well,” answered Mademoiselle Bourienne with
She knew of the duel and had come to speak about it. She waited till the
she knew so well), on the lock of gray hair that escaped from under the
She looked at him inquiringly and with childlike reproach.
she must love him if she could so far forget herself! Perhaps I might
she not only left her hair as it was, but did not even look in her
she ought to behave like Mademoiselle Bourienne, but could not.
She paused, as women always do, expecting something after they have
She pulled up her muslin sleeve and showed him a red scar on her long,
She rang for her maid and asked her to sleep in her room.
She roused herself, and felt appalled at what she had been thinking, and
She rushed to Sónya, hugged her, and began to cry.
She seemed to promise to explain that necessity to him when he came on
she suddenly came into his mind as she was at the moments when he had
She thought: “If I seem not to notice he will think that I do not
She took the liberty of inquiring whether it was long since Anatole
she turned to his father. The conversation was general and animated,
she used to have quarrels with the too indulgent count, that son who
She was much altered. She was now plain rather than pretty. Her cheeks
she was, Natásha, who knew how sensitive her mother was to anything
She was no longer in the loose gown she generally wore in the morning,
she was not a fool to want to have children, and that she was not going
she was now saying she had talked of before, with tears.
she wished to and only refrained out of regard for his modesty.
she would say. What could all that matter in comparison with the will of
shining eyes, not interrupting or questioning him, but believing with
shone with such gaiety and youth, such innocent youth, that it suggested
shops, bakers’ signboards, street lamps, and sleighs!” thought
Shortly after nine o’clock that evening, Weyrother drove with his
shortsighted delight at the misery of others, and doubts and torments
shots came.
should already have suggested to your heart, if it is sincere, more than
should be a nice set of fellows if we were to wait about and so give him
should be glad and not cry.”
should be if I could now say: ‘Lord, have mercy on me!’... But to
shoulder and left the room without snuffing the candles or saying why he
shoulders close to his eyes.
should much like to be an adjutant and not remain at the front.”
should now be away in a foreign land amid strange surroundings, a manly
“Shouldn’t we now send for Berg?” asked Borís. “He would drink
should one love and what hate? What does one live for? And what am I?
shouted hoarsely.
shouted “Hurrah!” in exactly the same voice in which he had shouted
shouting.
shouting came from, a fire flared up and went out again, then another,
shouting grew louder and louder. Rostóv could hear the sound of French
shouts of hurrah, and saw wounded being brought back (there were not
shouts of thousands of voices. His horse and the horse of the hussar
showed how he presented himself, with his hand to his cap, and really
showing the necessity of first paying off the loans from the Land Bank,
showing under his open shirt, he stood in a majestic pose in the light
shown, fired. Not at all expecting so loud a report, Pierre shuddered
shown to the best room, which Dólokhov had taken for that evening. Some
“Shut up!”
side and at first did not play. Dólokhov kept glancing at him.
side and looked round with a frown. Along the road from Pratzen galloped
side as her betrothed, seeing, hearing, feeling her nearness, her
side by side. Prince Vasíli was not having any supper: he went round
sides. He acknowledged no acquaintances but saw in all these men only
side, so close to our own forces that Napoleon with the naked eye could
sides’ was smothered in sobs and he could get no farther. And again
sideways at Princess Mary from a little distance. “You have a maroon
“Sideways! Cover yourself with your pistol!” ejaculated Nesvítski.
sight of his superiors, he did not notice the staff of the banner and
sign.
significant command to come to her on Tuesday.
sign papers, to present himself at government offices, the purpose of
silence.
silence as he left the drawing room. He pictured the vanity of his
silently—fearing to speak because at every word he felt ready to
silent, “that Sónya and Nicholas now say you to one another and meet
silent, waiting for what he would say.
silver and crystal gleamed, so did the ladies’ toilets and the gold
simply dressed hair (two immense plaits twice round her lovely head like
simultaneously attacked and outflanked by superior French forces under
“Since Prince Bagratión is not coming, we may begin,” said
“Since the day of our brilliant success at Austerlitz,” wrote
since the nursing mothers were no longer sent to work on his land, they
since the time when he thought his son had been killed, he did not think
singer” (he meant Natásha’s Italian singing master), “that’s
sir!”
sire,” * he answered gaily, raising nevertheless ironic smiles among
sister, black eyes... Na... tasha... (Won’t she be surprised when
sister had hung round his neck with such emotion and reverence, “it
sister-in-law’s dress.
sister. “Why isn’t she dull and ashamed?”
sitting at tea with Bilíbin. “The fete is for tomorrow. How is your
sitting motionless before the glass, looking at her face, and saw in the
Sitting on the sofa with the little cushions on its arms, in what used
situated,” said Prince Andrew.
“Six hundred rubles, ace, a corner, a nine... winning it back’s
six miles away, or whether they were near by in that sea of mist, no one
Six weeks after Anna Pávlovna’s “At Home” and after the sleepless
Six weeks later he was married, and settled in Count Bezúkhov’s
skillfully changed the subject. He asked him to tell them how and where
skillfully made watch, dares to say that, as he does not understand
sky—the lofty sky, not clear yet still immeasurably lofty, with gray
sky with clouds that had risen and were floating still higher, and
sleepiness that kept coming over him. An enormous space, with our
sleeve with her finger, saying:
sleigh and pair at once, and go to Bezúkhov’s, and tell him ‘Count
slender, delicate arm, high above the elbow on that part that is covered
slippery ice that covered the millpool.
slope of the hill amid the smoke a Russian battery that was still firing
“Smack at ‘em, lads!” he kept saying, seizing the guns by the
small cloud rose from the hill and was borne in a streak to the left by
smashed, and the shouting grew louder. They drank to Bekleshëv,
smile.
smile.
smile.
smile, for which he was long unable to forgive himself, “I have lost a
smile of a doctor to whom an old wife wishes to explain the treatment of
smile of his which seemed to say, “Ah! This is what I like!”
smile on his lips and face, but his eyes were dull and lifeless and in
smile that usually brightened her face. Pierre knew that everyone was
smiling as if she did not recognize him.
smiling face, moved after Willarski with uncertain, timid steps.
smiling, glittered with effort and exasperation as he mustered his
smilingly raising a finger at him, she left the room.
smoke enveloped everything.
smoke, rendered denser by the mist, prevented him from seeing anything
Smolénsk threatening Bald Hills—even then I wouldn’t serve in the
Smolyanínov, and it mortified him to think that the newcomer was an
smooth—felt that no small matter was happening, but an important and
snow-covered road, did not once wake up on the way to Moscow, but lay
snuffbox while trying to hear what was being said at the other table.
so alien to us.
sobbing like a child. The door opened. The doctor with his shirt sleeves
sobs. The count was lighting his pipe and did not notice his son’s
so-called battle of the three Emperors—that is to say, a slow movement
society.
society. Beside him stood a lad of nineteen, also a wounded officer of
society had entered the simple feeling of the attraction of a healthy
society of women was rather derogatory to his manhood. He went to balls
society so dearly and distinctly indicated.
so completely silenced and their arguments confuted by such conclusive
so contrary to his method of conducting war? Believe me, he is afraid,
so do you too! To the health of Alexander the First! Hurrah!”
so easily extract a good profit for themselves from a dinner costing
So energetically do we pursue this aim that after crossing an unfordable
soft hand taking hers firmly, and she touched with her lips a white
soft snowbanks that bordered both sides of the path. The prince went
so he went from one group to another. Some of the most important old men
“So I can fire when I like!” said Pierre, and at the word
soirees as before—such as she alone had the gift of arranging—at
“So it is all finished!” he thought. “And how has it all happened?
“so it is useless to ask whether it is good or bad. It is good because
“So it seems you’re a hero, eh? Come now, what was this duel about?
Sokólniki after the duel and had spent that first agonizing, sleepless
Sokólniki forest and found Dólokhov, Denísov, and Rostóv already
Sokolnitz, November 30, 1805.”
soldier.
soldier at the front, gave the command “Attention!” and rode up
soldier, mimicking the general who had ridden away. “I’d shoot them,
soldiers’ bonfires and with his long gray mustache, his white chest
soldiers had kindled on the road. Rostóv, too, dragged himself to the
soldier shouted to him. “They’d kill you there!”
soldiers, loudly demanding bread, meat, biscuits, fodder, and whatnot!
soldiers, munching biscuit and beating a tattoo with their feet to
soldiers, officers, and generals were heroes. But the hero of heroes was
soldiers only need to be restrained and held back! On all sides, new and
soldiers ran from the fires, thrust their pipes into their boots, their
soldiers running in confused crowds across his path.
soldiers, straining their lungs, shouted “Hurrah!”
Soldiers! The Russian army is advancing against you to avenge the
soldiers who were seizing the artillery horses and turning the guns
soldier with the harsh voice, and it was that affair and this soldier
solemn affair. Every general and every soldier was conscious of his own
so long,” he added.
so long waited, presents itself to him at last. He firmly and clearly
so many years Moravians in shaggy caps and blue jackets had peacefully
some!”
some approaching achievement, and some in course of disintegration. He
some concessions. Continuing to represent the liberation of the serfs
some great change had come over him that day. He was silent all through
some not. This whole mass droned and jostled in confusion under the
Some of the nearest relatives had not yet left. They were sitting in
some of the topics at first lightly touched on: their past life, plans
Someone mentioned that Captain Túshin was bivouacking close to the
someone. (Prince Bagratión did not ask about the guns on the left
some question—“Most likely he is asking at what o’clock they
some reason she called it Urope as if that were a specially refined
some sort were moving about, in front and behind moved lines of troops;
Some swarthy men and women were really entering from the cold outside
something.”
something and went away. It seemed to Pierre that even the prince was
something, but dared not.... No, it was I who dared not. But that’s
something I cannot inflict on others,” said Prince Andrew, growing
something I have received from the chancellor. I asked him for you, and
something large, brilliant, and handsome moving toward her as she
something loudly to a comrade farther back. Rostóv paused. “No,
“Something special is always said in such cases,” he thought, but
something terrible and monstrous rising in his soul and turned quickly
something that was evidently wrong and that he ought not to do. But at
something to him in French in an undertone and then went up to a small
something toward it and you cannot persuade me that it was not a good
some time to get the wedding ring off his fat finger. When that had been
some way and knowing that this was impossible was ready to cry. The Tsar
somewhere nearer the sun.”
somewhere under her heart would ever cry, suck her breast, and begin to
some wooded hills were discernible, and it was there the enemy probably
“So much the better! I shall see it close,” he thought.
so my conscience was at ease. I came forward....” (Berg stood up and
son.
son.
son or kinsman.”
Sónya again interrupted. She gave him an imploring, frightened look.
Sónya and Dólokhov before dinner, and with the kindly sensitiveness
Sónya became thoughtful. The question of how to write to Nicholas, and
Sónya interrupted him.
Sónya, Natásha, Pétya, Anna Mikháylovna, Véra, and the old count
Sónya’s joint ages. Rostóv, leaning his head on both hands, sat at
Sónya smiled.
Sónya smiled.
Sónya’s refusal and felt uncomfortable at the thought of how they
Sónya’s thin little shoulders, Natásha’s eyes and laughter,
Sónya struck the first chord of the prelude.
Sónya too, all rosy red, clung to his arm and, radiant with bliss,
Sónya was more tender and devoted to him than ever. It was as if she
Sónya was sitting at the clavichord, playing the prelude to
Sónya, whom he loved and thought of just the same as ever.” When she
Soon after his admission to the Masonic Brotherhood, Pierre went to the
Soon after Prince Andrew’s return the old prince made over to him a
Soon after Prince Bagratión had left him, Túshin had succeeded in
Soon after this there came into the dark chamber to fetch Pierre, not
sooner or later he would step across it, but an incomprehensible terror
so on. Then a place was assigned to Pierre, he was shown the signs of
“Sophie,” he began, timidly at first and then more and more
so rapid that they could hardly be his mother’s.
sorrow, sadness, or self-reproach, that she purposely deceived herself
sorts, and Russian and Austrian soldiers of all arms, some wounded and
so softly that the Rhetor did not hear him and asked him what he was
so strange that one could not take it in. But then the expression of
so strong that he could lift the back of the carriage from behind, sat
so terrible to the soldiers, despite his furious purple countenance
“So that’s what I’m sorry for—human dignity, peace of mind,
so that the maid could hardly get her hair plaited, and she was
“So the attack is definitely resolved on?” asked Bolkónski.
“So there’s nothing?”
soul and his face.
soul: courage, generosity, morality, love of mankind, and especially
soul to believe and he did believe, and felt a joyful sense of comfort,
sounded far away. Here everyone clearly saw and said that the battle
sounded. Several of our men fell, among them the round-faced officer
sounding, even the connoisseurs said nothing, but only delighted in
sound of artillery fire near by. Having forced his way out of the crowd
sound of the hoofs of the approaching cavalcade, but because as he drew
sound of wheels and footsteps heard by the outposts during the night,
sount ze retreat!”
“So we are to have visitors, mon prince?” remarked Mademoiselle
so well how to arrange a feast on an open-handed, hospitable scale,
“So you are not afraid to play with me?” repeated Dólokhov, and as
“So you are still at that silly business!” quickly closed his eye
“So you have never noticed before how beautiful I am?” Hélène
“So you think he is powerless?” said Langeron.
speak—he turned back, rapidly mounted the stairs again with the
speaking and evidently not thinking about her at all. Anatole was not
speaking as if he were saying something which had long since been agreed
speaking French. He opened his eyes. Above him again was the same lofty
speaking of a collection of snuffboxes that had belonged to Pierre’s
speaking of Him, my dear sir. Of what, of whom, are we speaking? Whom
Speaking of the position of Prussia, Anna Pávlovna very naturally asked
speaking to an Austrian general. Prince Andrew, who was a little behind
speak in the tone of decided refusal and disagreement in which he had
speak, so now she could not believe that that little creature could be
special force. No matter what he thought about, he always returned to
spectacle of his power over these three women. Besides that, he was
spectacles.
spectacles unable to understand what they wanted or how they could go on
speeches were intended for quite other conditions, they were for the
spent, and almost every year he was obliged to borrow. Besides this the
spiritual needs, while it seems to me that animal happiness is the only
spite of his evident wish to do so he could not give them a joyous
splashing with blood those near them.
“Splendid! Excellent!” exclaimed Natásha. “Another verse,” she
spoke in abrupt sentences. “The whole company can bear witness. I beg
sprang out before the sleigh stopped, and ran into the hall. The house
spread by the fact that the Emperor’s carriage had really galloped
springing to him, putting her arms round him, and kissing him. This
squadron. The day was bright and sunny after a sharp night frost, and
S— S— get the same distinction?”
staff were not far off, in the village the vehicles were going to.
stages of his journey.
stairs and embraced his sister.
stake of twenty rubles.
standard in hand, I shall go forward and break whatever is in front of
standing motionless; then he came to the region occupied by Uvárov’s
stand the sight of these unfortunates.
started,” thought Prince Andrew, watching his old acquaintance with
state.”
state of the political thermometer of legitimate Petersburg court
station), and again embraced his sister.
station, but compared to the thoughts that now occupied him it was a
stationed on the Pratzen Heights.
station or a doctor for the cadet, and sat down by a bonfire the
stepped to the middle of the room and stood still.
“Stepping flat on his heels—we know what that means....”
stepping into the deep snow. He held the pistol in his right hand at
steps, and again stopped.
steps should be taken to liberate the serfs, which the steward met by
steps. When at last, smartly whirling his partner round in front of her
stern and solemn train of thought that weakness from loss of blood,
stern, shrewd, and penetrating expression of that look struck Pierre. He
steward, and again began giving orders. A light footstep and the
steward there, who, bowing respectfully, looked into his face and at
“Still aching?” Túshin asked Rostóv in a whisper.
“Still, don’t ruin yourself!” said Dólokhov with a side glance at
still farther ahead a dark line which he could not see distinctly but
still feeling his eyes gazing at her.
still. “If it were a man whose existence thou didst doubt I could
still in course of construction. Round the house was a garden newly laid
still in the same place, his stout body resting heavily in the saddle
still it was terrible, and she could not help thinking of it. She was
Still less did he think of injuring anyone for his own advantage. He
Still no one moved. The troops of the left flank, infantry and hussars
Still the cannon balls continued regularly to whistle and flop onto the
still there?”
“Still the same,” she said to her husband.
“Still the same. Wait, for heaven’s sake. Karl Ivánich always says
still was not in time to avoid them.
still when she’s fifty.”
stimulating effect on him. “Vive l’Empereur! l’Empereur!” he now
stint yourself, we’ll settle afterwards,” he added, turning to
stir. An adjutant, dismounting, lifted the soldier under the arms to
stir, and a footman who had run in announced, with a frightened face:
stomach with an already stiffened arm flung wide.
stone, hundreds of riders composing the suites moved carelessly but
stood at a window with Dólokhov, whose acquaintance he had lately
stood at every door anxiously noting visitors’ every movement in order
stood before a looking glass and brushed the hair on his temples
stood cold and silent, as if quite regardless of who had come to it.
stood, met, and separated, some in uniform and some in evening dress,
stood with his marshals around him, it was quite light. Above him was
stood with the candle. Yes, it was he, pale, thin, with a changed and
stopped at a solitary, deserted house that had probably once been an
stopped him. He turned his horse and galloped off.
stopped the company.” Dólokhov breathed heavily from weariness and
Stopping in front of the Pávlograds, the Tsar said something in French
“Stop them!” he shouted, and at the same moment, probably realizing
“Stop those wretches!” gasped Kutúzov to the regimental commander,
stories of his kindness and irascibility. Berg, as usual, kept silent
stories of the Grand Duke’s quick temper he related with gusto how in
stories or telling them, but followed every movement of Rostóv’s
story of the misfortunes of some Mary Víktorovna or other. At the
story to him, her seducer. And now he, a real Russian prince, had
straight! It’s well God had mercy on us. And what was it for? Who
straight on Napoleon, he was silent.... So insignificant at that moment
strange and ridiculous to meet objections from Russian generals and to
strangely softened but agitated expression on his face. He came up the
stranger.
stranger, looking deeper and deeper into Pierre’s eyes. “And in
strangers and unable to send news of himself. The gazettes from which
stranger, yet nearer to him through the brotherhood of man. With bated
strange, unknown, and dangerous places he reaches, just as a sailor is
strategic position where the operations would take place was familiar in
strayed off the track into the snow, Pierre looked down at his feet,
streamed out of a side street.
stretched along the highroad in the midst of a young copse in which were
stretching himself he rose from the table. “One does get tired sitting
striking chords with his short fingers, his legs thrown back and his
stripes on their bodies heal, and they are happy as before. But it is
stroke, came up to the prince, bowing his bald head resignedly before
stroked the animal. It was plain that he did not quite grasp where he
stronger flow of love for his sovereign. He longed to show that love in
struck him by her beauty on the preceding day. Today, when he had caught
struggle, but with naïve and lighthearted gaiety.
struggles of a certain Emilie de Mansfeld. “And why did she resist
struggle to conquer that fear, all his dreams of distinguishing himself
study.
study a little before noon in his silk dressing gown and found his head
study, the old prince went for his walk as usual next morning, but he
stumbled on him in the fog, hearing no encouraging word from their
stumbled over it. Several of those present laughed.
stupidest remarks came out clever and apt. Now everything Pierre said
submissive general.
submit from habit, and she said: “I wish only to do your will, but if
submit my report, with the information that if the army remains in its
submitted herself to Mademoiselle Bourienne and Lise. Both these women
subscribed the same amount as the others.
succeeded!’ The Prussian generals pride themselves on being polite to
succeeds. He sat motionless, looking at the heights visible above
success.”
success and at the inability of others to understand these things.
successfully cannonading the French, our artillerymen only noticed this
success reached Kutúzov’s cheerless staff with the galloping advent
Such a friend that I burned my arm for her sake. Look here!”
such a fright! Oh, what a pig I am!” he repeated, flushing suddenly.
such an unfortunate and charming woman! Don’t mention him before
such a plan in which the enemy’s position was assumed to be known,
such a small, insignificant creature compared with what was passing now
such as might call for his rapidity of perception and decision.
such gratefully religious ones, with offerings of icons and the bread
such love as Sónya was speaking of. But Natásha had not yet felt
such silence and an anxiety to find something to say, the effect is
Suddenly a gust of wind beat violently against the casement of the
suddenly appeared in the fog, there was a flash, followed by a report,
suddenly appeared, looming huge as an elephant.
suddenly came to and, lifting his head with an effort, took Rostóv, who
suddenly changed to one of horror. The French were supposed to be a
Suddenly Prince Bolkónski frowned.
suddenly replied the irate colonel. “If you vere in the cavalry...”
suddenly transformed. He put on the air of a subordinate who obeys
suddenness and prompt him to the coarsest and most reckless actions.
suffer for it.”
suffering, and the nearness of death aroused in him. Looking into
suffering, but what he wanted to do was too terrible.
suffering?” suggested another voice. Prince Andrew, however, did not
sufferings. What a heart! How like him it is! And how he has remembered
sufficient ground for this affair, or for blood to be shed over it....
sufficiently weakened to be successfully attacked. But still he did not
suggested that she had resolved to endure her troubles uncomplainingly
superfluous was hanging on his benumbed left arm. The wrist felt as if
superior.
superior to Napoleon’s, were concentrated in one place, the troops
“Supper, it’s time for supper! And here are the gypsies!”
supposed, must have risen to fifteen thousand. In reality it already
supposed that The Russian Guards, Abroad, was quite a definite address,
suppressed smile brightening both their faces, a smile that had nothing
surprised by what he saw. Hoping to enter on an entirely new life quite
surprised Pierre.
surprise, the French had thrown down their muskets and run. Dólokhov,
surrender of most of the Prussian fortresses had been received, when our
“Surrounded! Cut off? We’re lost!” shouted the fugitives.
surroundings, and from her smiling lips flowed sounds which anyone may
surroundings unable to find their own regiments. In this way the action
survive....”
Suvórov-like, in a kibítka, and is received with acclamations of joy
Suvórov. Moreover, paying such honor to Bagratión was the best way of
Suvórov’s time, now passing so gallantly before the Emperors, that he
swarmed with well-provisioned sutlers and Austrian Jews offering
sway and scatters its last snows and storms with desperate fury. A relay
sways the world. Think this over and I will come to you again.”
sweet wine, my dear, now that the time has come for these young ones to
sword of Frederick the Great.
swords, meaning them to pierce it. But the swords were drawn back from
symmetrically and above all freely, and in front of them two men—the
sympathize with him; if I seem sad and out of spirits myself, he will
table, a child’s table, and the little chair on which Prince Andrew
table and placed on it his small leather-gloved hands.
table began to watch her hands arranging the cards. From the dancing
table on a corner of which he smilingly and absent-mindedly fixed his
tables and the same chandelier with a cover over it; but someone had
table seemed to feel this, and they forgot their duties as they looked
tache,” he thought. “There now... it’s not a tache... Natásha...
“Tafa-lafa! But what he’s jabbering no one can make out,” said a
tail extended, Bedouin, as if also conscious of the Emperor’s eye
take her for her connections and wealth. Are there no women living
take his eyes off her and beat time with his saber in a way that clearly
take me too? Who are these men?” thought Rostóv, scarcely believing
taken a ballroom in Bezúkhov’s house, and the ball, as everyone said,
taken from the prisoner.
taken, it was not his fault but the corporal’s who had sent him to
taken off his eyes and, by the faint light of the burning spirit,
taken up their position and seeing troops before them, thought they were
“Take this road, your honor, that way you will be killed at once!” a
taking him by the hand led him forward. The hairs tied in the knot hurt
taking his partner with him. He glided silently on one foot half across
Taking the colonel’s outburst as a challenge to his courage, the
taking up a pack he prepared to deal. Rostóv submissively unbent the
talk, but I don’t want to,” he seemed to say. Besides this, in his
talking of the Schön Grabern affair? Were you there?”
talks sense, but to temporize and wait for something now when Bonaparte
talk to her. What a darling Sónya is!” he added with a smile.
task Pierre had to face was one for which he had very little aptitude or
tea?” asked his valet.
tears.
teatime she would prepare the countess, and after tea, with God’s
“Tell Bezúkhov to come. I’ll put his name down. Is his wife with
tell everything just as it happened, but imperceptibly, involuntarily,
telling him.
tell the little countess!”
“Tell them to give me a seat, for God’s sake!”
tell the truth.
temper because Prince Vasíli was coming, or whether his being in a bad
temper made him specially annoyed at Prince Vasíli’s visit, he was
ten minutes. And that it will not be too dull, here is the dear count
terrible, and now he has this authority of a commander in chief of
terrible dividing line of uncertainty and fear—resembling the line
terrible news from her till after her confinement, which was expected
terrible pain of being lifted onto the stretcher, the jolting while
terrible voice that the whole house heard it with horror. God knows what
than a hundred cannon were already in the hands of the French.
than a man who has been looking at a tuft of steppe grass through the
than anything else showed Pierre her superiority. She was right in
than a yard above the glow of the charcoal. Flakes of falling snow were
than five hundred paces from where Kutúzov was standing, a dense French
thanked him for his love. His looks thanked her for offering him his
thanked,” thought the overseer, “the storm has blown over!”
“Thank God!”
“Thank God!” said Prince Vasíli. “My wife has told me
“Thank God!” said Sónya, crossing herself. “But perhaps she
“Thank God!” said the voice. “And Father?”
Thanks to Anna Mikháylovna’s efforts, his own tastes, and the
thanks to Princess Lise’s voice and little downy lip that lifted over
thank you with my whole heart.” To Rostóv every word sounded like a
“Thank you; you saved me, my dear fellow!” said Túshin.
than the other; the serfs everywhere seemed thriving and touchingly
that.
that army: a feeling of self-forgetfulness, a proud consciousness of
that between the person they so address and themselves there are some
that column himself. When he had reached the village of Pratzen he
that day, but had heard about them from an infantry officer. “They
That day Nicholas Rostóv received a letter from Borís, telling him
that dinner was ready! The door opened, and from the dining room came
that divine purity and devotion I look for in women. If I found such a
“that Dólokhov was my lover,” she said in French with her coarse
that dreadful abyss, Pierre said to himself: “What am I doing? I need
that dread of beaten tracks, and wish to express itself in a manner
that end and when did this new, terrible state of things begin? What
That evening, proud of Dólokhov’s proposal, her refusal, and her
that, even more than in Moscow, he felt a sense of bewilderment, bustle,
that explained their teaching by hieroglyphics. A hieroglyph,” said
that fat one in spectacles” (that was how Pétya described his
that for an instant). Why should he not love her now, and even marry
that God who has been sewn into this amulet by Mary! There is nothing
that had advanced beyond the village went back; but as though in revenge
that had tormented him all dinnertime rose and took possession of him.
that, hearing he was in a bad humor, she had decided not to appear.
that he could not believe his eyes. “Who are they? Why are they
that he fell off his horse and sprained his arm and then ran as hard as
that he had composed in his imagination could he now recall. Those
that he is probably tired of them,” said another officer.
that he ought to avoid her and go away, Pierre, despite that decision,
that he should do the same. The rider, whose figure seemed familiar
That hesitation lasted only an instant. The Tsar’s foot, in the narrow
that he too seemed ashamed of the hussar of the line.
that he was dangerously wounded.
that he would have to answer it justly, and justice clashed not only
that I am saying!” thought a diplomatist, glancing at the happy faces
that I do not like him.”
that—if you consider yourself bound by your promise—it will seem as
that I’m a sharper, so I advise you to be careful.”
that instant the trooper Nikítenko, who was galloping ahead, shot away
“That is enough for me,” said Sónya, blushing.
“That is just why I do not begin, sire,” said Kutúzov in a
“That is no business of mine,” he thought. He had not ridden many
“That is probably the work of Vinesse,” said Pierre, mentioning
That is the only reality in the world, all else is folly. It is the one
“That is what we shall see! That is what we shall see!” he added
that is, you want to raise him” (pointing to a peasant who passed by
that it is more dangerous to run away than to advance, but that Russian
that it is we who lost the battle of Pultúsk. In short, we retreat
that it might not occur to her to speak of his share in the affair of
that it was impossible to stop them, spurred his horse and rode to the
that it was not she but he was so unusually beautiful, and that that was
that it would be a bad thing), but he knew it would happen.
that I would give my life twice over...” He looked at the countess,
that?... Kindly do as you are ordered.”
that Kutúzov’s upper lip twitched unnaturally as he said the
that led to his own apartments.
that moment after supper at Prince Vasíli’s, when he spoke those
that moment a third enemy rises before us—namely the Orthodox Russian
that moment his home life, jokes with Pétya, talks with Sónya, duets
that moment Pierre felt that Hélène not only could, but must, be his
that month and a half while he felt himself drawn nearer and nearer to
That never does any harm,” thought Anatole.
that not even a continuity of most brilliant successes would secure
that on receiving news of the defeat some would simply not believe it,
that passionate animal feeling which was apt to master him with great
“That passion which more than all others caused you to waver on the
that peculiar expression of polite weariness which plainly says, “If
that Princess Mary in this guise looked very plain, worse than usual,
that remained uninjured out of the four, they began moving down the hill
“That’s admirable!” he shouted. “He will take you with your
“That’s a fine death!” said Napoleon as he gazed at Bolkónski.
“That’s a good thing, but don’t move from Prince Vasíli’s. It
That same day a council of war had been held in which all the members of
that same evening there was to be one of the balls that Iogel (the
That same night, Rostóv was with a platoon on skirmishing duty in front
“That’s capital; of course she’ll forget her childish promises
that she winced and uttered a cry.
“That’s it, that’s it!” exclaimed the count, and gaily seizing
“That’s just it,” interrupted Dolgorúkov quickly, laughing.
that sleep is more important than anything,” whispered Princess Mary
that’s not it—that’s tomorrow. Oh yes! Natásha... sabretache...
that sort of man), he gave Borís a pleasant smile, frowned as with
that sort of thing.”
That’s our house,” said Rostóv. “Of course, it’s our house!
“That’s so, your excellency, all they have to do is to eat a good
that state of mind which makes everything seem possible, pleasant, and
that’s the way they treat me! No confidence in me! Ah, ordered to keep
that surrounded the Emperors.
that’s what I did.”
“that the Emperor will meet me and give me an order as he would to any
that the Ismáylov regiment was quartered for the night ten miles from
that the prince was in a bad humor, stood awaiting him; Mademoiselle
that the pupils’ parents wept at having to let him take their children
that the question of his wife’s guilt which had been tormenting him
that these thoughts had been suggested to Prince Andrew by his
that the story about Sergéy Kuzmích, the laughter, and the food
that those broad-boned reddish hands with hairy wrists visible from
that very instant a cloud of smoke spread all round, firing was heard
that was dispersing on the hill lay still more densely below, where they
that was good.
that was not pretty, but neither Mademoiselle Bourienne nor the little
that was swaying from its weight in Prince Andrew’s hands, but he
that were so agonizingly, incessantly pulling and pressing his arm and
that where the steward had shown him in the accounts that the serfs’
that which had said: “The Pávlograd hussars?”
that while Napoleon’s proclamation was being read to the troops the
that white spot. “I expect it’s snow... that spot... a spot—une
that year, as all his estates had been remortgaged, and so Nicholas,
the accountant with the naïve face was feeling its texture, shaking his
the accurate way characteristic of him, was building a little pyramid of
the act of falling asleep. Rostóv lifted his head that had sunk almost
the address. “This letter would be of great use to you.”
the adoration then common in Moscow for the Emperor, who was spoken of
the affair, and like everyone in similar cases, did not yet believe that
the affair had come to an actual duel). “You know, Count, it is much
the aim of supporting one another in the path of virtue, and that is how
“The ammunition for the guns in position is exhausted, Your
the animated hum of several conversations. At one end of the table, the
the appointed place.
“The Ápsherons must be stopped, your excellency,” cried he. But at
the arrival of a suitor agitated her, and still more so by both
the artillerymen were still as merry and lively as ever. Twice they
theater, where he had been with his family and Denísov. He was at once
The attack of the Sixth Chasseurs secured the retreat of our right
the Austrian adjutant, he addressed Bolkónski.
the bald head. Véra, Natásha, Sónya, and Pétya now entered the room,
The band immediately struck up “Conquest’s joyful thunder
The band struck up the newly introduced mazurka. Nicholas could not
the battery to retire as quickly as possible. When the supports attached
the battlefield, believed that the French had been defeated and were
the battle of Schön Grabern than you do now,” said his son with a
The beauty went to the aunt, but Anna Pávlovna detained Pierre, looking
the Bedchamber. The diplomatic career now lies open before you.”
the best maroon dress, and so on, all would be well. They forgot that
the best post he could—preferably that of adjutant to some important
the bigwigs who guided the club’s opinion reappeared, and everybody
the bonfire, and addressing Túshin asked him to have the guns moved a
The book was the Gospel, and the white thing with the lamp inside was a
the bridges were strong and had handrails. Everything bore an impress of
the brilliant surroundings in which he had last met his friend in
The cadet was Rostóv. With one hand he supported the other; he was
the campaign and the two battles in which he had taken part, and his
the campfire. They were quarreling and fighting desperately, each trying
the carriage as pale as anything. How they made the four black horses
the case, hesitated about lifting the injured or dead. The soldiers,
the cause of his grief.
the cause of justice against the enemy of the human race. Anna Pávlovna
The cause of the confusion was that while the Austrian cavalry was
the center of the Russian army, and that that center was already
the chantry long before, but that nine tenths of the peasants in that
the cheeks, the same expression was on her charming childlike face with
the cheerful glitter of that autumn day was in keeping with the news of
The chief steward, a very stupid but cunning man who saw perfectly
The chief steward expressed great sympathy with Pierre’s intentions,
The chief steward, who considered the young count’s attempts almost
The child moved slightly in his sleep, smiled, and rubbed his forehead
the clavichord, sang the tune. Bolkónski was not there. None of these
the cleverest among them, including the chief steward, understood from
The cloak they spread under him was wet with blood which stained his
The club cook and the steward listened to the count’s orders with
The cold, austere tone of this man, whom he had almost always before met
The colonel rode to the front, angrily gave some reply to questions put
the column, gave him the order to advance.
The combatants advanced along the trodden tracks, nearer and nearer to
the command of the army to General Buxhöwden. During this interregnum
The command of the left flank belonged by seniority to the commander of
the complete darkness Túshin’s guns moved forward, surrounded by the
The concentrated activity which had begun at the Emperor’s
the contempt with which Rostóv, from his fighting army point of view,
The conversation did not flag all evening and turned chiefly on the
the conversation to insignificant matters. Natásha, who, of the whole
the copse across which our men, regardless of orders, were running and
The Cossacks sold the horse for two gold pieces, and Rostóv, being the
the cot. He did not look round, but still gazing at the infant’s face
the cot where she was standing, “better wait a bit... later...”
The council of war, at which Prince Andrew had not been able to
The council of war was just over when Prince Andrew accompanied
the count and at Anna Mikháylovna, the latter very adroitly turned
The count considered.
the countess; about 70,000 went for interest on debts. The building of a
The countess did not believe her ears. Denísov had proposed. To whom?
The countess glanced at her silent son.
The countess had been prepared by Anna Mikháylovna’s hints at dinner.
The countess shrugged her shoulders.
“The countess told me to inquire whether your excellency was at
The count put his ear to the keyhole and listened.
The count sobbed yet more.
The count walked up and down the hall in his dressing gown, giving
The count was delighted at Anna Mikháylovna’s taking upon herself one
the court, carefully abstaining from expressing an opinion of his
The crowd, pushing forward desperately, squeezed together, moved a few
the dam, the pond, and the bank.
the darkness. This was the last French attack and was met by soldiers
The day after he had been received into the Lodge, Pierre was sitting at
The day after Rostóv had been to see Borís, a review was held of the
The day after the review, Borís, in his best uniform and with his
the Day. That’s what keeping one’s head means. That’s the way,
the decisive point, and gains the victory alone. “But death and
the declaration from Petersburg gave him particular pleasure, and that
the deep wet snow between the place where they had been standing and
“The devil knows! They’ve killed everybody! It’s all up now!”
the disordered battalion and at the enemy, “what’s that?”
“The dispositions!” exclaimed Kutúzov bitterly. “Who told you
the dispositions or anything else—he was engaged in satisfying the
The dispositions were very complicated and difficult. They began as
The doctor entered. Prince Andrew went out and, meeting Princess Mary,
the door and as soon as it opened his rough old arms closed like a vise
the door; the scream ceased and he heard the wail of an infant.
the door, was sitting at the table in a Persian dressing gown, writing.
“The doubt is flattering,” said “the man of profound intellect,”
The duel between Pierre and Dólokhov was hushed up and, in spite of
the duel with Nesvítski, Bezúkhov’s second. Pierre went home, but
thee, and even in those blasphemous words thou hast just uttered!”
the ebb and flow of these sounds.
the efforts of the old count, and instead of being degraded to the ranks
“The Eighteenth.”
the Emperor, and a thousand reasons occurred to him why it would be
The Emperor drew level with Rostóv and halted. Alexander’s face was
The Emperor, frowning slightly, bent his ear forward as if he had not
the Emperor. He felt that this nearness by itself made up to him for the
the Emperor immediately!” thought Rostóv and galloped on.
The Emperor’s horse started at the sudden cry. This horse that had
the Emperor’s severity regarding duels at that time, neither the
the Emperor’s suite. One officer told Rostóv that he had seen someone
the Emperor’s voice.
“The Emperor! The Emperor!” was suddenly heard among the hussars.
The Emperor turned with a smile to one of his followers and made a
The Emperor without waiting for an answer turned away and said to one of
“The enemy has quenched his fires and a continual noise is heard from
“The enemy is still far away, your excellency. According to the
the enemy’s fires, but heard the shouting of the French more loudly
the evening again turned to Borís, asking him in a tone of caressing
“The exchange horses have just come,” answered the servant. “Will
the experience of old Cunctators.”
the eyes of the Guardsman’s horse. The heavy black horse, sixteen
the face and figure of Prince Andrew, in a fur cloak the deep collar of
the face that emerged from the shirt.
the familiar staircase. The well-known old door handle, which always
the farther he went the more disorganized they were. The highroad on
the fate of battles had arrived. Would this disorderly crowd of soldiers
the felt boots approached the unseen bend of the staircase more rapidly.
“The field marshal is angry with the Emperor and he punishes us all,
the field of battle, who though still in some confusion were less
The fires and shouting in the enemy’s army were occasioned by the fact
the first couple. Noiselessly, skillfully stepping with his little
“The first man that turns up—she forgets her father and everything
the first second. “A baby? What baby...? Why is there a baby there? Or
the first to catch his eye. He sent him.
the first to seize the surrendering French officer by his collar. Our
The first words he heard on coming to his senses were those of a French
the flagstaff that had been dropped beside him. (The flag had already
The fog had begun to clear and enemy troops were already dimly visible
The fog had grown so dense that though it was growing light they could
The foreboding of evil that had suddenly come over Rostóv was more and
The foremost Frenchman, the one with the hooked nose, was already so
the forests in the province of Kostromá, the land lower down the river,
the French and lay down their arms at the first demand.
The French dragoon was a young Alsatian who spoke French with a German
the French, galloped along the front as hard as his horse could go, but
The French had attacked the battery and, seeing Kutúzov, were firing
The French had been repulsed for the last time. And again and again in
the Frenchman Langeron, Kutúzov’s incapacity, and (it was whispered)
The French were already near. Prince Andrew, walking beside Bagratión,
The French, who had ceased firing at this field strewn with dead and
the frightened face and the figure could not be altered, and that
the front. I held my sword in my left hand, Count. All our family—the
The game continued; a waiter kept handing round champagne.
The general had a fit of coughing as a result of shouting and of the
The general had so wished to do this and was so sorry he had not managed
the general pleasure and disappoint everyone’s expectation. Prince
The generals seemed to listen reluctantly to the difficult dispositions.
the general state of affairs which was far from satisfactory.
the general, the men themselves not knowing what, or why, they were
the gentlemen and Mademoiselle Bourienne rose and the little princess,
the gentlemen of the Tsar’s suite by his poor French.
the gesture of a man too busy to lose a moment, glanced at Kutúzov and,
The girls sprang aside. Denísov hid his hairy legs under the blanket,
the glory of our arms and of the day’s work, they assumed a serious
the good-natured Iogel, flying about like a feather and bowing according
The Grand Master began reading the statutes. They were very long, and
The Grand Master proposed that the last duty should be performed,
The Grand Master rapped with his mallet. All the Masons sat down in
the greater part of the men had to halt and an unpleasant consciousness
The Guards had gone to the front; Dólokhov had been reduced to the
The Guards had made their whole march as if on a pleasure trip, parading
the guests. To each of them he made some careless and agreeable remark
the hair was wet, so profusely had the child perspired. He was not dead,
the half-closed eyes was there greedily gnawing a mutton bone, and the
The handsome young Emperor Alexander, in the uniform of the Horse
“The head of the garrison at Glogau, with ten thousand men, asks the
the heavy standard, he ran forward with full confidence that the whole
the highest law thou shalt regain traces of the ancient dignity which
“The highest wisdom and truth are like the purest liquid we may wish
The highest wisdom has but one science—the science of the whole—the
“The highest wisdom is not founded on reason alone, not on those
the hill not to go beyond the stream, but Rostóv pretended not to hear
the Hofkriegsrath and both Emperors took part. At that council, contrary
The homestead consisted of a threshing floor, outhouses, stables, a
the honor, but I shall never be your son’s wife.”
the hope of an alliance with her.
the Horse Guards.
The Horse Guards were galloping, but still holding in their horses.
The horses’ croups began to sway in the front line. Rook pulled at the
The hussar did not reply.
The hussar only sighed without replying and coughed angrily. The sound
The hussars crowded round and responded heartily with loud shouts.
The ice bore him but it swayed and creaked, and it was plain that it
The ice gave way under one of the foremost soldiers, and one leg slipped
the icon stand. To her surprise and distress she found that her prayers
The idea of defeat and flight could not enter Rostóv’s head. Though
The infantry regiments that had been caught unawares in the outskirts
the inhabitants of the district.
the inlaid portfolio. Pierre signed the deed and after that the princess
their adjutants had come to witness the curious phenomenon of the
their cleanliness and discipline. They had come by easy stages, their
their faces was a quiet and solemn look.
their grief in their own way. The old prince would not cherish any hope:
their guns, were running toward him. He also saw French infantry
their marriage, with bare shoulders and a languid, passionate look on
their meaning but must keep them. The second pair of man’s gloves
their name and my own I hold out a brotherly hand to you.”
their own resources what might be needed for the success of the fete.
their places, and one of them read an exhortation on the necessity of
the landing below, Philip, the footman, stood looking scared and holding
the large drawing room. Prince Vasíli came up to Pierre with languid
The last of the Horse Guards, a huge pockmarked fellow, frowned angrily
the last post station but one before Moscow, Denísov had drunk three
The latter began to feel that it was in bad taste to speak of his
The latter lay silent in the sleigh with closed eyes and did not answer
the left-flank columns had already descended.
the left, the firing became more distinct. Kutúzov had stopped and was
The letter was old, having been written before the battle at
the line of retreat on the left by the French. However inconvenient the
the line that had so sharply divided the two armies?” he asked himself
    * The little one is charming.
The little princess and Mademoiselle Bourienne had already received
The little princess got up, rang for the maid, and hurriedly and merrily
The little princess grumbled to her maid that her bed was badly made.
The little princess lay supported by pillows, with a white cap on her
The little princess, like an old war horse that hears the trumpet,
The little princess, taking the dress from the maid, came up to Princess
the liveliness of a fourteen-year-old boy, and yet it was the face
the living charm of her neck and shoulders, so near to his lips that
the Lodge, told the password, and at last was permitted to sit down.
the look she felt upon her made that world still more poetic. But
“The Lord be thanked, yes!”
the loss of Prince Andrew had reached Bald Hills, and in spite of the
them.”
them, and reads those from the Emperor addressed to others. ‘Ah! So
them, and she doubts the means we have of gaining them. That is the
them, and understood that it was useless and even cruel to insist.
The man was wearing a bluish coat of broadcloth, he had no knapsack
them are harmful, especially the women. Yes, dear boy,” he continued,
The Mason cleared his throat huskily, as old men do, and called his
The Mason did not move and for a long time said nothing after this
The Mason looked intently at Pierre and smiled as a rich man with
The Mason remained silent for a long time, evidently considering.
the Mason’s arguments; he dreaded not to be able to believe in him.
The Mason smiled with his gentle fatherly smile.
the Mason. “Yes, I never thought of it, but I have led a contemptible
the mazurka, which was just coming into fashion, were danced. Iogel had
them curiosity, awe, and even love—a supercilious consciousness of
them down! What?...” said Rostóv, waking up. At the moment he opened
The meeting was at an end, and on reaching home Pierre felt as if he had
The members and guests of the club wandered hither and thither, sat,
The men and officers returning spoke of a brilliant victory, of the
the men (the commanders, as we saw at the council of war, were out of
them from others was the absence of host or hostess and the presence of
them!” he reflected.
the middle of a field without rhyme or reason. It’s all those damned
The midwife was already on her way to meet her, rubbing her small, plump
them. If he is not rich I will give her the means; I will ask my
the mildness of his features, was all the greater. Rostóv was happy
the minister and his son had arrived, but the appearance of both had
them in the thick fog, the Russians exchanged shots with the enemy
the mist, and his cold face wore that special look of confident,
the mist. From information he had received the evening before, from the
them it was difficult to get out again. One was shouting, “Get on!
The moment he heard the firing and the cry from behind, the general
the moment is not Bonaparte but Buxhöwden. General Buxhöwden was all
the more depressed.
them or make them move. On the one hand, the chief steward put the state
the morning of the twentieth, when the memorable battle of Austerlitz
them Pierre noticed a large cast iron ring with a seal representing a
them—remained for a while without any definite opinion on the subject
them rest and leisure?” said Pierre, hurrying and lisping. “And
themselves and grow more and more miserable.”
themselves quite innocent, and since that day when he was overpowered
themselves, stifle this remorse and grow callous, as a result of being
themselves to Túshin in all their horror. He had been so excited that
them something funny and kept them amused, while he watched the young
them strangely of the little princess. But what was still stranger,
them taking off his cap) “from his animal condition and awaken in him
them the order to march, thereby indicating that he intended to lead
them, when suddenly, clinking his spurs and spreading out his legs,
Then a general rode past shouting something angrily, not in Russian.
then a gleam of bayonets; to the left beyond the village similar masses
“Then allow me to express your regrets, and I am sure your opponent
then all will be right, as our bear huntsman at Kostromá used to tell
“Then am I to order those large sterlets?” asked the steward.
then appointed to supervise the enrollment decreed throughout Russia.
Then a thin, pale soldier, his neck bandaged with a bloodstained leg
then both voices together with glad intonations, and then footsteps.
then brought back to the general circle.
then detached ideas and impressions from the world of reality shot
The nearest soldiers shrank back, the gun driver stopped his horse, but
The newcomer was a short, large-boned, yellow-faced, wrinkled old
the new homestead he was constructing and its buildings, but even here,
The next day the Emperor stopped at Wischau, and Villier, his physician,
then he did everything so simply and with such assurance!) Mademoiselle
Then he recalled the coarseness and bluntness of her thoughts and the
the night ten miles from Olmütz and next morning were to come straight
The night was foggy and through the fog the moonlight gleamed
“Then I may reckon on it, your excellency?”
the nonsense talked by the Austrian generals. Shinshín, standing close
The novelty Anna Pávlovna was setting before her guests that evening
then quickly glanced at Dólokhov and, bending his finger as he had been
Then suddenly he realized the joyful significance of that wail; tears
then that same face pale, quivering, and suffering, as it had been when
Then the voice said something more, Demyán replied, and the steps in
“Then they’ve not gone to bed yet? What do you think? Mind now,
the nurse brought it to him and nodded approval when she told him that
The nurse lit the gilt candles before the icons and sat down by the door
“Then what is this blood on the gun carriage?” inquired Túshin.
“Then when am I to have it?”
“Then why are you here? You should have gone on long ago, now you
then with remarks which showed that he was in a good temper.
“Then you are serving?”
the officers as he went: “Have these gentlemen attended to and taken
The officers gathered round Denísov’s canteen, eating and talking.
The officers got up and stood round the Cossacks and their prisoner.
the officers or adjutants who wandered about in the fog in those unknown
The old aunt received the two young people in her corner, but seemed
The old count cast down his eyes on hearing his son’s words and began
The old countess, not letting go of his hand and kissing it every
The old count pretended to be angry.
the old count, the countess, Pétya, Véra, Natásha, and Sónya, and
the old lady.
the old man turned angrily away.
The old prince did not sleep either. Tíkhon, half asleep, heard him
The old prince dressed leisurely in his study, frowning and considering
the old prince first heard of the defeat at Austerlitz stated, as usual
The old prince knew that if he told his daughter she was making a
The old princess came in and also wept. The elderly lady was using
The old princess did not reply, she was tormented by jealousy of her
the old prince. “Very, very glad to have seen you,” repeated he,
The old prince was very affectionate and careful in his treatment of
the one that will result from it will be as victorious! However, dear
the onlookers, “Will it be long? Are things ready?”
the orderlies looked at him as if they wished to impress on him that a
the orders were to abandon the wounded, many of them dragged themselves
the other clutched his drooping pistol. His face was pale. Rostóv ran
the other committeemen. “There will be many toasts, it’s time to
the other, quite a new reflection of the society in which they had taken
the others but win from you. Or are you afraid of me?” he asked again.
the other side of the fire, warming his thin yellow body.
the pack. Much depended on Rostóv’s winning or losing on that seven
the party of the young had triumphed. The voices of those who counseled
“The Pávlograd hussars?” he inquired.
the people who know of it the less a woman in travail suffers, everyone
“The picket is still on the hill, your excellency, just where it was
the point of view of the old countess and of society it was out of the
the possessor of wealth. How have you used it? What have you done
The postmaster came in and began obsequiously to beg his excellency to
The postmaster, his wife, the valet, and a peasant woman selling
“The praise of a great commander is a soldier’s highest reward,”
the pre-eminence.
the priest with a goose feather anointed the boy’s little red and
The prince bowed his head and went up to the porch. “God be
The prince looked at his daughter’s frightened face and snorted.
The princess did not fall down or faint. She was already pale, but on
The princess sank helplessly into an armchair beside her father and
The princess saw that her father regarded the matter with disapproval,
The princess went up to the door, passed by it with a dignified and
The prince stopped. He saw the effect these words had produced on his
The prince turned round to the overseer and fixed his eyes on him,
the prince was lying on the sofa, looked at him, noticed his perturbed
the Prussian army and was aide-de-camp to a very important personage.
The quiet home life and peaceful happiness of Bald Hills presented
the ranks.
the ranks, and above all being unable to see anything in front or around
“There are precedents, I may mention Schwarzenberg.”
“There are so many prisoners today, nearly the whole Russian army,
there as he. And now—this duel! Have these people no feeling, or
the reception room, where he found some ten officers and generals.
the recruiting, granted by the Emperor. If I had been two hours late
(the reflection was still incomplete), he caught himself smiling and was
therefore met with unaltered looks the angrily inquisitive expression of
therefore you seek wisdom and virtue. Is that not so?” said the
the regimental commander on horseback and some ten men of his company,
the regiment Kutúzov had reviewed at Braunau and in which Dólokhov was
the regiment under a hail of bullets which fell around, but fortunately
“There he is!” said Borís, thinking Rostóv had said “His
“There... he’s puffing again,” muttered Túshin to himself, as a
there in which he had now no part could perturb him. He shut his eyes,
there is hardly time to put in action—seeing Pierre, touched his
“There is something nasty, something wrong, in the feeling she excites
“There is something up,” thought Nicholas, and he was further
The remains of Langeron’s and Dokhtúrov’s mingled forces were
“There now! It’s true that all you women are crybabies,” remarked
“There now, the Kúrskies have also gone past,” was being said in
“There now, you wish to liberate your serfs,” he continued; “that
there. Pierre had the air of a man preoccupied with considerations which
“The reserves, sire!” replied a voice, a very human one compared to
“There’s no need to talk! He receives his orders and will marry you
“There’s nothing for me to understand,” she cried out with
the resounding strains of the polonaise:
there’s some mistake,” thought he. “They can’t have wanted to
the rest.”
“There’s the corner at the crossroads, where the cabman, Zakhár,
the rest of his life.
the rest of the evening.
“There, there! Do you feel it? I feel so strange. And do you know,
“There! They are bringing another!” cried one of the officers,
the retreat from Austerlitz, where he alone had withdrawn his column
the revolving pulleys whirr with the rapidity of their movement, but a
There was no answer to any of these questions, except one, and that
There was no laughter in the maids’ large hall. In the men servants’
there was none he would so much like to have for a friend as that very
there was no one beyond the ditch now. Only some carts and carriages
There was no one in the hall. “Oh God! Is everyone all right?”
there was no reason why it should not reach the Pávlograd regiment,
there was nothing between the squadron and the enemy, and again that
there was nothing to be said, and neither wished to give occasion for
There was really nothing to be seen in front except a barren descent
there was still the same bewitching combination of majesty and mildness
There were in the room a child’s cot, two boxes, two armchairs, a
“There will be a council of war at Kutúzov’s tonight, though; you
the Rhetor but Pierre’s sponsor, Willarski, whom he recognized by his
The Rhetor cleared his throat, crossed his gloved hands on his breast,
the Rhetor, “is an emblem of something not cognizable by the senses
the right flank and the French were already advancing, were engaged
the right they will expose a flank to me. Soldiers! I will myself direct
the road he reined in his horse, hesitating whether to ride along it or
the room, and seeming not to notice the chairs was dashing straight at
the room, pondering over his vicious past, and with a rapturous sense
The Rostóvs knew everybody in Moscow. The old count had money enough
the Rostóvs since the day of his departure for the army. To be in Anna
the Russian with his heir the Tsarévich, and the Austrian with the
the sale of the land and forests and to release them from the Land Bank,
the salute and unable to repress the smile of delight induced by his
The same happy, rapturous faces turned to the shaggy figure of Denísov.
the same, then why this duel, this murder? Either I shall kill him, or
the same time, my honored benefactor,” wrote Prince Vasíli. “My son
The score against him reached the fateful sum of forty-three thousand.
the scoundrels!”
the seat indicated to him beside the fair Hélène and listened to the
the sergeant to meet some mounted men who were riding along the line.
the serious faces of those around, remembered all he had already gone
The servant brought back his tumbler turned upside down, * with an
The servant handed him a book which Pierre took to be a devotional work,
these same questions which he could not solve and yet could not cease to
These sights and sounds had no depressing or intimidating effect on him;
the shirt.
the sight of the killed and wounded.
The silence lasted some time. Prince Bagratión, apparently not wishing
the sinews and scorching the flesh of his sprained arm and shoulder. To
the smell of linstocks, came the artillery which crawled between the
the smoke, Rostóv hesitated whether to gallop after them or to go where
the snow, greedily bit at it, again raised his head, adjusted himself,
“The snow is deep. I am having the avenue swept, your honor.”
the soldier always has around him the same comrades, the same ranks, the
the soldiers’ faces and unnatural warlike solemnity on those of the
The soldiers laughed. A moment later, an adjutant arrived with the same
The soldiers who had carried Prince Andrew had noticed and taken the
The sound of musketry at the foot of the hill, now diminishing, now
The southern spring, the comfortable rapid traveling in a Vienna
the special deep cooing tone, precluding the possibility of interrupting
The spot chosen for the duel was some eighty paces from the road,
The squadron in which Rostóv was serving had scarcely time to mount
the staff officer on duty.
the standard.
the state of the Prussian army. As soon as he had finished she turned to
“The step must be taken but I cannot, I cannot!” thought Pierre,
The steward did not say it was quite impossible, but suggested selling
the stewards (there were semiliterate foremen among them) listened with
the still greater unimportance of death, the meaning of which no one
The stores are empty, the roads impassable. The Orthodox begin looting,
The stranger’s face was not genial, it was even cold and severe, but
The stretchers moved on. At every jolt he again felt unendurable pain;
the struggling men, and the fate of the red-haired gunner, who had
the sutlers. On receiving Borís’ letter he rode with a fellow officer
the table in a merry mood, sitting down now by one, now by another, of
the table, screened by a bound music book so that the light did not fall
the table which was scrawled over with figures, wet with spilled wine,
The tall, fair-haired General Buxhöwden stood, leaning his back against
the tears from his eyes and from the letter, then having dried her
The temperature shown by the political thermometer to the company that
the termination of the ceremony. He looked up joyfully at the baby when
the third division and convinced himself that there really were no
The third time the Rhetor came back more quickly and asked Pierre
The three voices, hers, Mademoiselle Bourienne’s, and Katie’s, who
the Thuerassa, he merely saves us a great deal of trouble and all our
the time had come to experience the joy of an attack of which he had so
The Torzhók peddler woman, in a whining voice, went on offering her
the town where the headquarters and the diplomatic corps were stationed
The traveler was Joseph Alexéevich Bazdéev, as Pierre saw from the
the tremor of the speaker’s voice—which sometimes almost broke—or
The troops again began to move, and two battalions of the Nóvgorod and
The troops of the vanguard were stationed before Wischau, within sight
The troops were running in such a dense mass that once surrounded by
the Tsar!”
The Tsar addressed the officers also: “I thank you all, gentlemen, I
The Tsar heard but obviously did not like the reply; he shrugged his
The Tsar looked intently and observantly into Kutúzov’s eye
The Tsar said something more which Rostóv did not hear, and the
The Tsar stopped a few minutes in front of the hussars as if undecided.
the Tsar with another glance at the Emperor Francis, as if inviting
the Tverskáya Street rode the hussar with mustaches... I thought about
The two generals and the adjutant took hold of the field glass, trying
The unsolved problem that tormented him was caused by hints given by the
the uselessness of freeing the serfs, who were quite happy as it was.
the valley. The fourth column, with which Kutúzov was, stood on the
the very time he was expressing this conviction to himself, in another
the village again, but Túshin’s guns could not move, and the
the village letting the troops pass by him. That morning Kutúzov seemed
the visitors, and before the visitors I tell you that in future you are
the wall, his eyes fixed on a burning candle, and seemed not to listen
The war was flaming up and nearing the Russian frontier. Everywhere one
the wax with the baby’s hair had not sunk in the font but had floated.
the whole day was finally and indubitably answered in the affirmative.
the whole human race, offering it in our members an example of piety
The whole interest was concentrated on Rostóv. Instead of sixteen
the whole matter and decide what was right and how he should act, but
the wind.
The wind had fallen and black clouds, merging with the powder smoke,
the woman he had known as a child, of whom when her beauty was mentioned
“The wound is not here, it is there!” said Kutúzov, pressing the
They all had but one wish: to advance as soon as possible against the
They all separated, but, except Anatole who fell asleep as soon as he
they all were, or seemed to be, pretty—so rapturous were their smiles
they are beaten, flogged, or sent to Siberia, I don’t suppose they are
“They can’t be far off, probably just beyond the stream,” he said
“They coax me as if I were Váska the cat!” said Denísov jokingly.
they could not fail to vanquish anyone, be it whom it might: so thought
they had entered Moscow.
They had not met for nearly half a year and, being at the age when young
they halted in silence. There was nothing fresh to be seen from the
“They have gone to bed and put out their lights, your excellency.”
They named the colonel, Prince Repnín.
The younger Emperor could not restrain his wish to be present at the
the youth and inexperience of the sovereign, who had trusted worthless
they quite understood one another as to the first part of their romance,
“They’re always in love with someone,” he thought of Sónya and
They’re coming!” Alarmed voices were heard, and a stir of final
They rose from the table and sat down in the entrance porch which served
“They say Pierre is quite broken by his misfortune.”
they seemed of them, one could feel by the occasional glances they gave
They went out and walked about till dinnertime, talking of the political
“They were in a hurry enough to start us, and now here we stand in
they were saying was amusing, but because she felt happy and was unable
“They were there this evening, but now I don’t know, your
they would have remained there for a long time testing each other’s
they would not for an instant let his shoulder move a hair’s breadth.
thing he would have to unite his fate with hers. He might perhaps have
things he should have shown it sooner, but he lets it go on for months.
things that had never occurred. Mademoiselle Bourienne also shared them
things the old count sent to his son.
thing we are interested in here,” said the spirit of the place.
think could hardly be found nowadays—but is she contented with her
think, Count? The next day it was not even mentioned in the Orders of
thinking? I mustn’t forget. How shall I speak to the Emperor? No,
think it over. Go! Yes or no, yes or no, yes or no!” he still shouted
think so yourself. And the main thing is,” he continued, “that I
thin lips interrupted Weyrother, wishing to say something. But the
This active old servant was unpacking the traveler’s canteen and
this answer. “Have you sought for means of attaining your aim in
This battle, which consisted in the capture of a French squadron, was
this bone—a bill for thirty thousand rubles—to the poor princess
this?” But these doubts only lasted a moment. Pierre glanced at
this card and I’ll take my cap and drive home to supper with Denísov,
this consciousness of mismanagement became a general conviction, but as
This Guardsman would certainly have bowled Rostóv and his Bedouin over
this heart, so kind and generous? Say ‘perhaps’... The future is so
this holiday time. “Seize the moments of happiness, love and be loved!
this indecision appeared to him majestic and enchanting, like everything
this information, the little princess and Mademoiselle Bourienne, whose
this instant!” thought Rostóv.
this is absolutely true.
“This is all very fine, but things must be settled,” said Prince
“This is not at all the thing,” he said. “What sort of Polish
This is the battle of Pultúsk, which is considered a great victory but
“This is the first act. Those that follow are naturally increasingly
this is what I was proud of! I then thought that I did not understand
this marriage. He recalled her former words and looks and the words
this may be my only chance of seeing the Emperor. It won’t be long
this misery, and money, and Dólokhov, and anger, and honor—it’s all
this moment of happy, rapturous excitement. She gazed at him, not taking
this name day of hers had been one of the pleasantest she had ever had.
This short man had on a white leather apron which covered his chest and
This short man nodded to Dolgorúkov as to an intimate friend and stared
This silence was broken by one of the brethren, who led Pierre up to the
this speech how they could best handle the master for their own ends.
this strange incident, and then shrugging his shoulders went to the door
this strong, brave man, this model son and officer that, judging by this
this table with the thought of winning a hundred rubles to buy that
This unpleasant impression merely flitted over the young and happy face
this—want glory, want to be known to men, want to be loved by them, it
This was quite true, but the count, the countess, and Natásha looked
This was true. The architect had told him that it was necessary, and
those brilliant aged eyes grown old in this conviction, or the calm
those first steps. Both had changed greatly since they last met and both
those of higher ranks in the Order. 3. Morality. 4. Love of mankind. 5.
those on foot, collapsed in a great mass, and some forty men who were on
those recently arrived from Russia, both Guards and regiments of the
those richer and more powerful than himself and he had rare skill in
those who had been campaigning under Kutúzov. The two Emperors,
thou art wise because thou couldst utter those blasphemous words,” he
though all were in a conspiracy of silence. The men who set the tone
Though five minutes before, Prince Andrew had been able to say a few
though he smiled delightedly. He ran up to them.
though he wrote in French and used French jests and French idioms,
Though Mademoiselle Bourienne had been so unsuccessful in her choice
Though none of the column commanders rode up to the ranks or talked to
Though no words had passed between Anatole and Mademoiselle Bourienne,
though of this Prince Andrew said nothing to his sister, was that in the
though shy, went on carefully executing her steps. Denísov did not
thought and heard of her might be false. And he again saw her not as the
thought. And suddenly, at this thought of death, a whole series of most
thought, as he listened to voices in Kutúzov’s courtyard. The voices
thought, he called Tíkhon and began to undress.
thought he heard a strange noise through the door. He was seized with
thought he, “I shall be sent with a brigade or division, and there,
thought, “I must remain free.”
thought of everything, considered everything, and did everything the
thought of Sónya, during this stay in Moscow, he said to himself,
thought of such a thing, it is only the cabinet that says it.”
thought Pierre, “and how little attention we pay to it!”
thought Pierre. “But this man knows the truth and, if he wished to,
thought Prince Andrew, and striking his horse he rode up to Kutúzov.
thought—referring to the little princess who was not in the dining
thought Rostóv. At that moment Alexander turned his head and Rostóv
thought Rostóv. He knew what a shock he would inflict on his father and
thought Rostóv. “I should die of happiness!”
thoughts, and memories suddenly arose within him that he could not fall
thoughts he has dreamed of for nights, but looks around for help or a
thought that he, an exemplary officer of many years’ service who
though without knowing its cause—was such as to remind one still more
thou hast lost.”
“Thou hatest it. Then change it, purify thyself; and as thou art
thousand-ruble horses, only eighteen were left after the charge.
thousands such as I in Russia.’
thrashing for letting a private traveler have the courier horses.
three beats: “Oh mio crudele affetto.”... One, two, three... one,
Three days later the little princess was buried, and Prince Andrew went
“three,” he went quickly forward, missing the trodden path and
three parts of that army were sharply distinguished: Kutúzov’s
throttle if they stood in my way. I have an adored, a priceless mother,
through, and realized that he could not stop halfway. He was aghast
through the conservatories, the serfs’ quarters, and the outbuildings,
through the door. Prince Andrew got up, went to the door, and tried to
through the naïve and intelligent count and played with him as with
through the smoke. He was pressing one hand to his left side, while
throwing down his chisel. (The wheel continued to revolve by its own
thud of the enemy’s cannon balls, from the flushed and perspiring
thyself whether thou art content with thyself. What hast thou attained
tidiness and good management. Some domestic serfs Pierre met, in reply
Tíkhon did not hear the slightest sound from the study after that.
Tíkhon knew his master’s habit of sometimes thinking aloud, and
Tíkhon, like all good valets, instinctively knew the direction of his
Tíkhon to ask Mary Bogdánovna what news.—“Say only that ‘the
Tíkhon went and told the prince.
till he began sincerely to believe in his own exceptional kindness and
till its coat shone like satin and every hair of its wetted mane lay
till May, and asked him to be more economical this time. Nicholas had
Till midday on the nineteenth, the activity—the eager talk, running to
till now. But where am I?”
till ten o’clock.
till then, had listened with an amused smile to their conversation and
till then. Their powers of reasoning, feeling, and observing immediately
Till the Tsar reached it, each regiment in its silence and immobility
    * Till tomorrow, my dear fellow.
time!”
time.
time for that sort of thing and a young man fears to bind himself and
time, muttering to herself.
time. No, I’ll tell you now. You know Sónya’s my dearest friend.
times before: how the late princess had given birth to Princess Mary
time since his return that they had talked alone and about their love.
time that evening, vainly expecting someone, now smiling at someone, now
time till they came to Moscow had not left them for a day.
time to get his uniform. He had on a shabby cadet jacket, decorated with
timidly from behind the backs of the generals. As he stepped past the
timidly to the corner where Denísov sat. She saw that everybody was
Timókhin, armed only with a sword, had rushed at the enemy with such
tiny limbs she had felt twenty years ago within her, that son about whom
tiptoe to the countess’ door and paused.
tired of being run after by women, his vanity was flattered by the
“Tit! I say, Tit!” said the groom.
to above the knee. Pierre hurriedly began taking off his right boot also
to all the club members and to all the club guests, and finally to
toast, the count took out his handkerchief and, covering his face, wept
to attain it quickly. Hence we have a secondary aim, that of preparing
to attend to the business himself and so he disliked it and only tried
to Bagratión which the old countess at Anna Mikháylovna’s advice had
to bear the looks turned upon her, ran away into the dancing hall,
to be heard.
to be his old schoolroom, and looking into Natásha’s wildly bright
to be opened. Everywhere he saw the stewards’ accounts, according to
to be reserved because in the depth of my soul I feel too near to him
to be severe, found nothing to say; the others did not venture to
to be silent. But after a while, just as a jury comes out of its room,
to build a new chantry to the church at their own expense in honor
to change his former way of life, but his strength failed him. He walked
to cheer the men but merely carried out the orders), yet the troops
“To combat the evil which sways the world...” Pierre repeated, and a
to continue his military service, and when the war recommenced
to control her joy which expressed itself by laughter.
to Count T., Prince V., and others. Then he bursts into one of his wild
to credit it, bent his head, and told Túshin that he could go. Prince
to cross the ditch on foot. The Emperor, wishing to rest and feeling
to cruel with his subordinates, and went into everything down to the
today for the Emperor.” Dolgorúkov smiled significantly.
today or tomorrow—at any rate, in an instant as compared with
Today was a great day for him—the anniversary of his coronation.
today?” was his first thought. “And I did not know this suffering
to demonstrate the defects of the latter and the merits of his own plan,
to do it?”—“Because you married her,” answered an inner voice.
to do it that it seemed to him as if it had really happened. Perhaps
to do what was for him the most difficult thing in life—to say an
to do with Sergéy Kuzmích—a smile of bashfulness at their own
to each couple of acres. The wounded crept together in twos and threes
to enter into conversation with this old man, but, submitting to him
to enter the Brotherhood of Freemasons under my sponsorship?”
to everyone. Pierre was so used to that smile, and it had so little
to express our sincere views on that subject, and can only say to the
to fight a battle ‘on his own hand’ as the Germans say. He does so.
to fire and sword. The inhabitants are totally ruined, the hospitals
together.”
together, and made some steps on the very tips of her toes.
together? And there! Bezúkhov got off scotfree, while Fédya had to
together, thundered on the right and in the center, while the capotes
to get more money from the traveler.
to give her friend the pleasure of dandling the little angel—as she
to give in money and work all that other people’s serfs gave—that is
to have any children by me.”
to hear the voices of well-known men. The largest circles formed round
to her.
to her and kissed her warmly. Anatole went up to kiss the little
to her, and now that Anatole had appeared it just grouped itself around
to her but to the movements of Mademoiselle Bourienne’s little
to hers. A woman came from the bedroom with a frightened face and became
to herself: “No, I must be mistaken, he must be feeling happy, just as
to her shortsighted eyes. Turning from Princess Mary he went up and
to him and disputed with one another who should bring him his tea,
to him. Availing himself of his friendly relations with Pierre as a boon
to him by the officers, and, like a man desperately insisting on having
to him. He could not tell them simply that everyone went at a trot and
to him: “I hear you are refitting your Petersburg house?”
to himself, but which formed the whole interest of his life,
to him senseless, he understood and was not surprised at it.
to him. We search, but none are to be found. The field marshal grows
to his estates and quite recovered the philanthropic mood in which
to his horse’s mane and pulled up beside the hussar. He was succumbing
to his study with the wet nurse and little Prince Nicholas (as his
to hope from him—especially as he did not know how, and did not
to imbibe,” he said. “Can I receive that pure liquid into an impure
    * To indicate he did not want more tea.
to inquiries as to where the prince lived, pointed out a small newly
to irresistible, youthful, childish drowsiness. “But what was I
to it were his inertia and a wrinkle on his brow indicating prolonged
to know?” she asked sternly.
to know what is right and what is wrong. Men always did and always will
told him that he should try to do nothing to stain the whiteness of that
told him to expect.
told them all that.
told you, but you would not believe it,” she said triumphantly. “He
told you it would not be enough. How much?”
to leave that seclusion where they three were shut off from all the
To live for myself avoiding those two evils is my whole philosophy
to make reflections or think aloud in her company, and she had always
tomb of the little princess, and in this chapel was a marble monument
to me after the review and we will do what is possible.”
to Milorádovich who was near him.
tomorrow.”
tomorrow... in the evening. You must come.... Come!”
tomorrow! Only let me tell you, I want to know my son-in-law better. You
tomorrow,” or, “Be in to dinner or I shall not see you,” or, “I
“Tomorrow our squadron is to be in reserve. May I ask to be attached
“Tomorrow,” replied Rostóv and left the room.
“Tomorrow very likely I may be sent with some message to the
to my bivouac; let my doctor, Larrey, examine their wounds. Au revoir,
to my sister today. I will introduce you to her. But of course you know
tonight to my friends—come to the English Hotel.
too.
to offer their services. Most of those present were elderly, respected
took her hand and begged her forgiveness, without knowing what for.
took to be the enemy. Shots could be heard, but some way off.
to Olmütz, dined there, drank a bottle of wine, and then set off alone
to one side he gracefully held a gold lorgnette to his eyes and looked
to Pierre. He spoke in French. “I only know two very real evils in
to pretend to the steward that he was attending to it. The steward
to raise... happens to everybody! Yes, who has not done it?”
to read and write by the deacon, like your father and me. Now tell me,
to remain for a few weeks longer in the house she so loved and where
to remain so for a hundred years; but the moment comes when the lever
to restrain his laughter.
to right and left of him soldiers continually groaned and dropped. But
to Rostóv and involuntarily riveted his attention, made a gesture of
to Rostóv when the animal was handed over to the hussar.
Torzhók embroidery came into the room offering their services.
Torzhók post station, either there were no horses or the postmaster
to say: “Ah, what have you done to me, and why?” And at the sight
to say, all that could be got out of them.
to say and as if she were saying it to someone else, with whom joking
to say more in the presence of a stranger.
To say “tomorrow” and keep up a dignified tone was not difficult,
to set the serfs to work. Say that everything out of the hothouses must
to settle here altogether next year....”
to shout: “Blackguards!... Throw the snow back on the road!” did not
to show her fear of Anna Pávlovna. She looked at her niece, as if
to snatch from the other a boot they were both holding on to.
to snatch it from one another. The expression on all their faces
to sob aloud.
to state his views plainly to the Emperor? Is it possible that on
to stimulate his emotions he looked around. “God, death, love, the
to subscribe all he had, but fearing that it might look like pride
to sympathize in any way.
totally altered and unexpectedly rapturous and tender expression on
total of his losses on it, then he looked round for aid from the other
to the Austrian Emperor and smiled.
to the Emperor shocked Rostóv. Rostóv saw how the Emperor’s rather
to the Emperors with a salute. His whole appearance and manner were
to the first squadron?”
to the French sword and pouch. “I have taken an officer prisoner. I
to the general commanding that left flank with orders to retreat
to the godmother, Princess Mary. Prince Andrew sat in another room,
to the Guards’ camp to find his old playmate. Rostóv had not yet had
“To the Head of the French Government... Au chef du gouvernement
“To the health of our Sovereign, the Emperor!” he cried, and at the
to the hussar beside him.
To the left down below in the mist, the musketry fire of unseen forces
to the maid, “bring the princess her gray dress, and you’ll see,
to them are the parts of the mechanism which the impulse has not yet
to the old conditions of life, Nicholas found it very pleasant to be
to the princess.
to the removal of the guns.
to the review, reaching the field at Olmütz by ten o’clock.
to the rules of his art, as he collected the tickets from all his
to the Tsar or to Kutúzov, even if they were alive and unwounded?
to the unknown place where he was going, many more of our men were going
to the views of the old generals Kutúzov and Prince Schwartzenberg, it
To this chit of a girl, Natásha, who not so long ago was playing with
to those who knew the indubitable truth.) He forgot what the seventh
“To try his luck or the certainty?” Rostóv asked himself.
to turn away when the old man, opening his eyes, fixed his steady and
to Túshin’s battery had been moved away in the middle of the action
touched Pierre: he looked at Hélène and she too seemed disconcerted,
touching Bonaparte’s.
touching his horse and turning purple in the face. “Vill you be so
touching thanks of deputations of serfs in their full-skirted blue
touch with it, and looked around bewildered and unable to grasp what was
to us.”
to walk up and down before it.
toward Anna Pávlovna, and Anna Pávlovna, with the same sad smile with
Toward evening Dolgorúkov came back, went straight to the Tsar, and
Toward evening he ceased moaning and became quite still. He did not know
toward him and said something.
Toward the end of 1806, when all the sad details of Napoleon’s
toward the vanguard. Before he came up with the hussars, several
toward those Pratzen Heights which were being more and more denuded by
to. Weyrother had been twice that evening to the enemy’s picket
to Weyrother sat Count Langeron who, with a subtle smile that never left
to what he must do and how he should answer, Willarski only replied that
to which Pierre did not agree. On the other hand, Pierre demanded that
“To your barrier!” and Pierre, grasping what was meant, stopped by
to you. Where are you traveling from?”
traditions of unlimited power, in time when they grow more irritable,
trampling through the deep snow, and muttering incoherent words:
transit gloria mundi.”
transparently radiant with impulsive joy.
traveler, also detained for lack of horses.
traveler, having packed his things with his practiced hands, began
treated them with absent-minded contempt.
tried to conceal them.
tried to pretend not to know; no one spoke of it, but apart from the
tried with his lips whether the child was still feverish. The soft
trifle to let a wagon go past. After he had gone, two soldiers rushed to
trigger, as he had not before held a pistol in his hand—a fact that he
tripping rapidly across in her little shoes trimmed with bows, ran
triumph.
triumph.
triumphantly secured the mop and still did not realize what awaited him,
   Triumph, valiant Russians, now!...
troops had already entered Prussia and our second war with Napoleon
troops, he saw, near a kitchen garden with a ditch round it, two men
troops were moving in the distance, and he listened to the sounds of
troops were no longer moving, but stood with the butts of their muskets
trouble, and silently fixed his eyes on Bagratión as a schoolboy who
trouble, but the Mason told him that was not necessary and gave him
trowel, a rough stone and a squared stone, a pillar, three windows, and
trowel, he told him to toil with it to cleanse his own heart from vice,
true, or might at least seem to be true had it not referred to his wife.
trumpets of the first cavalry regiment played the general march. It
trusts to luck, one should make certain,’ and I want to try.”
trying in vain to find the answer to some question.
trying” (Pierre’s modesty made him correct himself) “to live for
try to do all I can for your happiness.”
Tsar and the country? It is wartime. Such a fine fellow must serve.
Tsar, who still remained in the same attitude of indecision.
tucked up, without a coat, pale and with a trembling jaw, came out
Tuesday.
tuft of plumes in his cocked hat worn on one side with its corners front
tumbler with tea for himself and one for the beardless old man to whom
turn away from the sight, shouting angrily at the men who, as is always
turned away and went down the side of the corridor.
turning for a moment to the front line, and slightly swinging his arms,
Turning the horse sharply, he again jumped the ditch, and deferentially
turning to Anatole, “come here, let us talk and get acquainted.”
turning to Prince Vasíli and answering his imploring look. “Yes, or
turn into vexation and anger at the stupid arrangements and at the
“Turn this way!” he shouted, jumping over the ice which creaked
Túshin.
Túshin did not say that there were no covering troops, though that
Túshin rose and, buttoning his greatcoat and pulling it straight,
Túshin’s battery but had never reached it. Interrupting one
Túshin’s battery had been forgotten and only at the very end of the
Túshin’s large, kind, intelligent eyes were fixed with sympathy and
Túshin’s wattle shed was laid, with a bullet in his stomach, on
Túshin told them to give the man some water. Then a cheerful soldier
Túshin turned round in dismay. It was the staff officer who had turned
twelve men in garments like those he had already seen. Some of them
twenty men were gathered round a table at which Dólokhov sat between
twisted upwards, sat the ruddy Milorádovich in a military pose, his
two Alexanders—Bekleshëv and Narýshkin—which was a significant
two candles. On the table was a pile of gold and paper money, and he
two Cossacks.
two friends, one of whom was a dashing hussar and the other a notorious
Two hours later Prince Andrew, stepping softly, went into his father’s
Two months had elapsed since the news of the battle of Austerlitz and
two seconds. Whether or no the Emperor understood what was going on in
twot fo’ward!”
two thousand rubles, and though he always disliked speaking of money
two, three... One... “Oh mio crudele affetto.”... One, two, three...
two years, and he did not know how the rest, about 100,000 rubles, was
unable to realize where he was.
unable to withstand it now, but he also felt that on what he said now
unappreciated bliss, long past. He could not conceive that a stupid
unbroken and had all day beaten back an enemy force twice as numerous
unconciousness and oblivion which in the opinion of Napoleon’s doctor,
unconsciously and quite forgetting her condition, prepared for the
under fire for the first time.
under him; “turn this way!” he shouted to those with the gun. “It
under his weight alone. The men looked at him and pressed to the
under one command, and in a like order.
understand, agitated her. She said nothing but looked about uneasily as
understand, and the greatness of something incomprehensible but
understand how one can live with such ideas. I had such moments
understanding half of it, read only to forget, if but for a moment, what
understanding of his employer’s happiness.
understand it’!... And I ask you!”
understand it so differently. He collected all his strength, to stir and
understand. She kissed his rough curly black head. At this instant, they
understand. That’s what I’m up to.”
understand what was being read. He managed to follow only the last words
understood her and made up my mind what she really is. Was I mistaken
understood, that he could not answer him.
understood that this woman might belong to him.
understood what was happening as little as he did.
under the shirt sleeves, those hands which he loved and hated, held him
under the table.
under which she felt that she could not think, but would only be able to
unexpectedly through his mind.
unexpectedly to go into action. Rostóv without hearing Borís to the
unfinished bit of nibbled sugar, and asked if anything more would be
unfortunate, a stranger, alone, helpless! And, oh God, how passionately
unfriendly now became gentle and affectionate. The angry eldest
ungainly Russian princesses, would fall in love with her and carry her
uniformed Austrian officer.
uniforms, mounted on black horses, trotting straight toward him and
uniforms, with smartly dressed bandsmen in front mounted on black, roan,
unintentionally, he poured too many drops into the glass. He threw the
universe, and of the courage with which he should endure toils and
unlike the old one, he expected everything to be unusual, even more
unlucky at cards.’ Your cousin is in love with you, I know.”
unmarried, and even the happier for it?” So thought Prince Bolkónski
unmask his deceivers!” And in order to realize vividly his love
unmelted snow, or some white houses? He even thought something moved on
unnatural smile. “I expect you have guessed that Prince Vasíli has
unnatural way, he stretched out his hand for Alpátych to kiss, and then
unpleasantly excited expression.
unpleasant thing to a man’s face, to say what the other, whoever
unusual than what he was seeing. A skull, a coffin, the Gospel—it
unwell, sat down under an apple tree and von Toll remained beside him.
unwell today? Eh? Afraid of the ‘minister’ as that idiot Alpátych
unwounded—it was they who were crushing, weighing down, and twisting
up against him. He wrote “800 rubles” on a card, but while the
up a glass and a pipe that were handed him.
up at all!”
up, invited him to his house in Petersburg, and now... she has come here
up like a fool!” he thought, looking irritably at her. “She is
upon and could not now be altered. “We start tomorrow and I’m giving
upon him, passed splendidly, lifting his feet with a high and graceful
upon Prince Andrew, who was beside him. Seeing him, Kutúzov’s
up on the vast field. The whole army was extended in three lines: the
up out of the mist.
up the steps to where the coffin stood, to give her the farewell kiss.
up tomorrow. But you will see everything for yourself when you get to
up to the altar, placed his feet at right angles, and bade him lie down,
up to the appearance of the pauvre mère; they understood that they had
up to Túshin.
upwards, in the way affected by the Emperor Alexander, and, having
urged on his already weary horse to get quickly past these crowds, but
us aides-de-camp and adjutants! But this is what we’ll do: I have
us but within....”
used for dancing, but in which five beds now stood, and furniture of
used to like to spend them, or to open his mind by intimate talks with
used to show at catchplay, now and then turning his good-natured, pale,
use of whatever interest he had to offer. He himself carefully scanned
usually so described.
us. Well, you want an argument,” he added, “come on then.”
us—we scuttle. He hardly crosses the river to our side before we
utter a sound. He feebly moved his leg and uttered a weak, sickly groan
uttering a gentle, piteous, and childlike moan.
Uvárov, who had arrived with him, paused at the doorway to allow him,
vainly trying to master her agitation.
valet can go in your carriage. Ah! I was nearly forgetting,” he added.
valet had set down the coffee things and left the room. Pierre looked
valor carry disorder and confusion into the enemy’s ranks, but should
value this mystic power and glory that is floating here above me in this
Valúev was confidentially telling that Uvárov had been sent from
vanguard, rewards were promised, and the men received a double ration of
various figures worked upon it, at the other was something resembling an
various kinds: a table, chairs, and a clavichord. One adjutant, nearest
varying expression and the same prevalent appearance of goodhearted
Vasíli and his son.
“Vasíli Denísov, your son’s friend,” he said, introducing
“Vasíli Dmítrich, I’m so sorry for you!... No, but you are so
“Vasíli Dmítrich, I thank you for the honor,” she said, with an
Vasíli had only acquired by imitating other parents.
Vasíli. “I know something about that. Don’t I? And you are still so
Vasíli, in the rare moments when he was at home, would take Pierre’s
Vasíli one day, closing his eyes and fingering Pierre’s elbow,
Vasíli’s house in the company of the stout princess, his wife, and
Vasíli’s tone of careless self-assurance that he felt he would be
Vasíli to himself, with a sorrowful sigh, one morning, feeling that
velvety softness, which so mingled with her lack of art in singing that
Véra’s remark was correct, as her remarks always were, but, like
verses called “Enchantress,” which he had composed, and to which he
“Very.”
very briefly and vaguely, that after brilliant engagements the Russians
very fields where the French had now to be fought; the adjacent
Very fine!”
very glad to see him hanged, but I was sorry for my father—that again
“Very good!” said the prince closing the door behind him, and
“Very good, very good,” said Bagratión. “Thank you, officer.”
very important personage, had been sent on a very important mission to
very likely be getting a letter from him that day. Each time that these
very much! I have promised myself not to serve again in the active
“Very much,” said Nicholas flushing, and with a stupid careless
very pretty and sweet, and evidently deeply in love with him, but he was
“Very well,” said Smolyanínov, and went on at once: “Have you any
“Very well, then, be so good as to wait,” said Prince Andrew to the
vessel and judge of its purity? Only by the inner purification of myself
vicious and unfortunate people whom he would assist by word and deed,
victory, and General Bennigsen, hoping to receive from Petersburg the
victory be in doubt, even for a moment, you will see your Emperor
victory or defeat, the glory of our Russian arms is secure. Except your
victory over Buonaparte at Eylau. In Petersburg everyone is rejoicing,
victory which was conveyed, not only by the tales of those who had taken
“Vienna considers the bases of the proposed treaty so unattainable
view they were right, as were those too who canonized him and died a
village and had already been sent for.
village!” he said angrily to a general who had ridden up. “Don’t
village of Pratzen. But neither they nor a single commanding officer
villages were in a state of the greatest poverty. He did not know that
village. Tell it to stop and await my orders.”
virtue was and could not recall it.
virtuous future that seemed to him so easy. It seemed to him that he had
virtuous life of which he had been dreaming since he met Joseph
vish to destroy my men for your pleasure!”
visible in the snow and a shovel had been left sticking in one of the
visible through the smoke, make out moving masses of infantry and narrow
visit his neglected estates at the same time and pick up his son Anatole
visiting all the places he meant to go to and where he had been invited,
visitors. There was the fact that only those came who wished to dance
vocation is to be happy with another kind of happiness, the happiness
vodka—get on!” Rostóv shouted, when the sleigh was only three
vodka. The campfires crackled and the soldiers’ songs resounded
voice.
voice, “but believe me, I so adore your daughter and all your family
voice calling him by name.
voice from heaven. How gladly would he have died at once for his Tsar!
voice, obviously so elated by the sound of firing, by the prospect of
voice, popped her head in at the door.
voices.
voices, and the army swayed and started in one enormous mass six miles
voices subsided, the footmen cleared away the broken glass and everybody
voice. To fresh questions as to the firmness of his resolution Pierre
voice trembled.) “I loved your father... and she will make you a good
voice, with its incorrect breathing and labored transitions, was
voice, “you were pleased to send me to Captain Túshin’s battery. I
von Bergs—have been knights!”
voulu, George Dandin,’ that’s all we have to say about it!”
vous aime’?” he kept repeating to himself. And when he had said it
vulgarity of the expressions that were natural to her, though she had
Vyazmítinov, the new military governor general of Petersburg, had
“Wait a bit, I have something in view for you this evening.”
waited for him to go on, but as he seemed quite decided to say no more
waited impatiently for Prince Andrew’s return from the commander in
waiter filled his glass he changed his mind and altered it to his usual
waiting for a seven to turn up, gazed at Dólokhov’s hands which held
waiting for him to say a word and cross a certain line, and he knew that
waiting for the beat. Only on horse back and in the mazurka was
waiting to hear whether he would say anything more. But Kutúzov, with
“Waiting, Your Majesty,” repeated Kutúzov. (Prince Andrew noted
wait only two hours, when, come what might, he would let his excellency
waken...” All rose and cried “Hurrah!” Bagratión also rose and
wake up, Váska!” he went on, turning to Denísov, whose head
walked away from the fire.
walked slowly without raising his pistol, looking intently with his
wall. On this knoll there was a white patch that Rostóv could not at
wanted.
wanted to show him that his losses were an achievement that made her
wanted to sleep. The gay triumphant shouting of the enemy army had a
want that. And besides, what a notion that medicine ever cured anyone!
want the money for? As if that money could add a hair’s breadth to
want to, but now I have no time.” Besides, it seemed to him that the
war came contradictory news, false as usual and therefore variously
wardrobe in which Pierre noticed garments such as he had never seen
wares, especially a pair of goatskin slippers. “I have hundreds of
warm themselves, gathering round the fires throwing into the flames the
warrior doing some kind of man’s work of his own, without help or
was about to be decided. But Prince Andrew did not see how it ended. It
was about to cross the space between the barriers, when Dólokhov cried:
was about to expand her dresses into a balloon and sit down. They were
was abroad; so Pierre had not the opportunity to spend his nights as he
was again nodding. “Come, get on! You shall have three rubles for
was a great success. There were many pretty girls and the Rostóv girls
was all over; but he said in an indifferent tone:
was already perfectly cured of his former faults and was ready for all
was also a yellow, wrinkled old man, without beard or mustache,
was always busy and always felt in a state of mild and cheerful
was a unique chance to show his devotion to the Emperor and he had not
was baptized. The wet nurse supported the coverlet with her chin, while
was beginning, Anna Pávlovna gave one of her soirees. The “cream of
was being done was not his adjutant’s fault, and still not answering
was being held by the arms and his horse was being led behind him.
was Borís Drubetskóy, who had just arrived as a special messenger from
was bright, he had a good horse under him, and his heart was full of
was charmant. Even if Anna Pávlovna did not say so, he could see that
was delighted with Denísov’s skill, he was asked again and again as
was downstairs.
was ecstatically conscious of his approach. He felt it not only from the
was evidently one, Rostóv felt confused, blushed, and became silent.
was excellent. With the second course, a gigantic sterlet (at sight of
was for earthly love. The more she tried to hide this feeling from
was forgetting. We must have another entrée. Ah, goodness gracious!”
was, for something could be descried. On the right the Guards were
was fought.
was going home to Vorónezh and Rostóv persuaded him to travel with him
was growing dusk. On the narrow Augesd Dam where for so many years the
was heartily sick of them. In spite of this, or rather because of
was immediately killed. Prince Andrew again seized the standard and,
was impossible for cavalry to act among the bushes and broken ground,
was in a white uniform rode a black one. These were the two Emperors
was in his place, waiting.
was in raptures about him, when he had just returned from abroad, and
was in the right so I kept silent; was not that best, Count?... ‘Hey,
was keeping the bank. Rostóv had not seen him since his proposal and
was large and of an old pattern. The French swarming round their guns
was laughing at something, mingled in a merry sound, like the chirping
was lost. No one whom Rostóv asked could tell him where the Emperor
was lying asleep on the ottoman with an open book in his hand.
was mentioned and, pointing to his forehead, remarked:
was merely a man of the world who had got on and to whom getting on had
was more important than verses, and Bagratión, again preceding all the
was Napoleon—his hero—but at that moment Napoleon seemed to him
was not behaving very well in this matter. “Youth, frivolity... well,
was nothing. So why should I not stay at his house? Then I played cards
was not in love with anyone in particular, but with everyone. Whatever
was. Now he excused himself for having been taken prisoner and now,
wasn’t it?”
was often on Dólokhov’s face when looking at him. “Yes, he is a
was on duty and that he should go through the door on the left into the
was out of the question, “I am in love with your brother once for all
was pale, his blue eyes looked impudently into the commander’s face,
was perfectly true. He was afraid of getting some other officer into
was repeatedly summoned to see him. At headquarters and among the troops
was said.
was serving, and a misunderstanding arose. The two commanders were much
was silenced at once. They looked at the beautiful, large, thoughtful
was silent with his steward, the gardener, and the architect, and though
was sitting at a small table, chattering with Másha, her maid. She grew
was sitting at the head of the table. On either side of her sat the
was sitting beside him, by the hand. Rostóv was struck by the
was sitting. The curtains were drawn, and a single candle was burning on
was so close to him that his shortsighted eyes could not but perceive
was something black, now little lights seemed to glimmer where the enemy
was struck by the change in him. His words were kindly and there was a
was taken up with dinners and balls and was spent chiefly at Prince
was talked of. For the Rostóv family the whole interest of these
was the count at last handed a letter addressed in his son’s
was the Emperors’ suites. The Emperors rode up to the flank, and the
was the little princess, these tears, the cause of which she did not
was the name his fancy gave to the farthest gun of the battery, which
was thinking of. Yes, Na-tásha, sabretache, oh, yes, yes! That’s
was told that the prince had gone to the nursery.
was too far separated from our right flank and the cavalry were all
was trying to fit music:
was warm blood under his arm. “No, I am wounded and the horse is
watchword—shaft, Olmütz. What a nuisance that our squadron will be in
water.
water cart, painted green, stood in a shed; the paths were straight,
way and attaching him to himself! What if he gave me a place near him?
way, dear boy! Make way, make way!” pushed through the crowd more
way in which he danced the mazurka, Nicholas ran up to Natásha:
way of these men, and he would have got clear had they continued at the
way,” said an officer.
way through the crowd, went out of the drawing room and reappeared a
way, with Berg who was already in command of a company. Berg, who had
weakness—the one to which he had confessed when admitted to the
“We are enjoying ourselves! Vasíli Dmítrich is staying a day longer
“We are not fighting pour le Roi de Prusse, but for right principles.
“We are such friends, such friends! All that ruler business was just
weariness and assurance, as if he were adding every time: “You know
wearing long dresses for the first time. With scarcely any exceptions
wearing scarves and all their decorations, not only the elegant, pomaded
wearing the Cross of St. George, awarded to soldiers for bravery in
weary, and distracted air, though at the same time he was haughty and
we begin a very original and interesting series of maneuvers. Our aim is
we can know is that we know nothing. And that’s the height of human
“We can’t have less—yes, three... the mayonnaise, that’s one,”
we could not think how to address the reply! If not as ‘Consul’
Wednesday’s meeting of the Imperial Council, at which Sergéy Kuzmích
“We drove them back!” said Borís with animation, growing talkative.
weeks, and months of his life passed in as great a rush and were as much
weep without knowing why—rode behind on his artillery nag. Though
“We had better separate,” he muttered in a broken voice.
we hear is true, it is dreadful. How little we dreamed of such a thing
We knew you’d say so. But it won’t do, because you see, if you say
“Well, all right, all right.”
“Well, all the same, you must refuse him.”
“Well, and are you still true to Borís?” he continued.
“Well, and is that all?” he asked.
“Well, and so he never got farther than: ‘Sergéy Kuzmích’?”
“Well and then?” asked the other voice. “If before that you are
“Well, and you? What are your plans?”
“Well, and you, young man,” said he. “How do you feel, mon
Well, are you off to the front?”
well, as all the connoisseurs who heard her said: “It is not trained,
“Well, as you see. So far everything’s all right, but I confess I
“Well begin!” said Dólokhov.
well-brushed clothes. There was a masculine odor and a smell of tobacco.
“Well, do you think I shall prevent her, that I can’t part from
well for you,” said Natásha, with a responsive smile. “You should
“Well, go and see,” he said, after a pause.
“Well—had a good time?” said the old count, smiling gaily and
“Well, have you sent Gabriel for some wine? All right let’s have
“Well?” he asked.
“Well, how are you going to get out of that?” he remarked.
“Well? How do you feel?” he asked.
“Well! How d’ye do? How d’ye do? Glad to see you!”
“Well, how d’you do, my dear fellow?” said Dolgorúkov, who was
“Well, I did not expect you, I am very glad,” said Prince Andrew.
“Well, I don’t know about that, but I am uncomfortable with him. And
“Well, I don’t know. It’s awkward and would make me ashamed.”
well I will give you my hand to kiss. Not till then!” she said. And
“Well, I will leave you in your little corner,” came Anna
“Well, I will read them, then!” Bagratión seemed to say, and,
“Well, Lëlya?” he asked, turning instantly to his daughter and
well-lit anteroom where they took off their cloaks without the aid of
“We’ll manage very well without a doctor.”
“Well, my dear boy, I hear you’ve been educated abroad, not taught
“Well, my dear fellow, so you still want to be an adjutant? I have
“Well, my dear fellow, tomorrow we are off at last,” said Prince
“Well, now to the health of handsome women!” said Dólokhov, and
“Well, now we’ll arrange something quite simple and becoming,” she
well remembered that seven afterwards. He laid down the seven of hearts,
“Well?” returned the old man.
“Well!...” said the old count, spreading out his arms and sinking
“Well, send for him... and how do you get on with that German?”
we’ll set off.”
“Well, she loves me and you like that.”
“Well, so that’s finished, my dear fellow! I am very glad to have
“Well, the Lord be thanked, Princess,” said Mary Bogdánovna, not
“Well then, accept his offer. It’s high time for you to be
“Well then, be quick. We’ll all have breakfast together.”
“Well then, mind and have cocks’ comb in the turtle soup, you
“Well then,” Prince Andrew answered himself, “I don’t know
“Well then, tell him so.”
“Well then, that’s excellent,” said he. “We’ll talk it over
“Well then, till tomorrow at Sokólniki,” said Dólokhov, as he took
“Well then, what do you want? You’re all in love nowadays. Well,
“Well, there you see!”
“Well, they’ve sent you a tidy sum,” said Berg, eying the heavy
“Well, till we meet again...” he said, holding out his hand to
“We’ll try to,” replied Berg, touching a pawn and then removing
“Well, what is it?” came a sharp, unpleasant voice.
“Well, what’s this now? What have you been up to now, I should like
“Well, what then?”
“Well, won’t you go on? I had a splendid card all ready,” as if it
“Well, you’d better not play,” Dólokhov added, and springing a
“Well, you see, I’ll tell you the whole secret of dueling in two
“We must distinguish between the Vienna cabinet and the Emperor of
we? No?”
went about the rooms fashionably dressed but looking sad and dull. Here,
went by. Then suddenly a terrible shriek—it could not be hers, she
went on, with a somber and scornful smile. “And thou art more foolish
went out after shaking hands with Dolgorúkov and Bilíbin.
went out of the hut in which he was billeted with Nesvítski and began
went there and found two thirds of the men and horses knocked out, two
went to her father’s room at the usual hour, Mademoiselle Bourienne
wept. She saw her brother now as he had been at the moment when he took
were all a pretense, and that the whole attention of that company was
were all hugging him, and the serfs, men and maids, flocked into the
were already up and astir. The smoke of the campfires, into which they
were also distinguished by the fact that she always presented some new
were among the prettiest. They were both particularly happy and gay.
were bringing in jugs and basins, hot water for shaving, and their
were casual guests—chiefly young men, among whom were Denísov,
were concentrated. Twice they had attempted to attack this point, but on
were constantly shaping themselves in his mind, arising from the
were descending. In front in the fog a shot was heard and then another,
were flocking in to look at him. Prince Bagratión was thanking the
were in a hurry to show the changes that had taken place in them.
were in them. She leaned over to her brother and kissed him, slightly
were leaving to join their regiment after Epiphany. About twenty people
were lips seeking a kiss.
were moving in and out among the Russian troops and served as heralds
were moving in the same direction. Every soldier felt glad to know that
were not to be overburdened with labor, women while nursing their babies
were not to be sent to work, assistance was to be given to the serfs,
were passing by. From one of the drivers he learned that Kutúzov’s
were present, including Dólokhov and Denísov.
were pronounced, Pierre, who had so long been considering his career,
were ready to drop, and so said the grown-up young men and women who
were sent to the crossroads to guide him over the country road with its
were the center of groups which even strangers approached respectfully
were the fun of the game which interested him most.
were there, only disorganized crowds of troops of various kinds. He
were those of the orderlies who were packing up; one voice, probably a
were throwing everything superfluous, made the eyes smart. It was cold
were turned against the ten-gun battery. Túshin’s companion officer
were walking, driving past, and settling down all around. The sound
“We shall probably advance,” replied Bolkónski, evidently reluctant
“We’ve given it ‘em hot, mate! They won’t make another push
“We were ordered to be at the place before nine, but we haven’t got
“we will talk of it later” (and he looked round at Rostóv). “Come
Weyrother.
Weyrother again gave that smile which seemed to say that to him it was
Weyrother, hurriedly rising from his seat and going up to the table on
Weyrother’s had already been approved. As soon as Prince Andrew began
Weyrother’s name, or even the term “dispositions.”
Weyrother, who was in full control of the proposed battle, by his
What a heart!”
“What? A minister? What minister? Who gave orders?” he said in
what am I to do if I love nothing but fame and men’s esteem? Death,
“What?” answered the old man absent-mindedly.
“What are they about?” thought Prince Andrew as he gazed at them.
“What are you about?” shouted Rostóv, looking at him in an ecstasy
“What! Are you going to remain as you are, dear princess?” she
“What, are you wounded, my lad?” said Túshin, approaching the gun
what? A slur on my name? A misfortune for life? Oh, that’s
what a soul there is in Dólokhov, you should see him with his mother.
“What a strange fate, Másha darling!” And having taken off his
what a strange frenzy one experiences during an attack,” Prince
“What a style! How charmingly he describes!” said she, reading the
“What can he say? Tra-di-ri-di-ra and so on... merely to gain time.
“What can it be?” he thought. “The enemy in the rear of our army?
“What delicacy!” thought the princess. “Is it possible that
“What devil brought them here?” thought he, while Tíkhon was
“What did he say? Where to, now? Halt, is it? Did he thank us?” came
what difficulty the father had dragged his legs upstairs while the son
“What division are you?” shouted an adjutant, riding up.
“What does harm to another is wrong,” said Pierre, feeling with
“What does it mean? What is it? Whom are they firing at? Who is
“What does that prove?” he was saying as Rostóv rode up. “They
“What does this mean?” she brought out.
“What do you want, your honor?” asked an artilleryman, standing
“What error or evil can there be in my wishing to do good, and even
“Whatever are you bothering about, gentlemen?” said Bilíbin, who,
“Whatever happens to you,” he said, “you must bear it all manfully
“Whatever the European sovereigns and commanders may do to
what happiness it would be to die—not in saving the Emperor’s life
“What has happened?” he asked himself. “I have killed her lover,
“What have the young people come to nowadays, eh, Feoktíst?” said
“What have they taken a baby in there for?” thought Prince Andrew in
“What?” he answered, not recognizing Borís.
what he should do on his estates.
what he was saying was out of place, tactless and unsuitable, that
what he was to do. The coming of these visitors annoyed him. “What are
what I have seen during these last three months is incredible.
what is going on around them.
“What is it?”
“What is it?” he said crossly, and, his hand shaking
what is it I am attached to, Papa?” said Anatole, turning to his
What is it meant to prove? What? I ask you.”
What is life, and what is death? What power governs all?”
“What is the matter, Mary?”
“What is the matter?” she asked.
“What is the matter with you, my darling? You look pale. Oh, you
   What is this bliss that makes my fingers thrill?
“What is this?” thought Nicholas, listening to her with widely
“What is your conception of Freemasonry?”
“What! It is as if I were glad of a chance to take advantage of
what looked like a squadron of horsemen in various uniforms. Two of them
   What magic power is this recalls me still?
“What nonsense...”
“What nonsense! Much I need it!” said Rostóv, throwing the letter
What Pierre did not know was that the place where they presented him
   What spark has set my inmost soul on fire,
“What’s that? What do you make of it?” said Rostóv to the hussar
“What’s the matter with you? Are you ill?”
“What’s this? Am I falling? My legs are giving way,” thought he,
“What stupid orders! They don’t themselves know what they are
“What’s your name?”
what there is in you.”
what to do with his hands; he was more accustomed to walk over a plowed
“What! To whom?... Nonsense!” cried the count, suddenly reddening
what was going on in the passage. Some women passing with quiet steps in
“What was it?”
what was passing in his mind.
what will happen and don’t want to know, and can’t, but if I want
“What! You don’t remember Borís?” asked Sónya in surprise.
“What you have with you: watch, money, rings....”
wheels and pulleys is merely a slow and regular movement of the
wheels and working the screws himself.
wheel, which merged in her memory with what followed.)
When all was ready, the sabers stuck in the snow to mark the barriers,
“When am I to receive the money, Count?”
When Borís and Anna Pávlovna returned to the others Prince Hippolyte
When Borís, who was to be served up to the guests, entered the drawing
whence—a stern note of which all are conscious sounds in the moral
“When did you get the letter? Was it from Olmütz?” repeated
When everybody rose to go, Hélène who had spoken very little all
when footsteps or voices were heard did they look at one another, the
When Germans start being accurate, there’s no end to it!”
When he came level with the Foot Guards he noticed that about them and
When he entered, Prince Andrew, his eyes drooping contemptuously (with
when he first loved her. He thought of her pregnancy and felt sorry for
When he got home he could not sleep for a long time for thinking of what
When he had become a little quieter, he explained to Rostóv that he was
When he had gone less than half a mile in the rear of the column he
When he reached Kiev he sent for all his stewards to the head office
When he read that sentence, Pierre felt for the first time that some
when he stayed in (as he said) for Pierre’s sake, hardly exchanged a
when he was dying of wounds and the sovereign had thanked him for heroic
when he wished to speak contemptuously, and noticing Borís, Prince
when, if you remember, he posed as a sort of Marat at one of my soirees.
“When I saw, your excellency, that their first battalion was
When it came to Natásha’s turn to choose a partner, she rose and,
When Paris was mentioned, Mademoiselle Bourienne for her part seized the
When Princess Mary came down, Prince Vasíli and his son were already
When Princess Mary returned from her father, the little princess sat
When Princess Mary went to him at the usual hour he was working at his
When Prince Vasíli returned to the drawing room, the princess, his
When she looked up at him she was struck by his beauty. Anatole stood
When she saw the count, she stretched out her arms to him, embraced his
when she was not like that and when everything was light and gay. She
When the Emperor had passed nearly all the regiments, the troops began
When the monotonous sound of Weyrother’s voice ceased, Kutúzov opened
When the officers had emptied and smashed their glasses, Kírsten filled
when the princess, as if lost in a fog, had already staggered out of the
When the reading which lasted more than an hour was over, Langeron again
When the review was over, the newly arrived officers, and also
when the subject did not relate to himself, but in connection with the
When the sun had entirely emerged from the fog, and fields and mist were
when they played some tricks on a policeman, didn’t they do it
when they saw his looks.
when we were rejoicing at his happiness! And such a lofty angelic soul
when you began living for others. I experienced just the reverse. I
“When you see my sister, Princess Mary, you’ll get on with her,”
“Where am I? Oh yes, in the skirmishing line... pass and
where a parade does not begin till all the troops are assembled,” said
“Where are you going to now, my dear sir?”
“Where are you off to?” asked Borís.
whereas it was perhaps not known, since the enemy was in movement.
where he could never have expected the enemy to be.
where he was staying, and had been absurd, excited, and foolish in
where his regiment was stationed, and take him to visit Prince Nicholas
“Where is it, that lofty sky that I did not know till now, but saw
“Where is the Emperor? Where is Kutúzov?” Rostóv kept asking
“Where is the princess?” he asked. “Hiding?”
where the clavichord stood.
where the hottest musket fire and cannonade were heard. Suddenly he
where the sleighs had been left, in a small clearing in the pine forest
where to find me, but don’t forget that I do not regard either myself
where Túshin’s guns were stationed was an unharnessed horse with a
“Where would I not go at the countess’ command!” said Denísov,
where you always ran away; you remember cette chère Annette!”
whether he was still firm in his intention and determined to submit to
whether she ought to write, tormented her. Now that he was already an
which an enormous map of the environs of Brünn was spread out.
which aroused his own pity.
which attracted him. He very readily took up Borís’ cause and went
which changed his appearance for the worse. There was something naïvely
which covered with snow, appeared on the landing where the footman
which Denísov followed her.
which Dólokhov’s second had called on him, and, having closed the
which every Freemason should cultivate in himself. These virtues were:
which had been particularly revived and strengthened by his late tour.
which had grown much older.
which he always deceived himself. The question was whether he could ever
which he had come out was thronged with calèches, carriages of all
which he had reckoned up to ten thousand, but that now, as he vaguely
which he had worn on his Italian campaign, sat on his small gray Arab
which held him in their power.... The ten fell to him.
which he presented to Prince Bagratión. On the salver lay some verses
(which he very likely would be), and found the commander in chief
“Which house is it?” asked the driver.
which Ilyá Rostóv blushed with self-conscious pleasure), the footmen
which, in accord with the club custom, he had given up to the hall
which I not only cannot address but which I cannot even express in
which intellectual knowledge is divided. The highest wisdom is one.
which I shall lead the army.”
which is the only thing we need fear, or he is changing his position.”
“Which is the senior?” he asked, on seeing the prisoners.
which it rests and which no human power can destroy, is the preservation
which made a certain sensation, the count exchanged glances with
which Nicholas Rostóv served and which was in Prince Bagratión’s
which Princess Mary meekly submitted, just as her hair had been arranged
which seemed to him dazzlingly red, and at the feeble, round-shouldered
which seemed to rise out of the sea of mist and on which the Russian
which she spoke of her exalted patroness, supported Hélène’s wish.
which the Guards prided themselves), the officers on foot and at their
which the prince had retained for himself.
which the Rostóvs always attended. He was pointedly attentive to Sónya
which the serfs’ manorial labor had been diminished, and heard the
which they were present, and went to Iogel’s balls for young people
which though they embarrassed Pierre awakened a joyful feeling in the
which to reply to Dólokhov’s words. But before he had thought of
which was a lie, and worse than a lie? I am guilty and must endure...
which was not clear to him, to question his chief steward, to visit his
which was presumably somewhere in the same neighborhood. And so it was
which was to be found “the cream of really good society, the bloom
which were to be the first to descend the heights to attack the French
which were uppermost in his mind at that moment, addressed Prince Andrew
(which would be very difficult), he would not be able to get back before
while dressing, and yet the question he was always putting off demanded
While father and son were having their explanation, the mother and
while he tried to prove to Pierre that in his actions there was no
while on the scaffolding, in the midst of a talk explaining the future
while others sought some extraordinary explanation of so strange an
while Prince Andrew on the contrary, taking no part in the war and
While Prince Andrew went to report about the purple-faced general, that
While Rostóv was thus arguing with himself and riding sadly away,
While the guests were taking their leave Pierre remained for a long time
while under the supervision of the countess and the solicitude of the
while we, on the other hand, with our left wing by far outflank his
whirled round it at full speed with her dress puffed out like a balloon,
whispered to him. “This happiness is for those who have not in them
whisper, “has compromised her completely, they say. Pierre took him
white Cossack coat, and bring him along to me.”
white hands with an air of calm importance.
white plumes in his hat rode a bobtailed chestnut horse, the other who
white ruffle, outlining his rather long face which was lit up from
“Who?”
who appeared at his call. “Hurry off and tell Maksím, the gardener,
“Who are they? Why are they here? What do they want? And when will
“Who are you talking about?”
“Who?” asked Rostóv.
who at the front had the power to annihilate him, a lieutenant of the
who at the Rostóvs’ had jocularly assumed the role of Natásha’s
“Who can tell, your honor?” replied the hussar reluctantly.
who could therefore be of use to him. He liked Petersburg and despised
who—dreading this love affair which might hinder Nicholas from making
whoever he may be, exhort him who goeth astray, raise him that falleth,
who had come into the room unnoticed by anyone, stood there and wiped
who had come up to the cot with noiseless steps, lifted the curtain,
who had marched so gaily and complacently. But at the moment the first
who had recently opened a restaurant there with girls as waitresses.
who had sheltered in the village houses. They all rushed out of
who had stolen some boots from the recruits; I should even have been
who have striven to attain this mystery, and thereby to render them
“Who is it you want?” he asked. “The commander in chief? He was
“Who? Kutúzov?” asked Rostóv.
who lays back her ears and continues to crouch motionless before her
whole army it is still uncertain whether he is alive or not. I comfort
whole mass of men was concentrated.
who made her a low bow when she met him in the corridor carrying hot
who met him with the cross oppressed the peasants by his exactions, and
whom he now found nothing in common. “We will go after dinner. And
whom should I say that? Either to a Power indefinable, incomprehensible,
who recognized him and said a few words to him, disjointed and awkward,
who remained behind, and the monotonous tramp of thousands of feet
who’s a better man than you in every way...”
whose state of unconquerable childish embarrassment now changing to
whose words struck Pierre more and more by their precision and firmness.
“Who’s that? Why? Wait a moment!” Anatole’s face seemed to say.
“Who the devil has put the logs on the road?” snarled he.
who was associated by memories of the Italian campaign with the name of
who was in a high fever. These last days, mistrusting their household
who was passing:
who was reduced to the ranks, took a French officer prisoner in my
who was sitting silently beside him, what he thought of tomorrow’s
“Who was that?” asked Borís.
who will not refuse to accompany you.”
who, with his face buried in the ground and a blackened nape, lay on his
“Wh-what is the matter?” asked both the young and old Rostóv.
“Why?”
“Why?”
“Why aren’t you beginning, Michael Ilariónovich?” said the
“Why aren’t you serving in the army?”
“Why are they down on me?” thought Túshin, looking in alarm at his
“Why are you crying, Mamma?” asked Véra. “From all he says one
Why are you hindering us?” Another in the same place turned round and
Why did I bind myself to her? Why did I say ‘Je vous aime’ * to her,
“Why did Sónya run away?” asked Rostóv.
“Why did they write, why did Lise tell me about it? It can never
Why doesn’t the Frenchman stab him? He will not get away before the
“Why doesn’t the red-haired gunner run away as he is unarmed?
“Why, don’t you hear it?” Rostóv asked again, after waiting for a
“Why don’t you play?” he asked.
“Why don’t you renew the acquaintance?” said Dólokhov to Rostóv.
“Why do they want to make her sing? How can she sing? There’s
“Why do you shout so? You’ll frighten them!” said Borís. “I did
“Why, for this reason! My father is one of the most remarkable men of
“Why have we stopped? Is the way blocked? Or have we already come up
“Why have you thrown that away?” asked Borís.
“Why, I didn’t recognize you!” he said. But Rostóv was otherwise
“Why? I love you more than ever,” said Princess Mary, “and I will
“Why, is it late?”
“Why is it wrong?” urged Prince Andrew. “It is not given to man
“Why is it you were never at Annette’s?” the little princess asked
“Why not?” inquired Borís.
“Why not wash? That is not cleanly,” said Prince Andrew; “on the
why she’s ashamed!”
“Why should I envy them? My chance is not lost, and maybe I shall see
“Why shouldn’t I speak? I can speak as I like, and I tell you
“Why should you be ashamed?”
“Why so?” asked Prince Andrew. “To kill a vicious dog is a very
“Why terrible?” asked Nicholas. “No, Váska is a splendid
“Why, that one, right at the end, the big one. Don’t you see?
why they all looked so at him, and flattered by this general admiration
“Why ‘What the devil’?” said Borís, picking it up and reading
“Why, you remember before you went away?... Well, she says you are to
width of the field, an enormous mass of cavalry in brilliant white
wife: “Ah, why have you done this to me?”
wife, and that it could not be otherwise.
wife... God bless you!...”
wife, how she would love him become quite different, and how all he had
wife’s command had let his hair grow and abandoned his spectacles,
wife, sister, and future son, and the tenderness he had felt the night
wife, was talking in low tones to the elderly lady about Pierre.
wife, while you...”
will accept them,” said Nesvítski (who like the others concerned in
will all die for him gladly! Is it not so, gentlemen? Perhaps I am not
will all end in nothing!”
Willarski bowed his head.
Willarski was silent throughout the drive. To Pierre’s inquiries as
Willarski, whom Pierre had known slightly in Petersburg society, came
will certainly happen!” thought Pierre, glancing at those dazzling
will pass here immediately; it will please him to see these gentlemen
will slash at him!” thought Rostóv, gripping the hilt of his saber.
will. The races, the English Club, sprees with Denísov, and visits to
will to tell only what happened. It is very difficult to tell the truth,
“Will you bet? The ribbon of the order is a different matter....”
“Will you have the portmanteaus brought in? And a bed got ready, and
window, from which the double frame had been removed (by order of the
“Wine? Gluttony? Idleness? Laziness? Irritability? Anger? Women?”
winter of 1806, which Nicholas Rostóv spent in Moscow, was one of the
wisdom.”
wished to do something special on meeting his friend. He wanted to pinch
wished to help him but could not.
wished to make some suggestion. But Prince Vasíli interrupted him in
wishing to avail himself of their courtesy, and this caused some delay
wishing to show him that she did not even dare expect to interest him,
wishing to take it off, but let it drop again. The five minutes spent
wish or not to be Prince Anatole Kurágin’s wife? Reply: yes or no,”
wish, to court society’s favor. Now he alone was blamed for what had
with a calm smile that she was not so stupid as to be jealous: ‘Let
with a clever face and sharply projecting jaw which, without spoiling
With a facetious smile on his face, he was telling the ladies about last
with a foretaste of artistic pleasure.
with a gloomy and tired face, was wearily taking off his wraps with the
with a heart full despair he rode away, continually looking back at the
with a hum of conversation, like the hum of bees swarming in springtime.
“With a message to His Majesty.”
with a mouse.
with an apoplectic flush over neck and nape as old people do.
with an old mother and a hunchback sister, and was the most affectionate
with a rapid, almost brutal movement of her head, she intercepted his
with a scared look and that Princess Mary was no longer by the cot.
with a sense of antipathy to the old prince which she did not
with a serious expression, but with a smile lurking at the corners of
with a sigh.
with a sigh he could not suppress, as they passed out of the palace.
with a smile.
with a strength he had never before felt, he made a step toward her
with a subtle smile.
with a trembling voice and some difficulty in utterance due to his
with banks still bare of grass. It was at the end of a village that
with bread and salt and wished to build a chantry in honor of Peter and
with Dólokhov. “None but fools trust to luck in play,” Dólokhov
with elasticity of movement, faith in his good fortune, and generally in
with flour whitening their carts—on that narrow dam amid the wagons
with Germans all day. We went with Weyrother to survey the dispositions.
with her and picked up her reticule and drove out with her. How did it
with her head bent first on one side and then on the other.
with her. He kissed her hand and addressed her not as thou but as
with her knitting. Princess Mary took a book and began reading. Only
with him.”
with him to Dolgorúkov.
with his eccentric father.
with his eyes bandaged seemed to him an hour. His arms felt numb,
with his face in his hands.
with his feelings but with the very possibility of life. Life without
with his glistening wide-open eyes fixed upon him and his mustache
with his handkerchief, sat down by Natásha and did not leave her for
with his podgy old hands resting symmetrically on its arms. At the sound
with his right hand, then falling on one knee he twirled her round him,
with his right thumb under a button of his uniform, his chest expanded
with his whole body as if in that position he hoped to hasten the speed
within.
within a few days. Princess Mary and the old prince each bore and hid
with it to the marshals, and ordered the action to begin. The marshals,
with kisses, holding him tight by the skirt of his coat, sprang away and
with Kutúzov’s cantata, laid one before Pierre as one of the
with lanterns, standing at the entrance. She went out on the stairs. On
with Napoleon if, contrary to expectations, these negotiations were
with Natásha, piquet with his father, and even his comfortable bed
Without answering, Rostóv shook the soldier’s Cross of St. George
without any command being given, apparently obstructed by something in
without any definite position, without relations or even a country, did
Without changing his careless attitude, Pierre looked at them over his
without delay and carry out instructions!
without going out of the house, waiting for the money his father could
without his greatcoat, with his Orders on his breast and an enormous
without looking at him, and with a kind of fury that made him like his
without looking at the man he was addressing, and did not reply to
without male society, on Anatole’s appearance all the three women of
without moving, undertaking nothing....”
without reading it and reread his father’s letter, ending with the
without reasoning. With an affectation of respect which evidently struck
without receiving any explanation.
with papers from Kutúzov to the Tsarévich, he looked in on Borís,
with profit. The first and chief object of our Order, the foundation on
with something. It was a coffin with bones inside. He was not at all
with Telyánin and Bogdánich. That affair was the same thing as this
with the air of an old brigadier.
with the cooperation of all, by the millions of generations from our
with the delight boys feel at the sight of a military elder brother, and
with the full swing of a bludgeon. It hurt a little, but the worst of
with their management and embezzlement of money, some after their first
with their plumes, ribbons, and medals, both courtiers and military
with the lassitude of age, sat yawning wearily with closed eyes. The
With the naked eye Prince Andrew saw below them to the right, not more
with the old prince.”
with the physical pain. It was they, these soldiers—wounded and
With the soldier, an infantry officer with a bandaged cheek came up to
with which he listened to Pierre, especially when he spoke with joyful
with you. I can’t.”
woman; and what have you done? You have not helped her to find the way
woman. Now I have spoken that terrible word to myself all has become
woman’s privilege.”
woman who may belong to anyone—to you too,” said her glance. And at
women have that dress can make a face pretty.
“Women,” he said in a low, scarcely audible voice.
women’s gloves, he said: “Dear brother, these woman’s gloves are
won’t be in action,” he added as if in apology.
won’t get there till evening.”
wooden walls redolent of pine, and would have gone farther, but Antón
word.
word, “and you believed it! Well, what have you proved? What does this
word infected the whole crowd with a feeling of panic.
word of honor not to take anything more till the spring. Now only twelve
words but could not distinguish them. The din of many voices was too
words could do. You will perhaps also see in your further initiation a
words: “Gallop off to Kórchevo and carry out instructions!”
words, he added, “Don’t be hurt, my dear fellow; you know I speak
words he had found so difficult to utter: “I love you.” “It all
words. If you are going to fight a duel, and you make a will and write
words of Rostopchín, that French soldiers have to be incited to battle
words—the Great All or Nothing-” said he to himself, “or to
words to the soldiers who were carrying him, now with his eyes fixed
words. Touched that this statuesque princess could so change, Pierre
words with vague yet joyful ideas. The door opened and someone came in.
word “waiting.”) “Not all the columns have formed up yet, Your
work, chimes to play, figures to pop out, and the hands to advance with
working and looked up with that curious expression of inner, happy calm
working herself up to tears with the imaginary words of her pauvre mère
work. On a third estate the priest, bearing a cross, came to meet
worldly sciences of physics, history, chemistry, and the like, into
world. Prince Andrew was the first to move away, ruffling his hair
worn and irritable. The infantry passing before him came to a halt
worn leather, and an officer’s saber with a sword knot. The Don horse
worse, would have thought that Rostóv was himself to blame since what
worthless scoundrel whose whole life could not atone for his crime. He
worthy of it. This rescript began with the words: “Sergéy Kuzmích,
“Wostóv, get up!”
would at last start on that path of regeneration and on the actively
would be easier to see people coming along it. “Follow me!” said he,
would be good if everything were as clear and simple as it seems to
would be killed.
would be particularly pleasant to him to dishonor my name and ridicule
would be something unnatural, and as it seemed to him dishonorable, in
would be taken immediately to free his serfs—and that till then they
would be to betray her agitation, while to decline their offers to
would be too extraordinary,” and at the very moment she thought this,
would be wiser for him to leave Petersburg. Pierre proposed going to his
would give way not only under a cannon or a crowd, but very soon even
would happen to him and still more afraid of showing his fear. He felt
would have addressed yourself first to me. In that case you would not
would have hit Alpátych, the overseer, had not the latter instinctively
would have made them.
would have me be, but I have never had help from anyone.... But it is
would have seemed so unnatural had anyone disliked him, that he could
would meet.
would not be bad as regards the unwritten code,” thought Borís),
would not have taken lovers (des amants), but I have not done so,”
would not supply them. Pierre was obliged to wait. Without undressing,
would occupy a most brilliant position in society. Don’t you think so?
would still remain piteous and plain. After two or three changes to
“Would you believe it, Count, I was not at all alarmed, because I knew
would you now like to look round my place?”
wounded and captured Russian officers he was carried to the hospital.
wounded—had left it long ago. All about the field, like heaps of
wounded in the right hand, taken his sword in the left, and gone
wounded officer?”
wounded soldier was so dirty, coarse, and revolting that his proximity
wounded were more distinctly heard than any other sound in the darkness
wounded where there was no one left to fire at, on seeing an adjutant
wounds, the loss of family—I fear nothing. And precious and dear
wretched mood. At nine in the morning, he heard firing in front and
wrinkled, clean-shaven cheek for Pierre to kiss and would say: “Till
wrinkled soles and palms.
wrists visible from under the shirt cuffs, laid down the pack and took
wrong, and further that he was disagreeable and unnatural.
wrong and that to discuss the bad news was difficult, and so it was best
wrote himself,” said she through her tears.
year?” said “the man of profound intellect.” “Why shouldn’t
years before, it seemed impossible that the little creature who lived
“Yes.”
“Yes, and I have some money and a letter to give you,” he added.
“Yes, but he will dislike it extremely,” said Bolkónski.
“Yes, but it is not as you imagine,” Prince Andrew continued. “I
“Yes, Count,” she would say, “he is too noble and pure-souled for
“Yes, everything is different nowadays, everything is changed. The
“Yes, from Olmütz,” he answered, with a sigh.
“Yes, gentlemen, I’ve been told there’s a rumor going about Moscow
“Yes, God be thanked! Yes! They’ve just finished supper. Let me have
“Yes, he is very handsome,” thought Pierre, “and I know him. It
yes, hospitals, medicine. He has a fit, he is dying, and you come and
“Yes, I belong to the Brotherhood of the Freemasons,” said the
“Yes, I do believe in God,” he repeated.
“Yes, I do wish it,” said he.
“Yes, I’d send them on in front, but no fear, they’re crowding up
“Yes, I feel a kind of oppression,” she said in reply to the
“Yes, if you put it like that it’s quite a different matter,” said
“Yes... I... I... desire regeneration,” Pierre uttered with
“Yes, I’m tired too,” said Rostóv.
“Yes, indeed!”
“Yes, I never loved her,” said he to himself; “I knew she was a
“Yes, I saw him, and am convinced that he fears nothing so much as
“Yes, it can’t be helped if they won’t take less. Ah, dear me! I
“Yes, it is very likely that I shall be killed tomorrow,” he
“Yes... it’s getting on, it will all be settled today.” Anna
“Yes, I was thinking”—for some reason Borís could not help
yes, killed my wife’s lover. Yes, that was it! And why? How did I come
“Yes, my Sónya could not have done otherwise!” thought Nicholas.
“Yes,” said Natásha. “Do you know, Nicholas—don’t be
“Yes, sir.”
“Yes, sir.”
“Yes, sir, and there’s a light in your father’s study.”
“Yes, stories!” repeated Rostóv loudly, looking with eyes suddenly
yesterday and the question presented itself whether he ought or ought
“Yes, that must be so,” thought Pierre, when after these words the
“Yes, that’s me!” she seemed to say, answering the rapt gaze with
“Yes, that was fine,” said Rostóv, smiling.
“Yes, this is the one thing left me now,” he said with a sigh.
“Yes, we have altered much, very much, since then,” said Prince
“Yes, we know that, but the harm I am conscious of in myself is
“Yes, yes,” assented Pierre.
“Yes, yes,” assented Pierre.
“Yes, yes, do so.”
“Yes, yes,” he muttered, “it will be difficult, I fear, difficult
“Yes, yes, I am unhappy,” assented Pierre. “But what am I to
“Yes... yes, I believe in God,” he said.
“Yes, yes, if you please! It is already late,” said he, and nodding
“Yes, yes, that is so,” said Pierre joyfully.
“Yes, you do not know Him, my dear sir,” said the Mason. “You
“Yes, you have seen him?” said Prince Andrew. “Well, what is
“Yes, you might, but I am afraid of getting the accounts mixed. So I
“Yes, your excellency. Forgive me for heaven’s sake... It was only
“Yes, you talk, but try it yourself!”
yet at the same time was conscious of his strength as a part of that
Yet it was she, dressed in a new gown which he did not know, made since
yet occupied that region, and the Russians—the uninjured and slightly
yet with a hope for the fulfillment of her forbidden earthly longing)
yet with unhesitating assurance that he was doing the right thing,
you!”
“You absolutely must come and see me,” she said in a tone that
you and make you weep.
you a place in my carriage. I am very glad. All our important business
“You are a little slyboots,” she said.
You are all blubberers and understand nothing.”
“You are an angel: I am not worthy of you, but I am afraid of
“You are joking,” replied Pierre, growing more and more excited.
“You are most welcome! I know, I know,” said the count, kissing and
you are not aware of the fact...”
“You are seeking for truth in order to follow its laws in your life,
“You are still the same dreamer, I see,” remarked Borís, shaking
“You are the commander of the Emperor Alexander’s regiment of Horse
“You are unhappy, my dear sir,” the stranger continued. “You
“You are wounded?” he asked, hardly able to master the trembling of
you, but why should I bother about you? You’d be only too glad, of
“You call him Váska? That’s funny! And is he very nice?”
“You can give the message to His Majesty,” said Dolgorúkov,
“You can’t come in! You can’t!” said a terrified voice from
    * “You clear out of this.”
“You couldn’t see a thing. How they shot at their own fellows!
“You did not get my letter?” he asked, and not waiting for a
“You don’t mind your honor?” he asked Túshin. “I’ve lost my
“You forget yourself, Colonel. I am not considering my own pleasure
you have been entered in the diplomatic corps and made a Gentleman of
“You have earned the St. George’s standards and will be worthy of
“You haven’t read the letter?” asked Sónya.
you hurry up? Now then!”
you? I’m awfully glad you’re my brother.” She touched his
“You know Bilíbin—he’s a very clever fellow. He suggested
“You know her husband, of course?” said Anna Pávlovna, closing her
“You know Him not, my dear sir, and so you are very unhappy. You do
“You know, Michael Ilariónovich, we are not on the Empress’ Field
“You know, mon cher, your father and I had some accounts to settle, so
“You know N— N— received a snuffbox with the portrait last
“You know they’ve come, Marie?” said the little princess, waddling
“You’ll die and all will end. You’ll die and know all, or cease
“You’ll make a fine thing of it, deploying in sight of the enemy!
“You may go,” he said to Anatole.
“You may punt,” he said.
“You might have taken some from the covering troops.”
“You must do as you please,” said Prince Bolkónski, bowing to his
young aide-de-camp with a smile.
young, all our octogenarians were reviewed, and of Prozoróvski
young and old men and women Pierre could not understand why he did not
young face to look back. A shudder of terror went through him: “No,
young girls ready for anything and full of hope—experienced the same
young man he did not know, with a peculiar cross hanging from his
young man’s recent loss by the death of Count Bezúkhov (everyone
young man’s shoulder.
young master. “Can it be? My treasure!” and Prokófy, trembling with
young son, resting on him and winking joyfully at him. Young Rostóv
young. You need advice. Don’t be angry with me for exercising an old
you not rest here?”
“You owe forty-three thousand, Count,” said Dólokhov, and
“You picked it up?... I dare say! You’re very smart!” one of them
you positively that Hélène is as innocent before you as Christ was
your battalions. I will keep out of fire if you with your habitual
“Your cousin...” Dólokhov started to say, but Nicholas interrupted
your Denísov though he is a rake and all that, still I like him; so
your disposal.”
“Your excellency, here are two trophies,” said Dólokhov, pointing
“Your excellency!” Prince Andrew broke the silence with his abrupt
“Your excellency,” said Rostóv, “may I ask a favor?”
“Your excellency, should not Mary Bogdánovna be sent for?” said one
your eyes,” added Willarski. “I wish you courage and success,”
“Your honor, I thought...”
“Your honor, the generals!” said the sergeant, riding up to Rostóv.
“Your honor, there he is!” cried one of the hussars behind him. And
“Your honor, you’re wanted by the general. He is in the hut here,”
“Your joke is too bad, it’s witty but unjust,” said Anna
your presence; if she is willing, then he can stay on. He can stay and
“Your regiment fulfilled its duty honorably,” said Napoleon.
yours.”
yourself and say you nearly ruined your life and only found happiness
yourself in a position to be attacked, but yourself to attack. Believe
yourself, put a bridle on your senses, and seek blessedness, not in
“Your son,” wrote Kutúzov, “fell before my eyes, a standard in
you?” said the old prince to Prince Vasíli.
you see I do understand. I don’t know how to put it... with this one
“You see, my dear fellow, I have been thinking about you,”
you seen Duport?”
you select to be your worthy helpmeet in Masonry.” And after a pause,
“You shan’t have it!” he said distinctly.
you—Sónya. But their eyes met and said thou, and exchanged tender
you that it would be very easy to do so if you haven’t sufficient
“Youth is no hindrance to courage,” muttered Sukhtélen in a failing
“You thought!” shouted the prince, his words coming more and more
you understand, your excellency, my dear sir, that you must not
you’ve had to take,” cried he.
you were about, challenged a man you are jealous of without cause.”
You were not right, not quite in the right, you were impetuous...”
you, who do not believe in the truth of the light and who have not
“You will change it, won’t you?” said Lise. And as Princess Mary
“You will find the beautiful Hélène here, whom it is always
you will let me win this ten, or beat it.”
you will remember this, your excellency!”
you won’t require it. We’ll go into the accounts later.”
you yourself reported to Count Buxhöwden yesterday, you must think of
“You...! you... scoundrel! I challenge you!” he ejaculated, and,
Zherkóv, not removing his hand from his cap, turned his horse about
“Zum Henker diese Russen!” * muttered a German.
